© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The electronic structure and magnetism of a new type of half-Heusler alloy, i.e., double half-Heusler (DHH) alloy Mn2FeCoSi2 are investigated. Our calculations reveal that Mn2FeCoSi2 is a ferrimagnet with a magnetic moment of 3 μB, it has a stable magnetism and its half metallicity can be preserved when c/a ranges from 1.8 to 2.2. Furthermore, 6 kinds of swap disorders and 12 kinds of antisite disorders are simulated to study the influence of atomic disorder on half metallicity of Mn2FeCoSi2. Half metallicity is maintained in Co-Fe disordered structure and spin polarization of Mn-Si, Mn-Fe and Si-Co disordered structure also reaches up to 94%, 98% and 97%, respectively. With regard to various antisite disorders, 100% spin polarization could be preserved in Co(Fe), Fe(Co), Fe(Mn), Mn(Co), Mn(Fe) and Si(Co) disordered structures. Therefore, Mn2FeCoSi2 possesses a robust half-metallicity against the atomic disorder.© 2022In order to meet the requirements of an Internet of Things (IoT) application with high capacity data storage, a 64M bit resistive random access memory (RRAM) has been designed and fabricated successfully using 180 nm Silterra technology. In the design, the memory cell adopts the one-transistor-one-resistor (1T1R) structure and the layout of the memory cell is optimized to minimize the chip area. In order to maximize the performance of the RRAM, the method of split array and hierarchical decoding are adopted in the circuit design. To ensure the correct readout of data, 32 reference word lines can be connected with different reference resistors to generate appropriate reference current while the sense amplifier (SA) circuit is specially designed to achieve fast data readout. Using this circuit we achieved a measurement result for the 64M bit RRAM chip, the read access time is less than 20 ns, the data retention time is more than 10 years, and the endurance is more than 107 cycles.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In this work, nanosized precursors of the Eu3Fe5O12 complex oxide – europium iron garnet – were prepared for the first time by the method of a supercritical antisolvent precipitation. It was shown that changing the synthesis parameters, namely, pressure, temperature, concentration of the initial solution and nozzle diameter, made it possible to obtain particles of controlled size from 20 to 80 nm. The obtained samples were characterized by a complex of physicochemical methods of analysis: IR spectroscopy, XRD, TG/DSC analysis, TEM. The main magnetic characteristics were obtained from powders annealed at 800 °C on a vibration magnetometer. The dependence of the magnetic characteristics on the grain size was established. The critical size of the transition to the single-domain state is 33 nm. The features of the garnet crystalline phase formation for samples with the smallest grain size and extended surface were revealed.© 2022Vortex-Core magnetic force microscopy (VC MFM) promises magnetic tip durability and long-term calibration of its magnetic moment that is crucial for quantitative scanning. It uses the vortex core of a ferromagnetic disk located at the tip apex as a magnetic probe. However, our experience showed that MFM images might be distorted when scanning magnetic objects larger than 100 nm due to a VC shift generated by the stray field of the scanned sample. We addressed the problem by changing the tip geometry and introducing artificial VC pinning at the disk center. These steps are essential for improving the VC tip for quantitative scanning. The scanning experiments with the optimized VC tip showed improved characteristics of the magnetic images – spatial resolution of the tip was on the level of commercial MFM tip with certain details depicted even better.© 2022 The Author(s)Hard magnetic MnBi films were obtained by appropriate heat treatments of pulsed laser deposited (PLD) (Bi/Mn) films. X-ray diffraction patterns indicated a slight texture of MnBi crystallites and magnetometry measurements showed a slight preferential growth of the crystallites with their c-axis perpendicular to the film plane. Magnetic force microscopy (MFM) measurements displayed the presence of magnetic domains, whose size was in the micrometer range, and which were correlated to the MnBi grains observed in the sample. The addition of extra Mn layers did not modify significantly the previous structural and magnetic results. Nevertheless, the size of the magnetic domains increased to a few microns. However, on adding extra Bi layers, upon annealing, the MnBi grains grew with their c-axes perpendicular to the film plane. A perpendicular to the film magnetic anisotropy was deduced from the hysteresis loops, where an increase in the remanence of the magnetization was measured when the magnetic field was applied perpendicular to the film plane. In these samples, by measuring the magnetic domain configuration of the samples by MFM, we observed that the size of the magnetic domains exceeded the dimensions of the grains. This change in the magnetic structure of the films was assumed to be due to the coupling of the magnetization in the neighboring grains, and it was responsible for the decrease of the coercivity in the Bi rich samples.© 2022 Elsevier LtdAn aggressively scaled triple self-aligned split-gate floating-gate (FG) NOR-type Dual-bit/cell (NORD) flash cell was studied and fabricated at 55-nm node technology. Both FG- and selected-gate (SG-) length, for the first time, were scaled down to sub-80 nm and sub-60 nm in NORD flash, respectively. In this paper, performance of aggressively scaled cells were demonstrated by measurements. Firstly, the cell's characteristics were presented by discussing FG- and SG-transistor's drain-induced barrier lowering (DIBL) effects and SG-FG coupling effect. It was experimentally revealed that excellent immunity of DIBL effect was still obtained in this highly scaled SG-transistor due to the fully isolated SG-channel. Then, optimization from process for FG-transistor had been discussed. It was shown that the properties of subthreshold region of FG-transistor has been improved by introducing dual pocket implants for the half-isolated FG-channel. Thirdly, reading biases were also studied to expand the window of read currents. A novel cell structure was also proposed to further improve the aggressively length-scaled NORD flash cell without sacrificing bit-area. Finally, the reliability characteristics were also presented.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Towards the development of a magnetic semiconductor suitable for spintronic device applications in extreme environments, we explored the possibility of inducing magnetic interaction in SiC by doping Nickel. The X-ray diffraction and Raman Spectroscopy studies confirm the incorporation of Ni into the host lattice. The magnetic measurements and electron spin resonance studies indicate the presence of room temperature ferromagnetic interaction in the system. The Curie temperature of 1, 3, and 5% Ni-doped samples have been found to be 420 K, 520 K, and 540 K respectively. Electron spin resonance study reveals that the valence state of Ni is 2+, which implies the creation of vacancies at both Silicon (VSi) and Carbon (VC) sites as they are tetravalent. The change in magnetization of the system with an increase in dopant concentration is consistent with the variation in the number of vacancies and free holes. The analysis of magnetization data using the Law of approach to saturation shows that the anisotropic constant decreases with an increase in temperature. The long-range magnetic interaction in the system is explained using the F+ center exchange mechanism.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The zero-temperature phase diagram of the frustrated spin-[Formula presented]J1–J2–J1⊥ Heisenberg magnet on an AA-stacked honeycomb bilayer lattice is studied using the coupled cluster method implemented to very high orders. On each monolayer the spins interact via nearest-neighbor (NN) and frustrating next-nearest-neighbor isotropic antiferromagnetic Heisenberg interactions with respective strength parameters J1>0 and J2≡κJ1>0. The two layers are coupled such that NN interlayer pairs of spins also interact via a similar isotropic Heisenberg interaction of strength J1⊥≡δJ1, which may be of either sign. In particular, we locate with high accuracy the complete phase boundaries in the κ–δ half-plane with κ>0 of the two quasiclassical collinear antiferromagnetic phases with Néel or Néel-II magnetic order in each monolayer, and the interlayer NN pairs of spins either aligned (for δ<0) or anti-aligned (for δ>0) to one another. Compared to the two-sublattice Néel order, in which all NN intralayer pairs of spins are antiparallel to one another, the four-sublattice Néel-II order is characterized by NN intralayer pairs of spins on the honeycomb lattice being antiparallel to one another along zigzag (or sawtooth) chains in a specified direction from among the three equivalent honeycomb-lattice directions, and parallel to one another for the corresponding interchain pairs.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.dimentation stability and high yield stress of a magnetorheological fluid (MRFs) are essential parameters for better damping performance for any practical application. Preliminary investigations have been carried out on carbonyl iron particles to determine the morphology, particle size, crystal structure, and saturation magnetization for their feasibility of synthesizing magnetorheological fluids in-house. This study synthesizes various MRFs from various commonly used carrier oils and additives. The MRF samples were prepared for 25% volume fractions of carbonyl iron (CI) powder in either silicone oil (350cSt) or hydraulic oil (50cSt) and by using lithium and calcium-based additives or a combination of both the additives. The sedimentation stability and yield behaviour at different temperatures show a remarkable drop in sedimentation rate and yield stress for all the MR fluid samples. The characterization of the prepared MR fluids reveals that MRF-1, MRF-3, MRF-5 are more stable and have high yield stress values. MRF-1 is selected to further characterize its dynamic performance in magnetorheological damper fabricated based on geometric dimensions obtained from the response surface optimization technique. The results indicate a 164.45% and 135.48% increase in damping force at higher amplitude and higher frequencies at 0A and 1A currents. Further, similar tests have been carried out by synthesizing MRF-7 with silicone oil (50cSt) + lithium base grease as the additive. The sample's stability and yield stress with temperature are carried out, and performance analysis shows a remarkable change in damping force than MRF-1. The dynamic range obtained is practically viable in MRF-7 than MRF-1, with less variability. Finally, temperature characteristics captured from the thermocouple of the MR damper reveal that an average of 43.78% reduction in damping force when the temperature is increased by 19.5 °C with increased dynamic range.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The structural and magnetic properties of Ba1-xGdxFe12O19 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.15) nanoparticles prepared using the proteic sol-gel process were investigated. Infrared spectroscopy, Raman spectroscopy, and X-ray powder diffraction measurements with Rietveld refinement analysis confirmed the formation of M-type BaFe12O19, whereas extra peaks of secondary phases were also detected for BaFeO3 (2θ = 28°), GdFeO3 (2θ = 38.4°), and Fe2O3 (2θ = 38.6°). Average crystallite size increases with Gd substitution in the range of 61–63 nm. Scanning electron microscopy revealed that the particle morphology of some samples consisted of a tendency for regular hexagonal platelets with inhomogeneous distribution of average grain size in the range of 250–280 nm. The room temperature magnetic studies revealed that considerable large saturation magnetization (Ms), remanence (Mr), and coercivity (Hc) for the Ba1-xGdxFe12O19 nanoparticles monotonically decreased to a minimum value until x = 0.1. However, it increased again to Ms ≈ 55.5 emu·g−1, Mr≈ 22.7 emu·g−1, and Hc ≈ 3.7 kOe for the x = 0.15 sample. The squareness ratio (SQR = Mr/Ms) values were lower than 0.5, illustrating the magnetic multidomain nature and uniaxial anisotropy of the samples. These results were investigated deeply with relation to hyperfine parameters and surface morphology of the samples by 57Fe Mössbauer spectroscopy and magnetic force microscopy (MFM). The hyperfine parameters indicated that the substitution of Gd3+ for Ba2+ induces exchange interactions in 2b-O2-4f2 and 12k-O2-2b, resulting in the higher magnetocrystalline anisotropy of the samples. Additionally, MFM images confirm that grain consisting of distributed smaller grains gives rise to a strip-and helix-like magnetic domain structure.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Fluid droplet manipulation by external magnetic field has attracted increasing attention through years motivated by its wide applications including micro-electro-mechanical systems (MEMS), enhanced oil recovery (EOR), water decontamination, chemical reaction control, and many more. The confined deformation of a fluid droplet immersed immiscibly in a ferrofluid in a Hele-Shaw cell when exposed to a sub-Hertz rotating magnetic field is experimentally and theoretically investigated. For the first time in this frequency range, experimental results reveal that the droplet deformation is weakened by increasing magnetic field rotation frequency. The droplet deformation was then modeled as forced vibration with damping to describe the impact of the rotation frequency and magnetic field strength. The results enable a method to predict the confined droplet behavior immersed in ferrofluid for micro-scale applications, e.g., flow actuators and deformable rotors.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic bimeron composed of a meron and an antimeron can be considered as a magnetic skyrmion in the in-plane magnet and have great potential for spintronic devices. Here, we explored the effect of static magnetic fields on the shape of bimeron. It is found that the size of the bimeron can be adjusted by magnetic fields in an anisotropic direction. Then we study the field-tuned spin excitation spectrum of magnetic bimeron. Unlike the common breathing mode and the two rotation modes, novel resonance modes, which can be considered as a combination of the breathing and rocking-rotation modes, are observed. The results presented in this study can help to open novel research into the spintronics of magnetic bimeron.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.A series of Fe-Co-N films sandwiched by AlN layers have been sputter-deposited at different N2 flow ratios in an Ar and N2 gas mixture. It is revealed that the main phase of films transforms from polycrystalline α-FeCo(N) to amorphous-like γ′-(Fe,Co)4N, polycrystalline ε-(Fe,Co)3N and ξ-(Fe,Co)2N with increasing N2 flow ratio. The coercivity of the films initially decreases with increasing N2 flow ratio, reaching the lowest value of 8–10 Oe at N2 flow ratio around 20% to 30%. This is due to the formation of amorphous-like phase with extremely fine microstructure. Furthermore, vacuum annealing has been carried out over a temperature range of 100 to 600 °C for the films with N2 ratios ranging between 20% and 40%. The saturation magnetization of the films largely increases after the films are annealed at 350 °C, which is caused by the decomposition of the nitride phases into α-FeCo(N) during the annealing process. The coercivity of the 20% and 30 % N2 films shows strong annealing temperature dependence, and it increases at first and then decreases.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, a novel convolutional neural network named FilterNet is proposed to learn feature representation directly from raw magnetic Barkhausen noise (MBN) for quantitatively evaluating plastic deformation. In the proposed model, three modified filter-type convolutional kernels are adopted to extract appropriate feature expressions from raw MBN. In the experimental part, a special experimental device, which could change the angle between the electromagnetic sensor and specimens, was designed to simulate the case that the performance of a trained model declined due to the change in the angle. MBN signals at 11 angles from left to right were measured. The performances of multiple linear regression (MLR), BP neural network (BP), and the FilterNet were analyzed with mean absolute error (MAE) and root-mean-square error (RMSE). MAE and RMSE of the FilterNet were smaller than the other two models at different angles and reveal the outperformance of the FilterNet.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The discussions over the origins of the magnetic and insulating properties in LaCoO3 films has continued unabated even now. We investigate the energy of natural low spin, homogeneous intermediate spin, and mixed spin configurations using first principle calculations, taking into account various distortions in bulk and films. The spin state transition can be controlled by rhombohedral distortion and octahedral rotations in films bulk. The octahedral rotation reserved in the films bulk, and it can also induce the breathing distortion or the Jahn–Teller distortion when increase the mismatch ratio. The breathing distortion or the Jahn–Teller distortion change the electronic structure from a metal to semiconductor. The octahedral rotations can be a efficient regulatory to control electronic structure and spin states. The constrain of mixed spin configuration (IS:LS=1:2) potentially cause a charge disproportionation, resulting in a quasi-breathing distortion similar to magnetoelastic effect.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Field-induced magnetic transitions with large magnetization difference and mitigated thermal loss are highly desirable for the development of magnetocaloric materials used for magnetic refrigeration. Here, we report the magnetocaloric effect (MCE) in antiferromagnetic carbide Dy2Cr2C3. Both the inverse MCE (with positive magnetic entropy change ΔSM) and conventional MCE (with negative ΔSM) have been observed, which are attributed to a field-induced first-order metamagnetic transition from antiferromagnetic to ferromagnetic state and a second-order ferromagnetic to paramagnetic transition, respectively. A maximum -ΔSM of 13.5 J/kg K at 27 K for a field change of 5 T, and correspondingly a refrigerant cooling power of 315 J/kg in a wide working temperature span of 31 K have been achieved. Such a remarkable magnetocaloric response, together with the minor magnetic hysteresis of less than 0.02 T, indicate that Dy2Cr2C3 carbide could be a promising candidate refrigerant for magnetic refrigeration working at temperatures near the liquid H2.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Erythrosiderites with the formula A2FeX5⋅H2O, where A = Rb, K, and (NH4) and X = Cl and Br are intriguing systems that possess various magnetic and electric phases, as well as multiferroic phases in which magnetism and ferroelectricity are coupled. In this report, we study the magnetic phase diagram of erythrosiderites as a function of superexchange interactions and magnetic anisotropies. To this end, we perform classical Monte Carlo simulations on magnetic Hamiltonians that contain five different superexchange interactions with single-ion anisotropies. Our phase diagram contains all magnetic ground states that have been experimentally observed in these materials. We argue that the ground states can be explained by varying the ratio of [Formula presented]. For [Formula presented]>0.95 a cycloidal spins structure is stabilized as observed in (NH4)2FeCl5⋅H2O and otherwise a collinear spin structure is stabilized as observed in (K,Rb)2FeCl5⋅H2O. We also show that the difference in the single-ion anisotropy along a- and c- axes is essential to stabilize the intermediate state observed in (NH)2FeCl5⋅H2O.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In the magnetic flux leakage (MFL) testing method, a linear mapping is used for the direct evaluation of defects by applying a single Hall sensor to measure the signal under a certain lift-off value. Inevitably, the uncertainty of the lift-off value in practical testing affects the accuracy of the estimated defect size. To overcome this uncertainty in the lift-off value, this paper proposes a double Hall sensor configuration with a fixed lift-off interval, and establishes an evaluation method for the defect depth through the MFL signals measured by this sensor. The effectiveness of the proposed evaluation method is verified by theoretical analysis, with the double Hall sensor providing two different lift-off values above the surface of the specimen that characterize the tested defect. Based on the error between the measured signal characteristics induced by the tested defect and the predicted values from a fast calculation model, a particle swarm optimization algorithm is employed to realize accurate evaluation of the defect depth. Theoretical research shows that the characteristic values measured by the double Hall sensor enable the defect depth to be accurately estimated. The use of a double Hall sensor with a fixed lift-off interval allows the proposed evaluation method to compensate for the unknown lift-off value in practical testing.© 2022 Elsevier LtdA multi-energy level agnostic model is used to examine defect generation during time-dependent dielectric breakdown stress. When considering distributed bond strengths, Monte Carlo simulations show that the distinctive power-law increase of the generated defects with stress time is attained. The rate is strongly influenced by the width of the distribution. The time to breakdown in DC and AC unipolar simulations is proportional to the fluence and energy of the injected carriers. These findings are in line with thin oxide breakdown measurements, which demonstrate a fluence and energy-driven process.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the effects of Bi substitution on the structure, magnetization, magnetoresistance, and magnetostrain in single crystals of (Mn2Sb)1-xBix (x = 0.06, 0.08, 0.1, and 0.12). It is found that the element Bi can be partially substituted for Sb in the tetragonal Mn2Sb main phase, and partially forms the MnBi and Bi-rich secondary phases. The introduction of Bi causes the simultaneous lattice shrinkages in a and c for the main phase, and also enhances the transition temperature of the first-order magnetoelastic ferrimagnetic-antiferromagnetic transition. Such an enhancement in transition temperature due to contraction of the unit-cell volume contraction is also experimentally proven based on the thermomagnetic curves under hydrostatic pressure for a crystal with × = 0.12. The volume contraction rate due to hydrostatic pressure is deduced to be −0.0386 Å3/GPa. Moreover, the highest values of in-plane magnetoresistance (∼-30%) and magnetostrain (∼−1448 ppm) with good reversibility are attained at 120 K under 30 kOe, which was proven to be the optimal magnetic field. Our experimental results show that Mn2Sb-based intermetallic compounds can be considered promising candidates for low-cost, multifunctional magnetic materials.© 2022As a kind of 4H-SiC power device, the junction barrier Schottky (JBS) rectifiers, only containing the transition p + implantation region at the edge of the active region in the termination region, are adopted and fabricated to analyze the effect of the repetitive avalanche low-current stress on the SiO2/4H-SiC interfacial state of the devices. The breakdown voltage (BV) of the device shifts after the repetitive avalanche current stress, which results from the electron injects into the SiO2/4H-SiC interface and trapped by the interface states. Meanwhile, there is a tradeoff between the quantities of the trapped and de-trapped electrons by the SiO2/4H-SiC interface states when the BV reaches its saturated value. The junction temperature, total amount of carriers generated in the single avalanche event and repetitive total avalanche energy, affected by the pulse period (T), pulse number and turn-on period (D), are the key factors that affect the level of the BV shift.© 2022 Elsevier LtdFD-SOI five-gate (5G) qubit MOS devices are electrically characterized in linear regime down to deep cryogenic temperatures. The Lambert-W function is successfully used for the modelling of such 5G MOS devices from subthreshold regime to strong inversion. Its applicability is demonstrated down to deep cryogenic temperatures. The 5G device is modeled as a series of five independent transistors: the “active” one, that directly controls the current, and the “external” ones, that act as access resistances. The Lambert-W function enables to accurately reconstruct the inversion charge and the active channel resistance from weak to strong inversion. This approach allows reproducing the drain current characteristic avoiding the evaluation of the mobility attenuation factors. The main device parameters are extracted versus temperature. Furthermore, the role of different scattering mechanisms has been investigated, underlying the impact of defects for the gates in proximity of source and drain. The experimental characterizations have been completed with some Poisson-solver based simulations, carried out down to cryogenic temperatures. In this regime, Maxwell-Boltzmann carrier statistic has been replaced by an analytical expression of the Fermi-Dirac function.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In this study, nanocomposites of Ti/Co with varying Ni content were synthesized via the sol–gel process and calcination at 500 °C for 3 h, which were later used as a precursor for film fabrication. In order to fabricate the Ti/Co/Ni films, the prepared nanocomposites of Ti/Co/Ni were initially spin-coated on a glass substrate, and later heated to 250 °C for 4 h. The crystallite phase and size, surface morphology, microstructure, magnetic behavior, and corrosion resistivity were investigated using XRD, TEM, SEM, VSM, and potentiostat, respectively. The synthesized nanoparticles formed crystallite size ranging between 25 to 30 nm in diameter and exhibited the major crystallite phases of B2 structure, depending on the studied conditions. The saturation magnetization (Ms) was significantly increased from 0.07 to 1.27 emu/g and coercivity (Hc) increased from 280 to 400 Oe. Based on the result, the increase of Ni content enhanced not only the magnetic behavior but also the corrosion resistivity. Based upon the results, the synthesis of Ti/Co/Ni via sol–gel method was successfully conducted and used as a precursor for film fabrication.© 2022 Elsevier LtdModern electronic devices consist of several semiconductor layers where each layer exhibits unique carrier transport properties that can be represented by a unique mobility characteristic. To date, the mobility spectrum analysis technique is the main approach that has been developed and applied to the analysis of conductivity mechanisms of multi-carrier semiconductor structures and devices. Currently, there are no theoretical calculations of the mobility distribution in semiconductor structures or devices and specifically in MOSFET devices. In this article, we present a theoretical study of the electron mobility distribution in planar fully-depleted silicon-on-insulator (FD-SOI) transistors employing quantum mechanical modelling. The simulation results indicate that electronic transport in the 10 nm thick Si channel layer at room-temperature is due to two distinct and well-defined electron species for channel length varying from 50 nm to 200 nm. The two electron mobility distributions provide clear evidence of sub-band modulated transport in 10-nm thick Si planar FD-SOI MOSFETs that are associated with primed and non-primed valleys of silicon. The potential of the top gate electrode has been modulated, and thus only the top channel inversion-layer electron population transport parameters have been investigated employing self-consistent non-equilibrium Green's function (NEGF)–Poisson numerical calculations. The numerical framework presented can be used to interpret experimental results obtained by magnetic-field dependent geometrical magnetoresistance measurements and mobility spectrum analysis, and provides greater insight into electron mobility distributions in nanostructured FET devices.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In this study, we analyze the effect of Fe substitution with Co on the magnetic properties of Fe80P13C7 amorphous alloy using experimental measurements and first-principle molecular dynamic calculations of the distribution functions, Voronoi polyhedra, and density of states of Fe80-xCoxP13C7 (x = 0, 5, 10, 15 at.%) alloys. The experimental results demonstrate that the saturation magnetization (Ms) of Fe80-xCoxP13C7 (x = 0, 5, 10, 15 at.%) increases and then decreases with increasing Co content, and that maximum Ms is achieved when the composition of Co is 5 at.%. This trend is consistent with the one determined using simulations. Compared to the other amorphous alloys investigated herein, Fe75Co5P13C7 exhibits the highest local symmetry, which explains why it has the largest exchange splitting energy and largest Ms. In addition, increasing substitution of Fe atoms with Co does not appreciably affect the magnetic moment of Co atoms, but it increases the magnetic moment of Fe atoms, particularly those adjacent to Co. This indicates that Co atoms can induce an increase in the magnetic moment of the Fe atoms surrounding them.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Mechanical control of electronic and magnetic properties of 2D Van-der-Waals heterostructures gives new possibilities for further development of spintronics and information-related technologies. Using the density functional theory, we investigate the structural, electronic and magnetic properties of silicene monolayer with substituted Chromium atoms and under a small biaxial strain (−6%<ε<8%). Our results indicate that the Cr-doped silicene nanosheets without strain have magnetic metallic, half-metallic or semiconducting properties depending on the type of substitution. We also show that the magnetic moments associated with the monomer and vertical dimer substitutions change very weakly with strain. However, the magnetic moment associated with the horizontal dimer substitution decreases when either compressive or tensile strain is applied to the system. Additionally, we show that the largest semiconductor band-gap is approximately 0.13 eV under zero strain for the vertical Cr-doped silicene. Finally, biaxial compressive strain leads to irregular changes in the magnetic moment for Cr vertical dimer substitution.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.ThMn12-type ternary cerium alloys with tetragonal structure (Pearson symbol tI26, space group I4/mmm) are considered as promising materials for permanent magnets. In this work, compositions of CeFe11X (s.g. Pmmn, No. 59) and CeFe10X2 (s.g. P4/mmm, No. 123) with all 3d, 4d, and 5d transition metal substitutions are considered. Since many previous studies have focused on the CeFe11Ti compound, this particular case became the starting point of our considerations and we gave it special attention. We first determined the optimal symmetry of the simplest CeFe11Ti structure model. We then observed that the calculated magnetocrystalline anisotropy energy (MAE) correlates with the magnetic moment, which in turn strongly depends on the choice of the exchange–correlation potential. MAE, magnetic moments, and magnetic hardness were determined for all compositions considered. Moreover, the calculated dependence of the MAE on the spin magnetic moment allowed us to predict the upper limits of the MAE. We also showed that it does not depend on the choice of the exchange–correlation potential form. The economically justifiable compositions with the highest magnetic hardness values are CeFe11W, CeFe10W2, CeFe11Mn, CeFe10Mn2, CeFe11Mo, CeFe10Mo2, and CeFe10Nb2. However, calculations suggest that, like CeFe12, these compounds are not chemically stable and could require additional treatments to stabilize the composition. Further alloying of the selected compositions with light elements embedded in interstitial positions confirms the positive effect of such dopants on hard magnetic properties. Subsequent calculations performed for comparison for selected isostructural La-based compounds lead to similar MAE results as for Ce-based compounds, suggesting a secondary effect of 4f electrons. Our preliminary results obtained using the intra-atomic Hubbard repulsion term showed a relatively small difference for CeFe12 compared to the results without this correction. Calculations were performed using the full-potential local-orbital electronic structure code FPLO18, whose unique fully relativistic implementation of the fixed spin moment method allowed us to calculate the MAE dependence of the magnetic moment.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The influence of cubic in-plane magnetic anisotropy on current-induced domain wall (DW) motion was investigated by micromagnetic simulation. DW velocity is enhanced when the nanostripes are placed in an optimized cubic in-plane magnetic anisotropy field that almost exactly compensates the demagnetizing field. An increase is also observed in the walker limit current, which is the linearity loss of the DW velocity as a function of spin current density when the latter exceeds a critical value. The microwave-assisted DW motion that is usually proposed to increase DW velocity is further improved by adding the cubic magnetic anisotropy field on the nanostripes. These effects of enhancing current-induced DW motion are useful for device applications.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.We obtain varying spin Hall angle (θSH, 2nd) values measured by the 2nd harmonic methods in W/Ta multilayers system with relatively low resistivity by doping Ta into mixed-phase W with both α and β phases (α-W, β-W). A remarkably increased value of θSH, 2nd is observed from 0.04 (W) to 0.47 (W1/Ta0.25), which is attributed to the formation of β-W3Ta. The influences of θSH, 2nd on the critical switching current density (Jc) were investigated by the spin Hall angle (θSH, Jc). It is found that the θSH, Jc has strong correlations with θSH, 2nd in large dimension samples, indicating the Jc can be lowered by the enhancement of θSH, 2nd. This correlation gradually disappears in smaller dimension samples, due to the pinning effect and domain wall (DW) surface tension, which are confirmed by microsimulations.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Fe2+/3+ doping has been experimentally proven to have ferromagnetic effects on ZnO. However, the source and mechanism of magnetic properties are still explained by using the traditional double exchange theory with oxygen atoms as the intermediary. Therefore, the theoretical explanation of these phenomena needs to be expanded urgently. In this study, first principles calculations are used to investigate the effect of Fe2+/3+ doping on the magnetic mechanism of ZnO on the basis of the generalized gradient approximation plane wave ultrasoft pseudopotential method within the framework of spin density functional theory. This study shows that the Zn34Fe2O36(Fe3+) system exhibits the characteristics of ferromagnetism above room temperature and that the total magnetic moment is not an integer when the distance between two Fe ions is 4.790 Å. The Zn34Fe2O36(Fe3+) system has a part of O1− ions in addition to O2− ions, that is, it contains the characteristics of itinerant electrons (donors) and local electrons (acceptors). This study is the first to discover that Fe3d states also produce local and itinerant electrons. It also reveals a new magnetic mechanism for sp–d double exchange with itinerant electrons as the media in the Zn34Fe2O36(Fe3+) system.© 2022A composite material with a nominal composition of Ni0.6Fe2.4O4 was prepared by the solid-phase reaction method. X-ray diffraction analysis shows that the product is composed of α-Fe2O3 and a solid solution of Fe3O4 and NiFe2O4. Although α-Fe2O3 non-magnetic phase reduces the saturation magnetization, it greatly improves the temperature and frequency stability of magnetic permeability. Based on the measurement results of the amplitude permeability in the range of −60 °C to 100 °C, the temperature coefficient αμ and specific temperature coefficient β were calculated. αμ and β of the composite material are 7.15 ×10-5/°C and 8.6 ×10-6/°C, respectively, which are much smaller than αμ (1.26×10-3/°C) and β (9.5×10-5/°C) of NiFe2O4. At the same time, the magnetic spectrum curves show that the real part of the complex permeability μ' basically remains unchanged within the measurement frequency range (f < 106 Hz). This improvement in temperature and frequency stability is attributed to the effect of the α-Fe2O3 phase.© 2022Site-specific writing and directional movement of skyrmion in a magnetic stripe are very important for skyrmion-based racetrack memory. In this paper, we propose a system composed of circular heterostructure and a synthetic antiferromagnet racetrack where the circular heterostructure is fabricated at one end of the racetrack. The skyrmion can be firstly written by the voltage at the fixed-point position and then be driven by the current induced spin–orbit torques. A skyrmion is first nucleated in the ferromagnetic layer of the circular heterostructure by using voltage control magnetic anisotropy effect. In the meanwhile, an antiferromagnetic skyrmion is generated by antiferromagnetic exchange coupling from the magnetic layer of the circular heterostructure. Subsequently, the antiferromagnetic skyrmion is shifted straightly in the synthetic antiferromagnetic racetrack by the current-generated spin–orbit torques. This work provides a promising method for the fixed-point writing skyrmions in the current-driven skyrmion racetrack. Meanwhile, it provides theoretical guidance for the experimental research of skyrmionic storage and logic device.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Quenched disorder effects on frustrated systems are explored by considering random fluctuations on the antiferromagnetic (AF) interactions between spins on the checkerboard lattice. The replica framework is adopted within a cluster mean-field approach, resulting in an effective single-cluster model. This effective model is treated within a one-step replica symmetry breaking (RSB) approach with exact evaluations for all intracluster interactions. Competing interactions are introduced by tuning the ratio J2/J1 (where J1 and J2 are first-neighbor and second-neighbor interactions, respectively), which can lead to a highly frustrated scenario when J2/J1→1, where a phase transition between AF orders takes place in the absence of disorder. In particular, the AF order appears at lower values of J2/J1, with the Néel temperature decreasing as the frustration increases. However, quenched disorder changes this description, introducing a RSB spin-glass phase for strong enough disorder intensity J. In fact, for low levels of disorder, a RSB solution with staggered magnetization (mixed phase) emerges from the maximum frustration region. It suggests that, in the presence of weak quenched disorder, systems with competing interactions are prone to present a glassy behavior instead of conventional orders.© 2022 The AuthorsThis article presents a study of Single Photon Avalanche Diodes (SPAD) implemented in 28 nm Fully Depleted Silicon-On-Insulator (FD-SOI) CMOS technology based on transient TCAD simulations and Dark Count Rate (DCR) measurements. The integration of SPAD in this technology is currently being studied. This work allows for a better understanding of the mechanism behind the quite high DCR measured at relative low excess bias voltages with the initial FD-SOI SPAD design (≈500 Hz/µm2 at 5% excess bias voltage). In this study, a TCAD transient simulation methodology is introduced to better understand SPAD behavior during the avalanche process. TCAD simulations revealed that Shallow Trench Isolation (STI) structures within the active area have a negative effect on avalanche quenching, because of slower carrier evacuation with possible occurrence of secondary avalanches in series. Based on this analysis and on previous optimization works, we propose a new architecture of the FD-SOI SPAD combining several modifications to achieve a lower DCR (≈20 Hz/µm2 at 5% excess bias voltage measured with passive quenching).© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic hysteresis properties of ferromagnetic materials have been investigated by experimental measurement and theoretical analysis for mechanical property evaluation. A modified Jiles-Atherton (JA) model is proposed considering both the frequency and microscopic dependence of the hysteresis properties. Dynamic hysteresis experiments of ferromagnetic specimens with different hardness values were performed to measure the hysteresis loops. Microscopic measurements of the specimens were performed to obtain the grain size and dislocation density, which were introduced into the dynamic JA model to calculate the theoretical hysteresis loops. The genetic algorithm was used to inverse the basic parameters of the JA model by matching the theoretical hysteresis loops with the experimentally measured hysteresis loops. Two magnetic parameters (the coercivity and power-law coefficient) were extracted from the hysteresis loops for mechanical property evaluation of ferromagnetic materials. It was found that the proposed JA model can be used for theoretical analysis of the influence of the microstructure on the magnetic hysteresis properties, and the coercivity and power-law coefficient can be used for mechanical property evaluation of ferromagnetic specimens. The research reveals the influence of microstructure on the mechanical properties (hardness) and magnetic characteristic parameters of ferromagnetic materials.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.We investigated the physical properties of Ni81Fe19 thin films intended for use in inductors operating at high frequencies. With a variety of characterization techniques, we measured saturation magnetization, anisotropy field, resistivity, and complex permeability of sputtered films with thicknesses in the range of 16–910 nm. We correlated the physical properties of the films with their complex permeability. Our analysis indicates that films under 100 nm have the characteristics most suitable for use in inductor structures. Such films would exhibit high permeability, allow inductors to operate at high frequencies and, at the same time, minimize eddy current losses.© 2021This paper presents a novel Contactless Hybrid Static Magnetostrictive Force-Torque (CHSMFT) sensor using Galfenol. Initially, the sensor's design principles for measuring axial force and torque are outlined. The magneto-mechanical properties of the materials used, such as B-H curves and magnetic permeability, are determined and used in the finite element method when various mechanical preloads and magnetic fields are applied. The CHSMFT sensor is evaluated analytically using the equivalent circuit method and numerically using COMSOL Multiphysics® software based on the obtained experimental results. Afterward, the sensor is fabricated based on the results of the analytical and finite element method and experimentally validated for a range of electrical currents and excitation frequencies. The analytical and finite element method results are then compared to the experimental results. In force and torque measurements, sensitivity, precision, and linearity error are presented separately. Finally, the CHSMFT sensor's performance characteristics under optimal conditions are presented. Sensitivity is found to increase with rising electrical current (or magnetic field) and frequency. Maximum sensitivities are obtained at 0.7349 mV/kgf and 2.24 mV/Nm for axial load and torque measurements, respectively.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The control of perpendicular magnetic anisotropy(PMA) of complex oxides on the widely used SrTiO3 (STO) or STO buffered silicon substrates is of technology importance in the development of integrated multifunctional oxide spintronic devices. Perovskite manganite shows great potential as magnetic layer due to its rich physical properites and spin polarized character. However, when it is directly grown on the STO or STO buffered silicon substrates, the magnetization vector lies in the in-plane direction of the film, hindering its applications such as integrated spin orbital torque devices. In this work, we manipulate the PMA of the La0.67Sr0.33MO3 (LSMO) film by regulating its lattice deformation via CaTiO3 (CTO) spacer layer on the platform of STO. High crystal quality of the heterostructures with atomic sharp interfaces and elongation of LSMO lattice along c-axis were characterized. The vibration sample magnetometer (VSM) measurement indicates that the magnetic anisotropy of LMSO can be effectively tuned from in-plane to out-of-plane by inserting CTO between STO and LSMO. The improvement of PMA in LSMO films is also dependent on the thickness of the CTO spacer layer. Furthermore, the M-T curves imply that there are different magnetic phases in the LSMO films, including the appearance of antiferromagnetic phase. The analysis by electron energy loss spectroscopy (EELS) in scanning transmission electron microscopy mode found that the valence state of Mn near the CTO/LSMO interface is lower than the LSMO bulk phase, which could explained by a polar catastrophe model. This work provides a promising avenue to tailoring PMA of perovskite manganite and paves the way to realize integrated oxide spintronic devices on STO and STO buffered silicon platform.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the chemical pressure effects on the ferromagnetic ordering in magnetic semiconductor (La0.9Ca0.1)(Zn0.9Mn0.1)AsO by isovalent substitutions of Sb for As and Y for La, respectively. X-ray diffraction measurements indicate that Sb substitution for As expands the lattice and introduces negative chemical pressure into the system. On the other hand, Y substitution for La reduces the unit-cell volume, and improves the Curie temperature by ∼30% at the doping level of 7.5%.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Alloys-based materials have now become advanced from conventional alloys to multi-principal elements and open new areas of applications. High Entropy Alloys are drawn considerable attention because of their unique properties, which can be tuned based on the requirements. High entropy materials have extraordinary mechanical properties, corrosion resistance, thermal stability, and other promising functional properties, which makes them to be used as a catalysis for water splitting, electrodes in batteries for charge storage in supercapacitor and as a hydrogen storage material. Thus the high entropy alloy now becomes an emerging advanced material. Moreover, in the last six years, several research articles appeared which described the excellent magnetic properties of high entropy alloys. More than four principal elements help to tune the magnetic properties along with other properties like mechanical, corrosion, etc., which are required for industrial applications of magnetic materials. The magnetic properties of HEAs are highly dependent on the phase structure, microstructure, synthesis route, processing parameter, and alloying elements. This review article summarized the different features of high entropy alloys, core effects, synthesis methods, and state-of-the-art magnetic properties of the High Entropy alloys. A separate section is also devoted to the magnetic properties of high entropy oxide. Also, this review is underlying different principles that have importance on the future development of magnetic HEAsfor industrial applications.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.We pay particular interest to the dynamics of solitary wave in magnetic insulators, while taking into account inhomogeneous exchange and damping effects simultaneously. We carry out our investigations in the windings of the work previously carried out by the authors (Tchidjo et al., 2019). We first of all derive a new solution of the system of our interest by direct calculus. Since in the previous analysis, the amplitude of the wave were fixed so that influence of the inhomogeneous term was acting principally on the width of the wave, we here proceed to different analysis, which consist in bringing more information on the contribution of the inhomogeneous term on the dynamics of waves in ferrites. We show that, while considering the full impact of the inhomogeneous term acting on the amplitude of the wave and on the phase simultaneously, one understands that there are two types of inhomogeneities that can be recognized by their effects. The first has as effect to increase the amplitude of the wave and in the same time reduce its width, while for the other type of inhomogeneity, the reverse process is observed. We provide analytical expression of the energy of the system under current interest and, as a result, it appears clearly that in both cases, energy density of the system is fully conserved. Therefore, we show that the only term that is responsible of slowing down the energy during the motion of magnetic wave is just the damping parameter.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Heusler based materials have been identified as a potential candidate for their wide range of applications. Most of the Heusler based material's properties can be scaled by their valence electron count (VEC). Herein, we have synthesized Ni-doped FeNbSb half-Heusler materials by solid-state reaction route to study its magnetic properties. The XRD and microscopic study show the half- Heusler (HH) single phase for Fe1-xNixNbSb (x = 0.025 and 0.05) compositions. Experimental results well corroborated the theoretically estimated magnetic moment by the Slater-Pauling rule. The XRD simulation shows atomic disorder due to swapping of nearly 50% Fe at the Nb site, which reduces the magnetic moment value accordingly. The controlled Ni-doping in the FeNbSb matrix revealed a weak magnetic moment that was not seemed to be saturated even at a high magnetic field. That directly supports the compositions to be hard magnetic materials. Moreover, for both sample's, magnetization vs. temperature graph shows a competitive behavior between the Ferro-antiferro phase in the 5 K to 300 K temperature range associated with swapping of Fe at Nb site as well as Ni substitution.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Alternating current field measurement (ACFM) is one of the most important techniques for detecting metal cracks. During measurement, however, the changes in lift-off distance caused by coating corrosion and irregularity of the surface greatly affect the accuracy of crack sizing. To overcome this drawback, an advanced algorithm is proposed in this paper to compensate for the lift-off effect. Benefitting from this method, the dimensions of cracks can be inversed directly without considering the lift-off distance. More importantly, the algorithm has been verified efficiently as estimating the cracks of an aluminum workpiece. The results show that the sizing errors based on this algorithm can be limited to 10%.© 2022 Elsevier LtdA2RAM devices are fabricated using an adaptation of Si-nanowire process flow, including a Si-SiGe heterostructure. We present the effects of gate length, film thickness, bridge implantation conditions and the presence of LDD impacts on A2RAM memory performance. Despite the accidentally undoped polysilicon gate, we succeed in demonstrating 1T-DRAM programming and operation.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Performance evaluation was conducted for hyperthermia and positive/negative contrast agents incorporating in-vivo angiography studies in Albino Wister rats using folate-chitosan (FC) coated cobalt ferrite (CF) nanoparticles. The structural characterizations were done using X-ray diffraction (XRD), Fourier transform infrared (FTIR), Raman and Mössbauer spectroscopy. The average particle size of CF nanoparticles was found to be 8 nm in transmission electron microscopy (TEM) images. The lattice fringe in the High-resolution transmission electron microscopy (HRTEM) and discrete circular ring in the selected area electron diffraction (SEAD) pattern confirmed the high degree of crystallinity with single phase inverse spinel structure of CF nanoparticles. The TEM images of folate chitosan coated cobalt ferrite (FCCF) demonstrated that the particles were highly dispersed. Electron energy loss spectroscopy (EELS) revealed no impurity phases and thermal analysis showed two transition temperatures around 284 °C and 614 °C, indicating the burning of folate and chitosan groups. The value of hydrodynamic diameter, polydispersity index (PDI), and zeta potential of FCCF nanoparticles were satisfactory at lower concentration (0.5 mg/ml, 1 mg/ml, 2 mg/ml). The self-heating properties of FCCF revealed that the temperature increases with the increase of concentration while specific loss power (SLP) decreases. The cytotoxic effect of FCCF in HeLa cell line confirmed the survival of HeLa cells up to 80–85% for the lower concentration. Magnetic Resonance Imaging (MRI) investigation on phantom using fast spin-echo (FSE) sequence revealed fast-relaxation of 0.02 s for 0.125 mg/ml concentration. Magnetic resonance angiography (MRA) conducted on Albino Wister rats presented higher efficacy of contrast agent for FCCF administered rats than the non-administered rats.© 2022 The Author(s)This paper presents an in-depth DC characterization of a 22 nm FDSOI CMOS technology down to deep cryogenic temperature, i.e., 2.95 K. The impact of the back-gate voltage (Vback) on device performance, i.e., threshold voltage (VT) and carrier transport, is investigated over a wide temperature range. Moreover, semiclassical and quantum transports of two-dimensional carrier gas are investigated. The effective mobility (μeff) extracted from short devices at cryogenic temperatures is lower than actual mobility due to the presence of ballistic transport. The discontinuous ID–VG is found in both long and extremely short transistors, which is ascribed to the intersubband transition happening during the scattering event. Oscillatory ID–VG due to resonant tunneling manifests itself in short devices at cryogenic temperatures and depends on Vback. On the other hand, the worse subthreshold swing is found for short devices in the saturation regime and at cryogenic temperatures due to source-to-drain tunneling.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.This paper investigates the effect of antimony on the microstructure, texture, and magnetic properties of a 1.2 wt% Si steel sheet produced by asymmetric cold rolling. First, the specimens were cast with three different antimony percentages, and after homogenization and hot rolling, they were subjected to an intermediate annealing treatment at 1150 °C for 30 min. The sheet thickness was then reduced to 1 mm using an asymmetric cold rolling process with 80% thickness reduction and finally, the final annealing treatment was performed at 1000 °C for 3 min. The results indicated that increasing antimony improved the texture parameter by increasing the intensity of the θ-fiber. Antimony also accelerated the formation and density of shear bands. Additionally, Cube components nucleated predominantly in shear bands, enhancing the desired texture in the microstructure. Texture evolution affected the magnetic properties of the specimens such that the sample containing 0.026 wt% Sb exhibiting the lowest coercivity and remanence compared to the sample devoid of antimony. It seems that asymmetric rolling has a good interaction with antimony to improve the magnetic properties of low silicon steels.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The strength and dynamics of magnetoelastic coupling through the paramagnetic (PM) – antiferromagnetic (AFM) – ferrimagnetic (FIM) transitions in multiferroic hexagonal ErMnO3 have been investigated by Resonant Ultrasound Spectroscopy. Elastic stiffening by up to 2% below the PM – AFM transition at 80 K arises from biquadratic coupling between strain and the magnetic order parameter with relaxation times longer than ∼ 10-6 s for the response of spins to changes in strain. In contrast with YMnO3, the PM – AFM transition in ErMnO3 is accompanied by a peak in acoustic loss immediately below the Néel point which is interpreted in terms of strain relaxation accompanying ordering of spins of Er3+ at 4b sites. Changes in the magnetic ordering scheme at the AFM – FIM transition near 3 K are accompanied by elastic softening of ∼ 0.03 %. During poling of the low temperature ferrimagnetic structure round magnetic hysteresis loops, small changes in elastic stiffness which arise due to the contribution of piezomagnetic and/or piezoelectric moduli are detected. Contributions of piezoelectric moduli to acoustic resonance frequencies also permit changes in the configuration of ferroelectric domains to be detected in response both to cycling through this transition and to application of a magnetic field. A peak in acoustic loss in the vicinity of 250 K is attributed to strain-mediated pinning/freezing of some aspect of the domain microstructure with an activation energy of ∼ 0.25–0.3 eV. A return to the original elastic properties on heating to temperatures above ∼ 250 K is interpreted in terms of backswitching of domains to the configuration they had at the start. These observations confirm the existence of subtle variations in magnetoelastic coupling behaviour relating to both the magnetic order parameters and magnetic domain structures.© 2022The Ba2Co2Fe12O22 (Co2Y) ferrites were prepared via the sol–gel method, and the dielectric and magnetic properties were tuned by changing sintering temperature (Ta). It can be noted that the nature resonance frequency of Co2Y decreases form 10.2 GHz to 1.9 GHz with increasing sintering temperature, and the resonance peaks ascribed to exchange coupling between Fe2+ ions and Fe3+ ions appear in 13–17 GHz. Due to the synergy of Fe2+ ions and oxygen vacancies, the real part of complex permittivity (ε′) of Co2Y ferrites decreases firstly, and then increases with increasing sintering temperature. The excellent microwave absorption properties are obtained at Ta = 1100 °C, its effective absorption bandwidth (EAB) reaches 7.3 GHz at a thickness of only 1.4 mm. The outstanding properties are mainly ascribed to a combination of multiple reflections, dipole polarization, natural resonance, exchange resonance and good impedance matching. Our research provides an efficient approach for obtaining the thin and broadband microwave absorbers by adjusting the sintering temperature of Co2Y ferrites.© 2022 Elsevier LtdWe have developed a multi-valley Monte Carlo simulator to study uniform electric field as well as quasi-ballistic transport in two-dimensional semiconductors, here applied to the case of MoS2. At low electric field, the Monte Carlo results are in excellent agreement with a numerical solution of the linearized Boltzmann Transport Equation. The solver allows us to explore high field transport and to analyze the influence of different scattering mechanisms on the electron saturation velocity. In MoS2, scattering mechanisms such as neutral defects and Coulomb centers strongly affect the mobility, but their effect on the saturation velocity is only modest. Scattering with surface optical phonons, instead, has a significant influence on the saturation velocity, which we discuss based on the energy and momentum distributions of carriers provided by the Monte Carlo solver. Self-consistent simulations of a FET with 100 nm gate length point out the relevance of different scattering mechanisms and the presence or not of velocity saturation in the transistor channel.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In this study, the Sm2Fe17 powder was subjected to nitridation at 743 K under N2 pressures of 0.05 and 0.1 MPa to investigate the growth kinetics of Sm–Fe–N. Two-phase growth of the fully nitride (FN) Sm2Fe17N3 phase and the nitrogen-poor (NP) Sm2Fe17Nx phase (0 < x < 3; x denotes the nitrogen content) was observed using 57Fe Mössbauer spectroscopy. Although the x value was greater at 0.05 MPa than at 0.1 MPa in the early stage of nitridation, the opposite trend was observed in the later stage. At a nitrogenation time of 24 h, nitridation was nearly complete at 0.1 MPa, while x tended to saturate and did not reach 3 at 0.05 MPa. The nitridation process was discussed based on two simultaneous growth processes: (i) the diffusion of the nitrogen atom in the NP phase and (ii) the nucleation and growth of the FN phase. A process combining N2 pressure and nitrogenation, which facilitated nitrogenation under low N2 pressure and high N2 pressure at the beginning and end of the nitridation process, respectively, achieved faster nitridation than process with a single N2 pressure.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.We report a comprehensive study on the correlations of structural, magnetic, and electronic properties of Y substituted double perovskite La2-xYxCoMnO6 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.3) compounds. The Rietveld refined X-ray diffraction patterns reveal that all synthesized compounds crystallize in monoclinic structure with the P21/n space group. Raman spectra affirm the presence of well-defined bands, assigned to the double perovskite structure. The temperature dependence of electrical resistivity indicates the semiconducting nature of the compounds without any transition and is effectively probed by Variable range hopping model. The application of a magnetic field suppresses the resistivity to exhibit significant low-temperature magnetoresistance. The paramagnetic to ferromagnetic transition temperature (Tc) decreased but saturation/remnant magnetization increased with increasing Y doping. The effective magnetic moments determined by the Curie-Weiss law show a decrease in the Y concentration. The substitution of iso-valent Y at the La site induces structural compression which is strongly correlated to the enhancement of effective magnetization values.© 2022 The AuthorsThe writing process in spin transfer torque magnetoresistive random access memories (STT-MRAM) is facilitated by elevated temperatures. In this work we investigate the temperature distribution and development in the free layer (FL) of an STT-MRAM during switching. With our fully three-dimensional (3D) finite element method simulation approach, we numerically solve the heat transport equation coupled to the electron, spin, and magnetization dynamics and demonstrate that the FL temperature is highly inhomogeneous due to the non-uniform magnetization of the FL during switching for an STT-MRAM with large magnetic tunnel junction (MTJ) diameter. While the average temperature in the FL can be obtained based on an average current density and an averaged potential drop across the tunnel barrier, a fully 3D model is required to evaluate the large local temperature variations. The temperature variations in the FL further increase, when realistic device structures with an MTJ coated by a passivation layer and contacted to broad electrodes are considered. Lowering the FL thermal conductivity increases the temperature variations even further. However, the variations are strongly reduced with the decrease of the MTJ diameter.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Ni-Mn-Sn ferromagnetic shape memory alloys (FSMAs) have recently attracted attention due to their magnetic field-induced reverse martensitic transformation. However, the low and narrow operating temperature range greatly hinders their application, which is challenging to be solved. Here, a novel concept is introduced and demonstrated to increase and dynamically tune the operating temperatures in Ni-Co-Mn-Sn FSMAs via pressure. This work presents a systematic study of the martensitic transformation and magnetic properties in Ni-Co-Mn-Sn FSMAs under the field of hydrostatic pressure by the first principle calculations. Applying pressure allows a dynamically tunable wide operating temperature range in Ni14Co2Mn13Sn3 alloy and Ni13Co3Mn13Sn3 alloy, which results from the improvement of the stability of the martensite. Notably, the operating temperatures of Ni14Co2Mn13Sn3 alloy can be improved from 198 K to a high temperature of 262 K within 3 GPa. The pressure has a weak effect on the martensitic transformation sequence of Ni14Co2Mn13Sn3 (PA-FA-4O-NM) and Ni14Co2Mn13Sn3 (PA-FA-NM). Meanwhile, the pressure can maintain a large magnetization difference (ΔM), which benefits the functional performance in FSMAs. Moreover, in terms of the magnetic properties and the martensitic transformation, the effects of pressure on them are discussed by electronic structure, respectively.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Dy2Ti2O7 and Ho2Ti2O7 are the well-known spin ice systems where the replacement of Ti with Zr destabilizes the pyrochlore lattice and leads to the dynamic ground state. We have studied a series of disordered pyrochlore oxides A2Zr2O7 (A = Eu, Gd, Er) and compared their crystal structure, magnetic, and heat capacity behavior with that of Dy2Zr2O7 and Ho2Zr2O7 systems. The analysis of the dc susceptibility curves suggests these systems as a frustrated antiferromagnet with negative Curie–Weiss temperature. Eu2Zr2O7 exhibited a temperature-independent dc susceptibility in the range T = 20–90 K, which persist even at high fields due to the Van Vleck contribution. Gd2Zr2O7 and Er2Zr2O7 shows an unusual field-induced spin freezing anomaly near T ≈ 10 K which is similar to (Dy/Ho)2Zr2O7 systems. These studies show that depending on the disorder parameter, the spin-freezing behavior can be induced by slowing down the spin dynamic with a suitable choice of the magnetic field. We observed that, unlike titanates, modification at the rare-earth site does not make a considerable change in the magnetic ground state of these Dy, Ho, Er, Gd based zirconates compounds.© 2022 Elsevier LtdAn investigation about the temperature dependence of the source access resistance (RGS) has been focused on the two prepared AlGaN/AlN/GaN heterostructure field-effect transistors (HFETs) with different ratios of gate-source distance (LGS) to gate-drain distance (LGD). It is found that the different ratio of LGS to LGD can lead to a difference in the interaction between the negative additional polarization charge density nearby the gate region (ΔσNG) and the positive additional polarization charge density under the gate (ΔσUG) at each testing temperature, which influence the strength of polarization Coulomb field (PCF) scattering, resulting in the difference in RGS. Furthermore, the influence of the ratio of LGS to LGD on ΔσNG is verified by this study. These results show that it is an optional method to promote the high-temperature performances of AlGaN/AlN/GaN HFETs based on PCF scattering through adopting the appropriate ratio of LGS to LGD.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Direct measurements of the magnetocaloric effect in La0.7Ca0.3MnO3, La1−xAgyMnO3, and Sm1−xSrxMnO3 manganites in alternating magnetic fields at frequencies up to 20 Hz and an amplitude of 6.2 kOe are carried out. A decrease of the MCE with the field frequency reaching 20%, 55% and 70% in La0.7Ca0.3MnO3, Sm1−xSrxMnO3 and La1−xAgyMnO3 is discovered in all studied manganites. The value estimates of the cooling power depending on the frequency of the alternating magnetic field are carried out. The largest value among the studied materials is achieved for La0.7Ca0.3MnO3 manganite, which is the most promising to be used in magnetic refrigeration technology. The data are compared with those for Gd in the same conditions.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic and anomalous transport properties have been studied for the as-melted and annealed half-metallic ferromagnet CoFeTiSn. First-principles calculations suggest that CoFeTiSn presents band structure of the near spin-gapless semiconductor. The experiments show that the alloy's phase purity, chemical ordering and grain size have been improved by annealing, which causes a different transport property. The as-melted sample shows a temperature coefficient of resistivity sign transition from positive to negative accompanying the ferromagnetic–paramagnetic transition, while the annealed sample only shows negative temperature coefficient resistivity in the whole temperature range. The calculated positive ordinary Hall coefficient suggest that transport properties are dominated by the hole carrier. The measured saturation magnetic moment at 5 K is lower but close to 1 μB/f.u, which is probably attributed to the inhomogeneous magnetic phase and the anti-site disorder between Co-Fe. The band structure of near spin-gapless semiconductor is another possible reason. The anomalous Hall conductivity changes from 20 S/cm to 27 S/cm after annealing due to the altered chemical ordering. The positive linear magnetoresistance indicates that the alloy appears to have spin-gapless semiconductor like behavior as predicted by its band structure.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Upon their original discovery, antiferromagnets were considered interesting magnetic materials, but without much practical relevance. This sentiment changed upon the development of spintronics, where the electrons’ spin degree of freedom is utilized for new functionality in electronic devices. In this context antiferromagnets first found application as passive elements, where their insensitivity to applied magnetic fields allowed them to provide reference magnetic orientations via the exchange-bias effect. More recently it has been recognized that antiferromagnets can play a more active role in spintronics; namely they can generate, support, and manipulate spin currents. In fact, the magnetic structure of antiferromagnets may play a profound role in spin-transport phenomena, giving rise to new transport phenomena. We will briefly review both the passive and active roles that antiferromagnets may play for spintronics and provide a perspective for future opportunities.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In the case of absorption of microwave energy, the overall interaction is represented by impedance matching between the material and the microwave (Zin = Zo) through the resonant frequency mechanism. While the resonant frequency is influenced by the anisotropy field of the material. This research investigated the effect of Zn-dopant on the anisotropy constant and reflection loss of the Ba0.6Sr0.4Fe10-xZnxMnTiO19 (x = 0.1, 0.3, and 0.5). Hexaferrite samples Ba0.6Sr0.4Fe10-xZnxMnTiO19 with × = 0.1, 0.3, and 0.5 have been successfully prepared using high energy milling and by sintering at 1000 °C. Characterization using XRD resulted that all samples being in phase with the hexagonal crystalline structure (P63/mmc). The average crystal size of the three samples is about 44 nm. The shape and size of the surface particles obtained from characterization using scanning electron microscopy are still heterogeneous with particle sizes ranging from 150 to 300 nm. The vibrating sample magnetometer used for magnetization characterization shows that increasing the value of × increases the magnetic saturation value, hence decreasing the anisotropic magnetic field. A vector network analyzer is used to characterize the ability to absorb microwaves, which reveals that the greater the × value, the better the absorbing microwaves. With a bandwidth of 3.6 GHz, the maximum value of reflection loss (RL) recorded for × = 0.5 is – 34.7 dB. It was concluded that the addition of Zn2+ dopant ions into the hexaferrite structure of Ba0.6Sr0.4Fe10-xZnxMnTiO19 can reduce the anisotropy field and increase the reflection loss value, so it is hoped that this composition can be a potential candidate as a microwave absorbent material.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.A polycrystalline 57Fe-isotope-enriched sample of UFe0.40Ge2 was investigated by X-ray powder diffraction, magnetization and Mössbauer spectra measurements. The compound was confirmed to crystallize with the orthorhombic CeNiSi2-type structure (space group Cmcm) and with the lattice parameters a = 4.0759(2) Å, b = 15.8107(7) Å, and c = 4.0379(2) Å, being close to those reported previously for a very similar composition. Magnetic properties measurements showed that UFe0.40Ge2 orders ferromagnetically at TC = 37 K with the effective magnetic moment of 2.57(3) μB and the ordered magnetic moment at 70 kOe of about 0.64(1) μB, being fully consistent with the earlier report on physical properties of UFe0.39Ge2. 57Fe Mössbauer spectra measurements performed both in the field-cooled and zero-field-cooled regimes ruled out the formation of ferromagnetic cluster-glass or spin-glass state, and confirmed that the ferromagnetism in the studied system is purely long-range in nature. A small contribution of about 0.24–0.36 μB to the total magnetic moment from the iron atoms was observed.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.We theoretically report an instability toward a skyrmion crystal in centrosymmetric magnets under hexagonal and trigonal single-ion anisotropy. The results are obtained for a minimal spin model with a crystal-dependent single-ion anisotropy on a triangular lattice by performing simulated annealing. By constructing magnetic phase diagrams in the presence of six different types of single-ion anisotropy while changing the amplitudes of external magnetic field and single-ion anisotropy in a systematic way, we find that the hexagonal and trigonal single-ion anisotropy becomes a source of the skyrmion crystal depending on the magnetic-field direction. We show that the skyrmion crystal is stabilized by the uniaxial-type or trigonal-type single-ion anisotropy under the out-of-plane magnetic field, while it is stabilized by the hexagonal-type inplane single-ion anisotropy under the inplane magnetic field. We also find various multiple-Q spin states depending on the types of the single-ion anisotropy.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Recent advances in experimental techniques have made it possible to manipulate and measure the magnetization dynamics on the femtosecond time scale which is the same order as the correlation time of the bath degrees of freedom. In the equations of motion of magnetization, the correlation of the bath is represented by the non-Markovian damping. For development of the science and technologies based on the ultrafast magnetization dynamics it is important to understand how the magnetization dynamics depend on the correlation time. It is also important to determine the correlation time experimentally. Here we study the precession dynamics of a small magnet with the non-Markovian damping. Extending the theoretical analysis of Miyazaki and Seki (1998) we obtain analytical expressions of the precession angular velocity and the effective damping constant for any values of the correlation time under assumption of small Gilbert damping constant. We also propose a possible experiment for determination of the correlation time.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In this work, high throughput DFT calculations are performed on the alkali metal-based half Heusler alloys; LiYpY1−p′S (Y, Y′ = V, Cr, Mn, Fe, Co, Ni and p = 0, 0.25, 0.5, 0.75, 1). Starting with 243 structural replica, systematic filters are designed to select the energetically and vibrationally favorable compositions by considering the contributions stemming from the magnetic alignments of the ions. Thereby, 26 dynamically stable magnetic compositions are identified, of which 10 are found to be ferromagnetic (FM), 4 antiferromagnetic (AFM) and 12 ferrimagnetic (FiM). 4 FM and 8 FiM ones are found to show 100 % spin polarization. Further, tetragonal distortion is found to be present in 4 FM, 3 FiM and 4 AFM compositions, which indicates the possibility of easy-axis magnetocrystalline anisotropy. The ferromagnetic LiFe0.5Mn0.5S and antiferromagnetic LiFeS are found to have the most prominent easy-axis magnetocrystalline anisotropy.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In a bilayer of ferromagnetic and non-magnetic metal, spin pumping can be generated by a thermal gradient. The spin current generation depends on the spin mixing conductance of the interface and the magnetic properties of the ferromagnetic layer. Due to its low intrinsic damping, rare earth iron garnet is often used for the ferromagnetic layer in the spin Seebeck experiment. However, it is actually a ferrimagnetic with antiferromagnetically coupled magnetic lattices and the contribution of rare earth magnetic lattice of rare earth iron garnet on thermal spin pumping is not well understand. Here we focus on the effect of magnetic properties of lanthanide and show that the orbital angular momentum of rare earth iron garnet enhances thermal spin current generation of lanthanide substituted yttrium iron garnet.© 2022 Elsevier LtdThis paper presents an analytical model for amorphous In-Ga-Zn-O thin film transistors based on device physics. The proposed model comprises physical parameters including subgap density-of-states (DOS) and is useful for fabrication process optimization. In addition to delocalized free band states, the model accounts for deep and tail trap states and is valid for complete region of operation. Physical parameters are extracted by employing least square (LSQ) curve-fit function and the model is validated by comparing model outcome with measured characteristics of the device. The proposed model is able to predict the I-V characteristics of the long channel devices to good accuracy. Further, this model is enhanced to predict the behavior of the short channel devices by taking contact voltage drop into account. The model accurately reproduces the measured response of long and short channel oxide TFTs with channel length ranging from 20 μm down to 2 μm with channel width fixed to 20 μm. The average error between measured data and model outcome is found to be < 3 %. The proposed model is useful to design oxide TFT based circuits with different channel lengths using a single set of physical parameters through circuit simulator.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.We theoretically analyze the probability of electromagnetic wave emission due to electron transitions between spin subbands in a ferromagnet. Different mechanisms of such spin-flip transitions are considered. One mechanism is electron transitions caused by the magnetic field of the wave. Another mechanism is due to the Rashba spin–orbit interaction. While the two mentioned mechanisms contribute in a homogeneously magnetized ferromagnet, there are two other mechanisms that occur for a non-collinearly magnetized medium. The first mechanism is known and is due to the dependence of the exchange interaction constant on the quasimomentum of the conduction electrons. The second one is due to the minimal coupling. It follows from the connection of spin and spatial degrees of freedom in any non-collinearly magnetized medium. We study these mechanisms in a non-collinear ferromagnet with a helicoidal magnetization distribution. Estimations of the probabilities of electron transitions due to different mechanisms are made for realistic parameters, and we compare the mechanisms. We also estimate the radiation power and the threshold current in a simple model in which spin is injected into the ferromagnet by a spin-polarized electric current through a tunnel barrier.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The present work investigates the structure, soft-magnetic and core-loss properties of 25 mm wide Fe83Si2B9P4Nb1Cu1 nanocrystalline ribbons. The melt-spun precursor ribbons of the thickness of 22 and 28 µm were prepared using commercial raw materials under ambient atmosphere. The XRD and DSC results show predominantly amorphous and hetero-amorphous structure for 22 and 28 µm ribbons in the as-quenched state. Further, the partial crystallization annealing leads to thickness dependent nanocrystallization process, wherein the thinner 22 µm ribbon shows sluggish primary(α-Fe(Si)) and delayed secondary(Fe3(B0.8P0.2)) crystallization process compared to 28 µm ribbons. The difference is explained through as-quenched precursor matrix structure and selective solute re-distribution of the intergranular region during nanocrystallization. Moreover, the higher crystallite size (D) and volume fraction(Vcr) of α-Fe(Si) nanocrystallites are observed for the 28 µm ribbon in the optimal annealing window. Under optimal annealing conditions, the 28 µm nanocrystalline ribbon (733 K) shows better AC soft-magnetic properties including B800 of 1.62 T, Hc of 15.7 A/m, Br/Bs ratio ≥ 0.8 compared to B800 of 1.59 T, Hc of 17 A/m and Br/Bs ratio ≥ 0.7 of 22 µm (743 K) ribbon. The 28 µm ribbon shows a low core loss (P) of 0.34 W/kg under 50 Hz, 1.5 T compared to P > 0.65 W/kg for 22 µm ribbons. The lower core-loss behaviour of thicker 28 µm in the sub-kHz frequency regime has been explained based on the nanocrystalline microstructure and loss coefficients (hysteresis and eddy current). The work compares the AC core-loss properties with reported Fe-rich nanocrystalline alloys and also discusses the scope of improving B800 beyond 1.65 T for the present alloys.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The paper presents two issues: a new method of generating a rotating magnetic field of high frequency and describes the influence of the rotating magnetic field high frequency on energy losses in a magnetic fluid. This new generation method uses a closed magnetic circuit with ferrite elements. It is powered by two high-frequency power amplifiers through transformers with ferrite cores. As a result, it is relatively easy to obtain high amplitude values ​​of the rotating magnetic field intensity. The article describes the results of the operation of rotating magnetic fields in the frequency range from 38 kHz to 370 kHz, with an amplitude of intensity up to 16 kA·m−1 on energy losses in a magnetic fluid. The obtained results indicate that at a constant frequency f the values ​​of the temperature rate increase dT/dt are proportional to the square of intensity of magnetic field ∝H2. Likewise, the values ​​of the rate of temperature increase dT/dt measured with the constant intensity of the rotating magnetic field H are proportional to the square of frequency ∝f2. It was found that in the area of ​​the low magnetic field intensity, energy losses resulting from magnetic relaxation prevail, which decrease with the increase of the field strength H, and then the share of losses due to magnetic hysteresis increases. A comparison of the calorimetric effect in a rotating and alternating magnetic field shows that the rotating field releases 75% more heat energy than the alternating field.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Searching for two-dimensional (2D) materials with strong out-of-plane magnetic anisotropy is fatal features to 2D ferromagnets with high Curie temperature. In a recent experimental work (Zhao et al. (2020)), the samples they reported seems to meet the basic requirements for inducing large magnetic anisotropy. Based on density functional theory calculations, a large out-of-plane spin anisotropy, magnetic anisotropic energy (MAE) 97meV per supercell, has been observed in the as-synthesized 2H-TaS2 bilayer. Owing to the self-intercalation of Ta atoms who see a crystal field with low symmetry, orbital motions of 5d electrons in these Ta atoms are restored, leading to large spin–orbital coupling (SOC) and a large out-of-plane spin anisotropy. Based on the calculated energy difference between states with different magnetic orders, a rather high Curie temperature for the Ta intercalated 2H-TaS2 is also estimated at nearly 865K. Our study not only demonstrates the effectiveness of such preparation strategies on enhance the strong magnetic anisotropy and Curie temperature of 2H-TaS2 bilayer, but also deepen our understanding on the magnetic anisotropy induced by intrinsic SOC of 2D materials.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.High coercivity SmCo5 was used as hard phase and SmCo5/FeCo dual-phase nanocomposite powders had been successfully fabricated by chemical coating high magnetization FeCo soft phase on the surface of hard phase. The effect of different addition amounts of FeCo on the microstructure and magnetic properties of the composites was systematically investigated. Optimal magnetic properties, including magnetic energy product (25.7 MGOe), saturation magnetization (102 emu/g), remanence (97 emu/g) and high coercivity (16.9 kOe) were simultaneously obtained when the nominal addition of 10 wt% FeCo soft magnetic phase was coated. Polyvinylpyrrolidone (PVP) was used as surfactant, which guaranty both Fe and Co atoms were coated. The good performance is ascribed to nano-sized below 15 nm and well-distributed of soft phase and small grain size of hard phase.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) in biomedical applications can affect surrounding biomacromolecules mechanically, thermally, or both depending on amplitude and frequency of external alternating magnetic field (MF). Nano-magnetomechanical approach utilizes rotational oscillations of MNPs activated by non-heating low-frequency MF to affect bioactive macromolecules mechanically. In present paper, we analyze parameters and conditions that allow MNP's mechanical rotation and provide maximal mechanical forces applied to macromolecular structures such as bioactive molecules, addressed drug delivery nanocarriers or cells by alternating MF activated MNPs. Here, we formulate criteria for choice of various MNP-MF system parameters in regard to nano-magnetomechanical approach such as optimal ranges of MNP and associated macromolecules characteristics, MF frequency and induction enabling maximum nanomechanical effects. Theoretically obtained results are crucial for biomedical applications utilizing nanomechanical stimulation of biological targets by means of MNPs activated by alternating MF.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The novel study of Cd-Zn co-doped Magnesium ferrites CdxZn1-xMg0.25Fe1.75O4 (where x = 0, 0.25, 0.75, 0.50, and 1.00) has been made successfully by adopting a facile sol-gel extended hydrothermal pathway. Structural, optical, and magnetic behavior of the Cd-Zn co-doped Magnesium ferrites were systematically analyzed. From the X-ray Diffraction (XRD) patterns it was confirmed that the prepared samples have a cubic spinel structure. Scanning electron microscopic (SEM) study revealed the agglomerated and irregular shape of Cd-Zn co-doped Magnesium ferrites nanoparticles. Fourier transforms infrared (FTIR) spectroscopy has been studied for the confirmation of the presence of (M-O) bonding in the synthesized samples. Furthermore, the synthesized samples showed two frequency bands related to phonon vibrational stretching in both octahedral and tetrahedral lattice positions. The PL spectrum revealed the strong emission peaks in the ultraviolet to the visible region of all the synthesized samples. Raman spectroscopy showed the formation of four active modes due to the cubic spinel structure of all samples. Finally, the magnetic characteristics are calculated by using a vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) showing ferrimagnetic and soft magnetic behavior of all the Magnesium ferrite samples. As the Cd and Zn co-doping in Mg ferrites was increased, the Hc was decreased. The magnetic studies revealed that the maximum Hc of 576 Oe and maximum saturation magnetization (Ms) appeared for the sample Cd0.50Zn0.50Mg0.25Fe1.75O4, carrying Cd/Zn in 50/50 ratio. It is envisaged that the novel preparation of Cd-Zn co-doped Magnesium ferrite would be suitable for several applications, for example, magnetic recording devices, actuators, high-density data storage devices sensors, and biomedical equipments.© 2022 Elsevier LtdA unified 2-D continuous potential model for cylindrical nanowire junctionless accumulation mode (JAM) MOSFET and conventional inversion mode (IM) MOSFET has been presented in this manuscript. The 2-D Poisson's equation in cylindrical coordinates is solved analytically with the help of the superposition principle and evanescent mode analysis of the Fourier-Bessel series is performed. Both free and depletion charges are considered in the 2-D Poisson's equation. The model thus derived is continuous across different operation regimes (depletion and accumulation/inversion) with respect to VGS. Further, a threshold voltage model is also derived from the potential model and an expression of drain-induced barrier lowering (DIBL) is formulated. The short channel drain current model is derived from the potential-based charge model and quasi-ballistic transport velocity model. Furthermore, models for transconductance (gm) and output conductance (gd) is also formulated from the drain current model. A 3-D TCAD tool from CogendaTM has been used to numerically verify our proposed unified analytical model.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Herein, the origin of flexomagnetic effect in Pb[(Zr0.52Ti0.48)0.60(Fe0.67W0.33)0.40]O3]0.80-[CoFe2O4]0.20 (PZTFW–CFO) multiferroic composite is demonstrated. An external inhomogeneous strain on thick composite films significantly changes the crystal lattice constants and phonon wave numbers related to single-phase PZTFW and CFO ceramics. Surface morphology indicates that inhomogeneous strain modified the magnetic dipole moments that partly regain their original position after removing external inhomogeneous strain. The magnitude of magnetic susceptibility increased under inhomogeneous strain for a small probe of the magnetic field. The magnetic anisotropic energy (MAE) supports that under-applied inhomogeneous strain reduces surface spin disorders and is responsible for the enhancement of zero field cooled (ZFC) and field cooled (FC) magnetization. Under a high external magnetic field (>100 Oe), it would be hard to detect the weak flexomagnetic effects. This work provides a framework for the effect of macroscopic inhomogeneous strain gradient on magnetic moments in multiferroics composites suggesting its suitability for the sensors and actuators applications.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Room-temperature perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) is an essential property for devices based on spintronic technology, and is still a great challenge in transition-metal oxide conductors. In this work, we demonstrated the development of the high-quality NiCo2O4 (NCO) films onto MgAl2O4 (MAO) substrate by precise control over the growth parameters in the pulsed laser deposition process. The characteristics of strong out-of-plane magnetic easy axis, robust anomalous Hall effect, and smaller angle dependence of magnetoresistance in perpendicular direction are observed in metallic NCO films above 300 K. Thus, the obvious room-temperature PMA behavior is supported by these electric transport and magnetic results. This work is further expanded to investigate the valence state, spin and orbital magnetic moment of the NCO film. The Ni2+, Ni3+, Co2+, and Co3+ cations are existed in NCO film, and the orbital magnetic moment of Ni and Co are antiparallel with each other. As a result, the cation concentration ratio exhibits significant influence upon the magnetism and electric transport. The remarkable coexistence of room-temperature PMA and metallic transport is promising to the multi-function application in spintronics devices.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The exchange bias effect obtained after zero field cooling (ZEB) not only saves energy but also makes the device easier to control and reduces the size of the device. In this work, the ZEB effect under different measurement fields is obtained in Ni50Mn37Ga13 alloy, further, combining the macroscopic magnetic test and phase field simulation, the microscopic magnetic states under different measurement fields are studied. Through phase field simulation, it is revealed that the density of the ferromagnetic (FM)/antiferromagnetic (AFM) interface first expands and then shrinks with the increase of measurement field, which thus explains the optimum ZEB at an intermediate measurement field. This work reveals the important role of the FM/AFM interface in the ZEB effect.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Using Monte Carlo method, we studied the thermodynamic and magnetocaloric properties of an AnB60-n Ising fullerene-like structure under the applied magnetic field. It is emphasized that the importance of the exchange coupling, the applied magnetic field and the atom concentration in controlling various thermodynamic quantities. The temperature dependence of the entropy change and the adiabatic temperature change was further discussed under the effects of different parameters. The refrigeration cooling power (RCP) can be improved through decreasing exchange coupling and increasing the external magnetic field and the atom concentration with greater spin values.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In-situ magnetic-anisotropy spark plasma sintering technique (MASPS) was used to produce an anisotropic pellet of BaFe12O19 at different sintering parameters. The crystalline texture and anisotropic properties were studied and investigated by using XRD, FESEM, EDX, relative magnetic texture, and mechanical anisotropy. Among all sintered samples, S1180 exhibited (00L) preferred orientation with a high degree of texture (Lotgering factor and texture coefficient TC are 0.78 and 7.17 respectively), which has resulted from XRD patterns. FESEM images confirmed that the grains were grown and re-oriented along the magnetic easy axis. From the EDX test, the degrees of crystalline texture were 59.18, 5.26, and −5.54 of S1180, S1050, and S920, respectively. S1180 had the highest mechanical anisotropy, where the hardness on the top surface and the cross-section are 603 and 60.8 HV, respectively. Besides, the highly textured sample (S1180) had the highest relative density (88.76%) and the lowest porosity (11.23%). Moreover, the relative degree of magnetic texture (D) of S1180 was 73.97%.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.A series of Mn2Fe1-xCoxGa (x = 0–1) Heusler alloys was synthesized by melt-spinning method. The crystal structure, magnetic properties and electronic structure of them were investigated experimentally and theoretically. In undoped Mn2FeGa, a pure FCC phase is identified. The substitution of Co for Fe in Mn2Fe1-xCoxGa tends to stabilize the BCC Heusler phase, with the help of melt-spinning technique, single BCC Heusler phase was obtained within the range of × = 0.5–1.0. The FCC Mn2Fe1-xCoxGa are antiferromagnetic and their Néel temperatures TN decrease with Co-doping. But in BCC Mn2Fe1-xCoxGa, a ferromagnetic character is observed and the saturated magnetization Ms at 5 K increases rapidly with increasing Co content. First-principles calculations suggest that Co-doping can make the formation energy of Mn2Fe1-xCoxGa BCC phase more negative and increase the phase stability, which agrees well with the appearance of the BCC phase in the XRD pattern when Co content is high. This effect can be explained from the change of electronic structure with Co-doping. The calculated total spin moments of Mn2Fe1-xCoxGa increase from 1.04μB / f.u. for × = 0 to 2.01 μB / f.u. for × = 1, following the Slater-Pauling curve of M = Z −24. The Ms at 5 K agrees well with the theoretical results when × = 0.75–1.0. Calculations also suggest that Mn2Fe1-xCoxGa alloys all have 100% or quite high spin polarization ratio. All this makes them promising candidates for spintronic applications when Co content is high.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Structural, frequency and magnetic properties of magnetite ores from the Kovdor deposit, Northwest Russia, have been investigated. Scanning electron microscopy, X-ray energy dispersion microanalysis, X-ray diffraction, and Curie temperature measurements all point to non-stoichiometric magnetite as a major (ca 48 wt%) magnetic constituent of the ore. Magnetic granulometry of the samples has been analyzed using the model of interacting ferrimagnetic particles. The results of determining superparamagnetic particles on the basis of theoretical modeling are in good agreement with the experimental data obtained using the frequency-dependent susceptibility and granulometry methods. It is shown that even relatively minor concentrations of superparamagnetic grains modify the electromagnetic response of the samples, and can be detected in their impulse transient characteristics.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Manganese-zinc-nickel (MnZnNi) ferrite nanoparticles with the chemical composition Mn0.2Zn0.5Ni0.3Fe2O4 were prepared via co-precipitation method. Using the prepared nanoparticles, ring-shaped cores were formed and subjected to two-step sintering. Then, magnetic permeability, magnetic losses, density and microstructure of the samples were examined and compared with those of ferrites produced by the single-step sintering process. It was found that upon reducing the isothermal temperature from 1350 °C to 1250 °C, the density of the samples increased from 4.39 to 4.71 gr/cm3 and the average grain size diminished from 10.1 to 2.2 µm. The samples prepared through the two-step sintering method with a high temperature of 1350 °C and a lower temperature of 1250 °C exhibited a good performance in terms of loss and permeability. The two-step sintering process is an efficient method to produce high density and permeability plus low-loss ferrites.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Manganese ferrite nanoparticles with either Fe3+ or Mn2+ substitution by La3+ (MnFe2O4, La0.125MnFe1.875O4 and La0.125Mn0.875Fe2O4) were obtained by sol–gel method. A single phase corresponding to inverse spinel crystal structure was detected. Lattice parameter increases by incorporating La3+. Microstrain and crystallite size (∼9 nm) were obtained by Williamson-Hall (W-H) plots and field emission scanning electron microscopy (FE-SEM), respectively. Lanthanum ions promote a superparamagnetic behavior at 300 K, while at low temperature ferrites acquire a typical ferromagnetic behavior according to the blocking temperature (TB) detected by zero-field-cooled and field-cooled (ZFC/FC) magnetization measurement. Lanthanum modifies slightly the chemical environment and the cation distribution, promoting the Fe partial reduction and the subsequent Mn oxidation. Experimental results were compared with those obtained by Density Functional Theory (DFT) calculations. The band gap energy (Eg) of MnFe2O4 at 0 K is 1.109 eV (DFT) and no significant change was observed by incorporating lanthanum, while at 300 K (UV–visible diffuse reflectance spectroscopy, UV–vis), Eg is 1.796 eV and increases up to 1.835 and 1.842 eV due to the substitution, by La3+, of Fe3+ and Mn2+, respectively. The role of lanthanum in the Mn-ferrite is the decrease in the magnetic properties by substituting either Fe3+ or Mn2+ due to the electronic transition from the high spin to low spin configuration by the presence of this rare earth element located at the octahedral sites.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we examine the temperature dependence of magnetic domain wall (DW) creep motion in ferrimagnetic Tb/CoFeB/MgO microwires by using a real-time DW detection method. By measuring the field-dependent DW velocity at various temperatures, the creep-scaling constant and the characteristic velocity were evaluated from the creep-scaling analysis. We found that the DW velocity changed significantly with temperature and was mainly attributed to the variation in the creep-scaling constant than that in the characteristic velocity. Possible mechanisms for the temperature dependence of each parameter are discussed.© 2022 Elsevier LtdCharge transport in thick amorphous silicon dioxide capacitors for integrated galvanic insulators is experimentally investigated and analyzed through numerical simulations carried out with a commercial TCAD tool. The material intrinsic defectivity and the large biases applied to such devices give rise to a leakage current which is responsible for degradation and failure. Hence it is crucial to have a complete understanding of the charge-transport main physical mechanisms in amorphous silicon oxide. In particular, charge injection at contacts and charge build-up due to trapping/de-trapping mechanisms in the bulk of the oxide are expected to play a crucial role and their complex coupled interaction needs to be investigated via a TCAD-based approach. For this reason, time-dependent dielectric breakdown measurements at constant-current stresses and voltage-ramp stresses up to breakdown have been performed on thick metal-insulator–metal structures, and numerical simulations have been carried out so to predict the failure mechanisms. To this purpose, special attention has been devoted to the physical modeling of defects and impact-ionization generation.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In this study, we perform Monte Carlo simulations to study the magnetic properties of a mixed Ising model on a cubic lattice where spins SiA = 1 andσJB = 3/2 are located in sublattice A and B, respectively. The proposed Hamiltonian includes coupling to nearest-neighbors interactions, next-nearest-neighbors interactions, crystal fields DS and Dσ and external magnetic field h. We perform exact ground-state calculations for our model. The obtained results show the behavior of the critical temperature with the presence of the compensation temperatures under a certain range of parameters. Particularly, we found that the existence of compensation temperatures depends on the strength of the coupling to the next nearest neighbors between the SiA spins and between the σJB spins, and it appears in a certain range of values of the external magnetic and crystal field of different spins.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Half-metallic Heusler compounds are among the most actively studied materials for applications in spin-based devices. Largely, this is due to their higher Curie temperature compared with the other half-metallic compounds, and relative ease of fabrication. Here we theoretically study one such Heusler alloy CrMnSb0.5Si0.5. In particular, we demonstrate a potential stability of this compound by estimating its formation energy, its half-metallic electronic structure (stable under a considered range of biaxial strain), and ferrimagnetic alignment. The calculated Curie temperature of this material is 787 K, much higher than room temperature. At the same time, we have shown that in thin-film geometry the spin-polarization of this material is strongly reduced due to the emergence of surface states in the minority-spin energy gap. In addition, one of the considered termination surfaces is thermodynamically unstable, while the other is stable. The presented results may be useful for researchers working on practical applications in the field of spintronics.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.We investigated spin wave (SW) propagation and emission in thin film systems with strong interfacial Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (DMI) utilizing micromagnetic simulation. The effect of DMI on SW propagation is analogous to the flow of magnetic medium leading to the spin Doppler effect, and a spin-polarized current can enhance or suppress it. We demonstrate that for a Doppler velocity exceeding a critical value, a shock-wave-like emission of SWs with a cone-shape emerges from a magnetically irregular point as the cone apex. The cone angle is quantitatively determined by the DMI-induced Doppler velocity. Combining the interfacial DMI and the spin-polarized current, a constant SW emission by a static source is demonstrated, which provides a promising route to efficiently generate SWs with tunable frequency.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, a metasurface composed of an array of V-shaped Ag nanostructures deposited on a magneto-optical material is proposed to control the circular dichroism (CD) effect via an external magnetic field. We numerically observed that this structure due to its nonchirality shows significant CD effect under oblique incidence only. We first considered the case at which the external magnetic field was perpendicular to the metasurface. In this case, the structure indicated a weak sensitivity to the external magnetic field. However, by applying the magnetic field along the plane of metasurface, we observed a strong dependence of CD curve on the external magnetic field. In addition, the CD effect was different for magnetic fields along the x and y directions in the plane of metasurface due to the different symmetries with respect to these axes. The sensitivity of the proposed structure to the external magnetic field was calculated for both cases where the magnetic field was along the plane of metasurface and perpendicular to it. Our results confirmed that this structure was able to sense smaller magnetic fields which were parallel to the metasurface plane compared with ones that were normal to the structure plane.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Motivated by recent upsurge in research of three-dimensional topological semimetals (SMs), we theoretically study the RKKY interaction between magnetic impurities in nodal-line SMs with and without the chirality and obtain the analytical expressions. We find that unique toroidal Fermi surface (FS) in nodal-line SMs, distinctly different from the spheroid FS in the SMs with the point nodes, has significant influence on the RKKY interaction, which leads to strong anisotropic oscillation and unique decay features. In the direction perpendicular to nodal-line plane, as usual, there is only one oscillation period related to the Fermi energy. In contrast, in the nodal-line plane, the RKKY interaction form a beating pattern and oscillates more rapidly with two distinct periods: one is coming from the Fermi energy and the other is from the radius of nodal-line. More importantly, inside nodal-line SMs bulk, the decay rate of RKKY interaction manifests a typical two-dimensional feature for impurities aligned along the direction perpendicular to nodal-line plane. Furthermore, the magnetic interactions in nodal-line SMs with linear and quadratic dispersions in the nodal-line plane are compared. We also discuss the possible application of the present theory on realistic nodal-line SM ZrSiSe. Our results shed a light for application of magnetically doped nodal-line SMs in spintronics.© 2022 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, the effects of thermal annealing on the radiated InP-based high electron mobility transistors (HEMTs) is investigated. Proton irradiation is performed with energy of 2 MeV and fluence of 5 × 1013 cm−2, and subsequently the thermal annealing experiments are carried out at 100 ℃ and 200 ℃. Both drain-source saturation current (Id,sat) and maximum transconductance (gm,max) of the radiated devices demonstrate a certain degree of recovery after annealing at 100 ℃ and 200 ℃. Id,sat and gm,max recover by the maximum values of 17.37 % and 13.66% for 10 min annealing at 100 ℃, and 12.65% and 14.54% for 5 min thermal annealing at 200 ℃. The main reason for the recovery about the DC characteristics are the restore of carrier concentration and mobility. Thermal annealing has enhanced the atoms vibration, which decreases the concentration of defects by recombination and weakens the lattice scattering by rearranging the lattice. In addition, this paper reveals that different annealing temperature and duration will have different effects on irradiated InP-based HEMTs.© 2022 Elsevier LtdScanning Capacitance Microscopy (SCM), Scanning Surface Potential Microscopy (SSPM) and Scanning Spreading Resistance Microscopy (SSRM) techniques are applied to perform investigation of AlGaN/GaN heterostructures epitaxially grown on spatially structured GaN templates used for quasi vertical high electron mobility transistors (VHEMT) fabrication. The heterogeneity of electrical properties in this structures was observed that might be caused by structural defects in AlGaN barrier, with density varying in different regions of the sample. SCM one point spectroscopy measurements confirmed the existence of two dimensional electron gas (2DEG) at AlGaN/GaN interface on the slope of the transition region between reactive ion etched and unetched areas under the transistor channel. Electrical parameters of 2DEG in slope region do not differ significantly from those determined for the other areas of the sample.© 2022 Elsevier LtdTo meet the rising demand for Random Telegraph Noise (RTN) analysis, a new method to quickly separate RTN impacted devices from devices that show no RTN has been proposed and validated via existing analysis methods. It has been demonstrated that the higher sample-to-sample correlation of RTN can be used in conjunction with downsampling to allow a reduction in computational load while maintaining a robust RTN-detection rate.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The evolution of Al substitution on the structure, optical and magnetic properties of GdMnO3 was investigated and GdMn1-xAlxO3 (x = 0.00–0.30) nano ceramics were prepared by sol–gel method. All ceramics exhibit the single phase and orthorhombic structure. Al doping causes the change of Raman mode and microscopic morphology of GdMn1-xAlxO3 ceramics. Vacancy concentration firstly decreases and then increases when the Al substitution amount in the range of 0.00–0.15. Vacancy concentration decreases in the Al substitution amount range of 0.15–0.20, and increases in the Al substitution amount range of 0.20–0.30. Optical results indicate that Al doping has an impact on the band gap of GdMnO3 ceramics. Al substitution can adjust the long-range ordering of Gd3+ magnetic moments and magnetic transition temperature. The magnetic transition temperature depends on the local electron density by Al substitution while the magnetization is obviously related to cation vacancy concentration and dilution effect.© 2022 The AuthorsEmploying novel 2D materials with topologically protected current-carrying edge states is promising to boost the on-current in electronic devices. Using nanoribbons is essential to reduce the contribution of the 2D bulk states to the current. Making the nanoribbon widths narrower allows one to put more current-carrying edge states under the gate of a fixed width thus increasing the current. However, the edge states from opposite edges may start to interact in narrow nanoribbons. Based on an effective k∙p model, we analyze the topologically protected edge states and their conductance for several 2D materials as a function of the normal electric field. We compare the 2D materials MoS2, MoSe2, WS2, and WSe2 in the topological 1T′ phase and find the largest electric field-induced conductance modulation in MoS2 nanoribbons.© 2022 The AuthorsThe influence of thermal effects in AlGaN/GaN HEMTs is studied by means of Monte Carlo simulations. Measured output and transfer characteristics of a transistor are well reproduced using two techniques, a thermal-resistance method and an electrothermal model which solves the steady-state heat-conduction equation. The validity of the model to reproduce the experimental results is checked in two-terminal structures and transistors. Both methods are also employed to investigate in AC regime in terms of the elements of the small-signal equivalent circuit, providing a good agreement with experimental values, with no significant differences between the models. Apart from the expected decrease of transconductance and drain conductance, the gate to source capacitance is also found to be lowered by heating effects.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In this work, Co-doped and Co-F co-doped PbPdO2 nanoparticles with a body-centered orthorhombic structure were synthesized via sol–gel method. The measured results reveal that, Pb and O vacancies exist in all samples; the valence state of magnetic atom Co is identified as mixed Co2+ and Co3+; all samples exhibit both ferromagnetism and paramagnetism; the incorporation of fluorine results in an evident increase in the magnetic moment of PbPd0.875Co0.125O2@F; a jump of magnetization at about 265 K can be found in both FC and ZFC curves of PbPd1-xCoxO2 (x = 0, 0.05, 0.10 and 0.115). Moreover, the origin of the magnetism can be considered as follows: the ferromagnetism for PbPd1-xCoxO2 (0 < x ≤ 0.15) results from the combined effect of O1− and magnetic Co ions; fluorine substitution in an oxygen lattice site and the fluorine doping in the interstitial sites can induce both distinct roles on the valence of oxygen, Co and Pd ions, which changes evidently the magnetic properties of PbPd1-xCoxO2. Fortunately, the magnetic properties of PbPdO2, Co-doped PbPdO2, Co-F co-doped PbPdO2 can be verified by first-principles calculations. It is found that the enhanced magnetization results mainly from Pd(2−δ)+ and more O1− induced by F. Finally, the magnetization jump at about 265 K has been explained by the temperature-dependent valence transformation between O2− and O1−.© 2022 Elsevier LtdDiamond-Like Carbon (DLC) is well established material for the passivation of high voltage negative bevelled power diode. In our previous works, the conduction mechanism of the DLC has been carefully described through the characterization and the physical modelling of Metal-Insulator-Semiconductor (MIS) structures. In addition, the effects on the breakdown voltage and leakage current have been clarified comparing the available experiments with numerical simulations. However, the role played by the DLC on the breakdown voltage temperature dependence is still lacking. In this work, we addressed the latter issue and found out an anomalous reduction of the temperature dependence which is clearly ascribed to the DLC behaviour. The temperature dependencies of carrier transport in the DLC have been further investigated in order to explain the experimental results. The observed effect might be related to the release of the trapped charges with increasing temperatures or to a different temperature dependence of the DLC mobility which is function of the distance from the Si/DLC interface. TCAD simulations are used to corroborate such assumptions.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.High temperature vulcanized silicone rubber samples filled with Co0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4 ferrite nanoparticles were prepared using an ordinary standard rubber mixer. The compounds were prepared by dry mixing in two roll-mixing mills (outside diameter 470 mm, working distance 300 mm, speed of slow roll 24 rpm and fraction ratio of 1:1.4). Structure and Morphology of Co-Zn ferrite were characterized by X-ray diffraction and transmission electron microscope (TEM). The homogeneity of Co-Zn nanoferrite-filled silicone rubber was evaluated by scanning electron microscope (SEM). The influences of ferrite concentration on the rheological and the physico mechanical properties: tensile strength, elongation at break, Young's modulus were measured. An enhancement of those properties were noticed by increasing ferrite load till 8 phr. The hardness showed an enhancement for all composite samples. Magnetization of the samples showed an increase with high rate at high ferrite concentration while the electric resistivity decreases up to 8 phr ferrite loaded sample then increases for higher ferrite loads. These results were discussed and interpreted in the light of the morphology and different interactions between the phase of ferrite and rubber matrix. Comparisons which were held between the obtained results with those in the literature showed superiority for the values of measured properties in this study.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Magnetorheological elastomers (MREs) are magnetoactive smart materials that exhibit mechanical deformation in the presence of magnetic fields. The greatest performance in these materials has been seen from magnetic annealing, which creates high internal anisotropy. This work studies how different magnetic annealing setups (no field, uniform field, and non-uniform field) can be applied to thermoplastic MRE extrusion geometries and how each setup affects the resulting magnetic and magnetoactive properties. The uniform field resulted in an increase of both magnetic anisotropy and magnetoactive performance when compared to no field (but was difficult to make samples with). The non-uniform magnetic annealing setup resulted in similar magnetic properties but decreased magnetoactive performance when compared to the no field samples likely due to interference with the naturally occurring anisotropy that results from extrusion flow. This work demonstrates that certain magnetic annealing setups can be applied to extrusion geometries for increased anisotropy effects resulting in greater magnetoactive response compared to no magnetic annealing, while others can lead to a decrease in anisotropy and less magnetoactive response.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In this paper design and performance comparison of arrays of circular, square and hexagonal meta-material structures for wearable applications have been carried out. Meta-material structures are based on the artificial magnetic structures such as Split Ring Resonators (SRR). Design and analysis of this antenna at the operating frequency of 2.4 GHz (ISM band) is done by using the Ansoft HFSS software. It consists of two microstrip lines with the slits in between them and both the shapes are made like a C-shape by forming the gaps at opposite sides of each ring. The substrate for unit cell of meta-material is polyester which has width and length of 10 mm. It is also concluded from the simulation results that the antenna offered good gain with meta-material structure in comparison with the non-meta-material structure. Meta-material structures have good radiating effects as it has negative electromagnetic properties.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In this study, the Heisenberg model is constructed, and the spin wave spectra of graphene-like magnetic film with six sublattices were calculated using spin wave theory and the Green's function method. The effects of exchange coupling, anisotropy, and spin quantum number on the energy gap and resonance frequency of the system were investigated. The present results show the method to adjust the energy gap and resonance frequency.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Mischmetal (MM30Nd70)30.4Fe68.2Al0.4Cu0.2B0.8 bulk magnets have been prepared with strip casting method followed by hydrogen decrepitating, jet milling, sintering and annealing. Process conditions to achieve optimum magnetic properties have been established through experimentations. XRD studies revealed main tetragonal RE2Fe14B phase and less RE-rich and CeFe2 phases. Microscopic examinations elucidated that magnet microstructure composed of main magnetically MM2Fe14B hard phase, RE-rich intergranular phase and magnetically soft CeFe2 phase. Henkel plot demonstrated the existence of exchange coupling between magnetic phase grains. Thermal studies showed Curie temperature of 278 °C for the Mischmetal (MM30Nd70)30.4Fe68.2Al0.4Cu0.2B0.8 magnet. Magnetic evaluations provoked coercivity Hcj of 619kA/m, remanenec Br of 1.15 T and maximum energy product density of 241 kJ/m3 for the (MM30Nd70)30.4Fe68.2Al0.4Cu0.2B0.8 magnetic alloy.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Here we consider a flower-like structure of a resonator consisting of six elliptical elements, referred to as petals, made from a magnetic material. The petals are positioned with their centres at the corners of a regular hexagon. Using numerical simulations (CST Studio) we examine the effect of different radial orientations of petals. We study resonance modes with a specific distribution of the electromagnetic field within the resonator as well as the effect of the rotation of petals on the field distribution. The mode character is crucial to understand the behaviour of the frequency spectrum. E.g., the rotation of petals influences significantly the frequency of the lowest mode only, while the other frequencies are almost unchanged and this effect is directly related to the profiles of modes. The system studied is a promising candidate for a tuneable component of an integrated detection system.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Sr2FeMoO6 (SFMO) was synthesized by sol–gel method under different gas flow rate of 5% H2/Ar (S1: 30 ml/min, S2: 45 ml/min, S3: 55 ml/min). The crystal structures of S1, S2 and S3 were tested and analyzed by X-ray diffraction (XRD). It was found that S1, S2 and S3 were pure phase and the space group was I4/m. It can be seen from the transport characteristic curve that the pellets show semiconductivity without magnetic field. Under magnetic field, the pellet S1 still show semiconductive behavior, while the two pellets S2 and S3 show metallicity, which is mainly related to anti-site defect (ASD), crystallinity of the pellets and oxygen vacancies. Under low temperature of 5 K, the pellets have obvious ferromagnetism and small coercive field, and their saturation magnetic moments are 3.16 μB/f.u, 3.44 μB/f.u, 2.79 μB/f.u, the coercive field sizes are 63.94 Oe, 65.95 Oe, 76.38 Oe, respectively.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Pulsed magnetic field (PMF) has been proposed as a non-thermal technology for inactivation of microorganisms in food. The changes in intracellular Ca2+ concentration in microorganisms may contribute to explain the inactivation mechanism by PMF. A fluorescence method for evaluating the intracellular Ca2+ concentration in Listeria monocytogenes was established to reveal the effect of PMF on the intracellular Ca2+ level in cell. Fluo-4 AM, a fluorescent calcium assay reagent, was used to determine the intracellular Ca2+ concentration in L. monocytogenes. The results showed that Fluo-4 AM was successfully loaded into L. monocytogenes and could be used to determine the concentration of intracellular free Ca2+ level. The optimal loading temperature and time were 37 °C and 120 min, respectively. After exposure to PMF, intracellular Ca2+ concentration in L. monocytogenes increased by amounts varying between 27.5 and 45.2%. In addition, laser confocal scanning microscope (LCSM) analysis conformed that the Ca2+ fluorescence intensity in L. monocytogenes increased after PMF treatment, indicating that large amounts of exocellular Ca2+ permeated into the cells. Therefore, it can be inferred that PMF may increase the permeability of the cell membrane and promote Ca2+ transmembrane behavior. These results help to explore the inactivation mechanism of microorganism treated by PMF from the angle of the intracellular Ca2+ concentration.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Magnetization reversal in a many-spin nanomagnet subjected to an rf magnetic field, on top of a DC magnetic field, is studied by numerically solving the system of coupled (damped) Landau–Lifshitz equations. It is demonstrated that spin-misalignment induced by surface anisotropy favors switching with a DC magnetic field weaker than the Stoner–Wohlfarth switching field, for optimal intensities and frequencies of the rf field.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.We studied the mechano-electric energy conversion for Ni-Mn-Ga alloys with dynamic experiments under a bias magnetic field. At low and at high magnetic fields, the magneto-crystalline anisotropy energy and the Zeeman energy dominate the formation of magnetic domains, respectively. At lower fields and when the bias field is tilted against the twin boundary, the formation of 180° magnetic domains reduces the net magnetization parallel to the load axis. However, at low strains and in a compressed state and when the bias field is tilted along the twin boundary, the majority of the volume saturates parallel to the load axis. Further, the evolution of the magnetic domains with increasing the magnetic field is different in each twin domain; a lower magnetic field is needed to eliminate magnetic domain boundaries in the twin domain with the direction of easy magnetization closely aligned with the field than in the twin domain with the direction of easy magnetization at a large angle to the field. Therefore, due to increased net magnetization parallel to the load axis, the magnetic structure generated at lower bias fields tilted parallel to the twin boundary is more favorable to maximize power conversion. However, a minimum bias field is required to expand the sample against the axial load and this field must be higher than the switching field. Therefore, in order to optimize electric power output, the energy conversion has to take place at lower bias magnetic fields and on samples with low twinning stress with the field direction inclined nearly parallel to the twin boundaries.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.We study the influence of magnetic resonance force microscope (MRFM) probe on the low frequency magnetization oscillations in a single permalloy disk connected with gyrotropic motion of magnetic vortex core. It is shown that the resonant frequency of gyrotropic mode can be tuned over a wide range by changing the distance between the probe and the sample. The possibility of switching the vortex core polarity under the action of the field of MRFM probe with large magnetic moment is demonstrated. The experimental data are analyzed using micromagnetic simulations and simple analytical models.© 2022 The AuthorsMagnetic domain walls (DWs) have significants application potential as information carriers in the construction of novel high-density, high-speed spintronics devices. In this study, the fully coupled micro-magnetic-mechanical finite element method (FEM) was used to demonstrate the behaviour of DW dynamics under voltage-modulated magnetoelastic anisotropy via piezostrain transfer in ferromagnetic (FM)/piezoelectric (PE) multiferroic heterostructures. Continuous and long-distance high-speed DW-motion could be realized in the ferromagnetic layer by utilizing a voltage switching on the piezoelectric layer without applying magnetic fields or spin-polarization currents. Numerical simulations demonstrate that this system has low energy consumption of 1.215fJ for every shift operation and high speed with an average velocity of 234.4m/s when applying a 0.5volts under continuous and long-distance DW motion. This performance can be further improved by optimizing the structural design and material selection. The design and analysis results in this study provide a new and effective method to realize low-power consumption and high-speed spin logic devices based on magnetic DWs.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Maghemite nanoparticles functionalized with type 5A zeolite were prepared by co-precipitation to produce three different nanohybrid materials with potential for application in water remediation process. Raman and in-field 57Fe Mössbauer spectroscopies were used to bring information about structural and magnetic properties of these materials, while their magnetic properties were obtained from Direct Current magnetization experiments. The Raman data suggested the maghemite to hematite phase transition when two of the samples were exposed to laser power above 4.14 mW. For the two zeolite-based samples that exhibited a secondary goethite phase, the temperature-dependent Mössbauer results indicated low magnetic anisotropy for this phase, an effect associated with its low crystallinity. The spin structure of maghemite nanoparticles is described using the core-shell model, where ferrimagnetic core grains are easily polarized by external magnetic fields and are surrounded by non-collinear spins (canted spins) originating from the particle surface. No strong magnetic interaction between the maghemite nanoparticles and the goethite phase that would yield the exchange bias effect was observed; this may be due to the low magnetic anisotropy of the antiferromagnetic goethite, as suggested by the low crystallinity measured by Raman spectroscopy. Minor loop effects that occurred for in field-cooling loops are recorded in low scan fields due to the large magnetic anisotropy of the superspinglass state of the maghemite nanoparticles established by dipolar magnetic interactions.© 2022 The AuthorsWe present a study of Cu-substitution effects in 4f-Ce intermetallic compound CeAu1-xCuxGe, with potentially unusual electronic states, in the whole concentration range (x = 0.0 – 1.0). The parent CeAuGe compound, crystallizing in a non-centrosymmetric hexagonal structure, is a ferromagnetic semimetal with Curie temperature 10 K. Cu-doping on Au-site of CeAuGe, CeAu1-xCuxGe, changes the crystal structure from the non-centrosymmetric (P63mc) to centrosymmetric (P63/mmc) space group at the concentration x ∼ 0.5, where the c-lattice constant has a maximum value. Magnetic susceptibility and electrical resistivity measurements reveal that all Cu-doped compounds undergo magnetic phase transition near 10 K, with the maximum transition temperature of 12 K for x = 0.5. The neutron powder diffraction experiments show the ferromagnetic ordering of Ce3+ magnetic moments with a value of about 1.2 μB at 1.8 K, oriented perpendicular to the hexagonal c-axis. By using symmetry analysis, we have found the solutions for the magnetic structure in the ferromagnetic Shubnikov space groups Cmc'21′ and P21′/m' for x < 0.5 and x ≥ 0.5, respectively. Electrical resistivity ρ(T) exhibits a metallic temperature behaviour in all compositions. The resistivity ρ(T) has a local minimum in the paramagnetic state due to Kondo effects at high doping x = 0.8 and 1.0. At the small Cu-doping level, x = 0.2, the resistivity shows a broad feature at the ferromagnetic transition temperature and an additional transition-like peculiarity at 2.5 K in the ferromagnetic state.© 2021The surface passivation is an effective technique to improve the magnetic properties of iron-based powder cores. The phosphating effect on the magnetic properties and rust resistance of FeSiCr alloy powder was explored. The FeSiCr alloy powder was treated by different phosphoric acid content, and prepared to magnetic powder cores. The FeSiCr powder particles were analyzed by FTIR spectra, SEM, EDS, XRD and XPS in detail. It was found out that, the particle surface was covered uniformly by the phosphating film, which was mainly composed of FeHPO4, FePO4 and CrPO4. Magnetic analysis results were demonstrated that, with the increase of phosphoric acid content, magnetic permeability and saturation magnetic induction were gradually decreased, the core losses were slightly increased at low frequencies. Experimental results from salt spray were shown that the rust resistance of FeSiCr magnetic powder core was greatly improved once a certain phosphoric acid content was reached.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Nanoferrites are comprehensively employed as leading thermoseeds in biomedical applications remarkably in magnetic hyperthermia treatments owing to their biocompatibility and everlasting magnetic deportment. The efficiency of nanoferrites is observed by employing preparation methods, biocompatible overlay, and dopant materials. Nanoferrites have been widely applied in magnetic hyperthermia that terminates tumor cells which are recognized for their phenomenal heating system. Besides, the use of nanoferrites in cancer treatments such as magnetic hyperthermia, imposes certain specific requirements, such as biocompatibility, low toxicity, a higher specific absorption rate, a shorter time to reach a specific hyperthermia temperature, crystalline size within the biological radius, and a lower nanoferrite dose. One possible solution is, to spot the constraints and to suggest improved nanocomposite materials that enhance their magnetic properties by using a biocompatible overlay and to optimize the efficiency and functionality of magnetic nanoferrites. As an outcome, research into these nanoferrite materials is assessed to determine their functionality and efficiency in cancer treatments. Hence, this article is mainly focused on the preliminary analysis of the magnetic materials used in hyperthermia treatments with the impact of dopants. Thus, this investigation will figure out the limitations of ferrite nanoparticles in hyperthermia treatment and suggests improved ferrite-based nanocomposites to improve its efficiency within the biological moieties, which could be a promising future aspirant in treating cancer.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.A variable frequency, low current, low cost, high sensitivity magnetometer has been developed. The system uses three MnZn ferrite rods to enhance the maximum field achievable by up to a factor 6 compared to the case where no ferrites are used. The system was tested using a suspension of magnetite nanoparticles in water. The magnetic response of the particles was investigated as a function of the maximum applied field and the frequency of operation. Volumes as low as (7.0 ± 0.1) µL are required to obtain a signal to noise ratio of 8(47 kHz)/3(111 kHz) for a fluid with a saturation magnetisation of 1.07 emu/cm3. Fields as high as 420 Oe can be applied by passing a current as low as 2.5 A through the primary coil at all operating frequencies.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Obtaining low gilbert damping (α) and high spin polarization (P) in Heusler alloy thin films is one of the key requirements from the device application point of view in spintronics. Both α and P are correlated, closely related to the density of states (DOS) at the Fermi level and need to be controlled for engineered material. We investigated the effect of stoichiometry (different Co to Mn atomic percent ratios, viz. 2.21, 4.53, 5.43, and 9.19) and film-thickness {(t) in the range of 24–90 nm} on the structural and magnetization dynamics behavior in co-sputtered Co2MnAl thin films grown over Si(1 0 0) substrates. While the stoichiometric (∼50 at.% of Co) films with t ≥ 38 nm were found to exhibit B2 order with low α, the off-stoichiometric films (t ∼ 50 nm) were found to stabilize in partially ordered A2 phase and exhibited higher α. The change in structural ordering due to change in stoichiometry and film-thickness in polycrystalline Co2MnAl (CMA) thin films helped in tuning α in the range of (4.11 ± 0.06) × 10-3 – (11.95 ± 0.28) × 10-3. The minimum value of α ∼ (4.11 ± 0.06) × 10-3 was achieved for stoichiometric CMA (t = 70 nm) thin films which is close to the literature value of epitaxially grown L21 and B2 ordered CMA thin films. The study shows that we can tune and attain low damping in polycrystalline CMA Heusler thin films by controlling the stoichiometry.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Bilinear magnetoresistance is a nonlinear transport phenomenon that scales linearly with the electric and magnetic fields, and appears in nonmagnetic systems with strong spin–orbit coupling, such as topological insulators (TIs). Using the semiclassical Boltzmann theory and generalized relaxation time approximation, we consider in detail the bilinear magnetoresistance in an effective model describing surface states of three-dimensional topological insulators. We show that the presence of magnetic impurities remarkably modifies the BMR signal. In general, scattering on magnetic impurities reduces magnitude of BMR. Apart from this, an additional modulation of the angular dependence of BMR appears when the spin-dependent component of the impurity potential dominates the scalar one.© 2022 Elsevier LtdA comprehensive Kubo-Greenwood modelling of FDSOI MOS devices is performed down to deep cryogenic temperatures. It is found that a single set of mobility parameters is only necessary to fit the capacitance and drain current transfer characteristics versus temperature for long channel devices. In contrast, in short channel transistors, the neutral scattering mobility component µN is found to decrease at small gate length due to the increased impact of neutral defects close to source/drain ends whatever the temperature. Moreover, a closed-form analytical expression for the Coulomb scattering has been developed, useful for device compact modelling.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.To balance the utilization of rare-earth resource, Ce and La have been proposed to be employed in RE2Fe14B-type magnetic materials to produce fully high abundance rare-earth magnets. In this work, the effects of La on the phase constitution, microstructure and magnetic properties of melt spun (Ce1-xLax)17Fe78B6 alloys and (Ce1-yLay)17Fe75Si3B6 alloys have been systematically investigated. La effectively inhibits the formation of CeFe2 phase and increases the volume fraction of 2:14:1 phase. The TEM results indicate that La prefers to enter into intergranular phase and form bulk aggregations. La-substitution improves the remanence Jr, the maximum energy product (BH)max, curie temperature Tc and thermal stability, but reduces the coercivity Hc. Si modified (Ce1-yLay)17Fe75Si3B6 alloys exhibit better demagnetization curve squareness and superior magnetic properties than (Ce1-xLax)17Fe78B6 alloys due to the refined microstructure. In addition, Si-doped alloys show better thermal stability due to the enhanced curie temperature Tc. The results indicate that higher La content can be employed in Si doped Ce-Fe-B-based alloys for improved properties. The best combination of magnetic properties with (BH)max = 6.5 MGOe, Hc = 336 kA/m, Jr = 0.60 T and coercivity coefficient |β|=0.324 %/℃ is obtained in (Ce0.6La0.4)17Fe75Si3B6 alloy. The current work suggests that Ce-La-Fe-B alloys are potential to fabricate the so-called ‘Gap Magnets’, however, the composition modification is also required in order to improve their performance.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The remarkable intrinsic hard magnetic properties of SmFe12-based powders are difficult to transform into extrinsic properties for practical applications; in particular, the coercivity is insufficient because the conventional magnetic isolation structure, which relies on nonmagnetic intergranular phases and is critical for inducing high coercivity in commercial Nd2Fe14B systems, has not yet been perfected. In this study, we present a new approach for achieving magnetic isolation with a reduction-diffusion process that endows SmFe10V2 powder with nonmagnetic Sm-rich layers. The optimal sample of this Sm-rich layer surrounding SmFe10V2 powder has a high coercivity of 744.9 kA/m and a moderate maximum magnetization of 61.7 Am2/kg. Based on phase characterization and microstructure observation, the principal SmFe10V2 magnetic phase is well maintained, and the surrounding Sm-rich layers separate the magnetic phases, weakening the ferromagnetic interaction of neighboring magnetic phases and contributing to the high coercivity. Our study presents a new method for developing high-coercivity magnetic powders by introducing nonmagnetic layers.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The influence of Gallium (Ga) doping on the microstructure, thermal stability and the magnetic properties of Nd-Fe-B based sintered magnets was investigated in this paper. It is shown that the intrinsic coercivity increases significantly from 12.4 kOe to 19.4 kOe while the remanence decreases slightly from 14.03 kGs to 13.70 kGs when Ga content increases from 0.0 wt% to 0.5 wt%. The thermal stability of the Ga-doped sample is much better than that of Ga-free sample. Temperature coefficient of intrinsic coercivity β @ 20-120 ℃ by doping 0.5 wt% Ga is −0.585 %/K, which is better than that of Ga-free sample (-0.622%/K). It was observed by the microstructures that the addition of Ga can promote the diffusion of Nd and Cu from triple junction phase (TJP) into grain boundary phase while Fe atoms are enriched around TJPs, resulting in continuous grain boundary (GB) phase and reducing the Fe concentration in GB phase. The Curie temperature increases from 583 K to 585 K after doping 0.5 wt% Ga.© 2022 Elsevier LtdWe present a study of performances of organic photovoltaic cells (OPVs) using a wide variety of small molecules. These OPVs use two or three molecules to form binary or ternary cells, i.e. consisting of two or three flat stacked layers. Different ternary OPVs designs for efficient light harvesting and energy band structure combinations are studied. Molecules have been chosen to study all possible energy band structure alignments in ternary configuration. We discuss various parameters limiting their efficiency, such as carrier mobility, organic layer morphology, energy band structure alignment. Special attention has been paid to understand the device behavior. It is shown that, if light absorption domains, carriers mobility, energy band structure alignment are decisive for achieving performing OPVs, the geometry of the molecules is also decisive. In ternary OPVs, the third organic layer, intercalated between the electron donor and the electron acceptor, must serve as a bridge in the energy levels of the outer layers, which permits an energetic cascade effect. For this effect to be positive it is necessary that this intermediate layer facilitates creation and transport of charge carriers, but also that it allows transport of energy, all leading to an improvement of the performance of the OPVs.© 2022 Elsevier LtdIn this work, the factors affecting the breakdown voltage of Si-GaN monolithic heterogeneous integrated Casccode FET fabricated by transfer printing were investigated. These two factors are the avalanche breakdown resistance of the Si device and the thickness of SiN electrical isolation layer. Two kinds of device structures, Si MOSFET and Si laterally-diffused MOSFET (LDMOSFET), were designed to study the effect of the avalanche breakdown resistance of the Si devices on the breakdown characteristics of Cascode FET. The effect of the thickness of SiN electrical isolation layer was analyzed. Finally, the breakdown voltage of monolithic integrated Cascode FET reached 770 V.© 2022Magnetization reversal processes occurring in amorphous CoFeB thin films of thicknesses 100 nm, 200 nm and 300 nm were experimentally investigated. Analysing hysteresis loops traced with a vectorial VSM and the angular behaviour of coercivity, we concluded that domain wall displacement is the leading reversal mechanism for films with 200 and 300 nm. For the thinnest sample, the same is observed for external fields applied away from the hard axis, while coherent rotation becomes import close to this axis.© 2022 The Author(s)A physical process model for dry plasma etching is presented and applied to simulate vertical channel hole etching, a critical fabrication step in modern three-dimensional (3D) NAND flash memory. The presence of physical etching with high energy ions is shown to induce damage in the underlying silicon, which results in the formation of voids during the subsequent selective epitaxial growth (SEG) step. In this manuscript, we present a model for ion induced damage by storing it as a surface property during the plasma etching simulation. A specialized advection algorithm is subsequently applied to simulate silicon SEG on the bottom source line. The model clearly shows the damage caused by the high energy particles, on the crystal nature of silicon, resulting in poor coverage during the SEG step. The removal of this damaged layer using lower energy plasmas results in highly crystalline epitaxially grown silicon. The simulation results show excellent agreement with experiments in the formation of undesired voids without the low-energy pre-epitaxial plasma treatment.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.We perform extensive kinetic Monte Carlo simulations to investigate the magnetic relaxation characteristics in a two-dimensional (Lx×Ly) assembly of magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) as a function of dipolar interaction strength hd, aspect ratio Ar=Ly/Lx, and temperature T. The anisotropy axes are taken as randomly oriented in three-dimensional space. In the presence of small dipolar interaction (hd≤0.3) and substantial temperature, the magnetic relaxation follows the Néel Brown model as expected. Interestingly, the dipolar interaction of enough strength is found to induce antiferromagnetic coupling in the square arrangement of MNPs (Ar=1.0), resulting in the fastening of magnetic relaxation with hd. There is also a rapid increase in relaxation even with Ar<100 above a particular dipolar interaction strength hd⋆, which gets enhanced with Ar. Remarkably, magnetization relaxes slowly with hd for the highly anisotropic system, i.e. Ar>100. It is because the dipolar interaction induces ferromagnetic interaction in such a case. The temperature also affects relaxation drastically. For weak dipolar interaction, magnetization relaxes rapidly with T because of enhancement in thermal fluctuations. The effective Néel relaxation time τN also depends strongly on these parameters. In the presence of strong dipolar interaction (hd>0.3) and Ar=1.0, τN decreases with hd for a given temperature. On the other hand, there is an increase in τN with hd for huge Ar(>100). The comparison of relaxation behaviour and τN with aligned anisotropy cases also reveals a strong dependence of these characteristics on the anisotropy axes orientation. These results are beneficial in data storage and other spintronics based applications.© 2022 The AuthorsWe investigate the influence of a visible laser treatment on the electrical performance of CVD-grown graphene-based liquid gate sensors. This method allows us to treat locally the graphene sheet, improving the performance of the structure for biochemical sensing applications. It was found critical to control the atmosphere in which the laser treatment takes place. An optimized ambient-air laser exposure shifted the Dirac point (minimum of the conductivity voltage) around 300 mV to lower voltages, together with a decrease of the inter-device electrical variability. These results open the door to use the laser treatment to increase the sensibility and reproducibility of liquid gate graphene-based devices as sensors or biosensors.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Based on density-functional calculations with Hubbard U correction for onsite Coulomb interactions, the structural, electronic, and magnetic properties of V, Mn, and Co-doped FeTe2 monolayers were investigated. Doping is more preferred in Fe-rich conditions than in Te-rich conditions, while Mn inclusion is the most thermodynamically stable in any environment, according to the formation energy. In all doped systems, the energy bandgap was widened, and the electron transport properties were improved. According to our predictions, the V, Mn, Co-doped FeTe2 monolayers are half metal in their ground states with enhanced magnetic moments. These V, Mn, and Co-doped FeTe2 monolayers with interesting electronic and magnetic properties can achieve novel spintronic functionalities.© 2022 Elsevier LtdThe ability to simulate biological neurobehavior with electronic devices has now attracted widespread attention. In the past few decades, people have tried a variety of device structures to simulate biological synaptic functions. Due to floating gate thin-film transistors' robust charge blocking and the existence of the tunneling layer, the trapped charge can be stored in a non-volatile manner, which has been considered one of the most suitable device structures for manufacturing artificial synapses. In this work, a photoelectric-stimulated artificial synaptic thin-film transistor was proposed. The MXene and self-assembled titanium dioxide on the surface serves as the floating gate layer and the tunneling layer, respectively. Moreover, the typical synaptic behaviors of synaptic transistors, such as excitatory postsynaptic current and paired-pulse facilitation, have been proven through electrical and optical pulse tests. Finally, through the simulation based on Butterworth's high-pass filter, the input images could be successfully sharpened. The characteristics of these photoelectric synapses reveal the huge potential of this device in neuromorphic vision applications. This work provides a very feasible solution for the application of artificial synaptic devices to image processing and recognition.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Unusual properties of iron-enriched Y3−xFe5+xO12 garnet films have been experimentally observed. The effect of an increase in the Néel temperature by 120∘C was established when the films were cooled from 1000∘C to room temperature. In the process of measuring the magnetic field dependence of the differential magnetic permeability at room temperature, the effect of an increase in the saturation field after magnetization of the film was occurred. It is assumed that these effects are due to the presence of an incommensurate magnetic structure in the Y3−xFe5+xO12 films, which, upon heating and magnetization, can produce metastable magnetic ordering.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Many tetragonal compounds LnIr2Si2 (Ln = lanthanoid) occur in two polymorphous phases and are therefore well suited to study the relationship between crystal structure and magnetic properties. We have grown GdIr2Si2 single crystals of both polymorphs from a high-temperature indium flux and investigated their anisotropic magnetic properties. The higher symmetric form with the ThCr2Si2 structure (space group I4/mmm) orders antiferromagnetically at TN=87K while for the lower symmetric compound in the CaBe2Ge2 structure (space group P4/nmm) we determined a much lower Néel temperature TN=12K. Our magnetic characterization of the single crystals reveals that for both compounds the magnetic moments are aligned in the a−a plane of the tetragonal lattice, but that the change of the symmetry strongly effects the inplane alignment of the moment orientation. For Ln=Er and Ho, we confirmed the existence of LnIr2Si2 in the space group P4/nmm. The magnetic properties of these lower symmetric compounds are in remarkable difference to their related compounds in the space group I4/mmm.© 2022 Elsevier LtdA detailed analysis of the self-heating effect measured by gate thermometry in FDSOI MOSFETs is conducted in deep cryogenic conditions, showing the linear temperature dependence of the differential thermal conductance over a wide range. Then, an analytical formulation of the self-heating temperature rise as a function of power and ambient temperature in FDSOI and bulk MOSFETs valid down to very low temperatures is proposed for the first time. This self-heating temperature rise model is then used to develop an original compact model for the self-heated drain current in FDSOI MOSFETs operated down to very low temperatures.© 2022 Elsevier LtdThis work presents the electrical characterization of 2-level vertically stacked nanowire MOSFETs with variable fin widths in the temperature range from 93 K to 400 K. The basic electrical properties, such as threshold voltage, subthreshold slope, and carrier mobility are examined in the linear region with low VDS. In sequence, certain analog figures of merit such as the transconductance, the output conductance, and the voltage gain are assessed in saturation. The threshold voltage variation with temperature is linear and slightly increases for wider devices, which was satisfactorily validated by an analytical model for 3D devices. Additionally, the subthreshold slope remains close to the theoretical limit in the whole range of temperatures. The intrinsic voltage gain is weakly temperature-sensitive in the studied range regardless of the fin width. On the other hand, it increases for narrow devices in all temperatures.© 2022 Elsevier LtdIn this paper we present an experimental study of SOI UTBB n-MOSFETs at cryogenic temperatures. The device employs fully silicided source/drain with dopant segregation formed by “Implantation Into Silicide” (IIS) process. The impact of the back-gate (Vback) on the device performance is systematically investigated. The results demonstrate that Vback is essential to tune the threshold voltage Vth. And optimization of Vback values can improve the subthreshold swing (SS), Drain-Induced Barrier Lowering (DIBL), transconductance Gm and mobility at cryogenic temperatures, providing a potential to fulfill the ultra-low power requirement for quantum computing application.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Despite time-dependent boundary conditions being ubiquitous in natural and industrial flows, to date the influence of such temporal modulations (e.g. with driving frequency ΩH) has been given minor attention. The present problem addresses ferrofluidic Couette flow in between counter-rotating cylinders in a spatially homogeneous magnetic field subject to time-periodic modulation. Such a modulation can lead to a significant inner Reynolds number (Rei) enhancement for both, either helical and toroidal flow structures. Using a modified Niklas approximation, the effect of low- and high-frequency modulation onto the primary instabilities, stability boundaries as well as on the non-linear oscillations that may occur is investigated. Focusing on bi-stable co-existing solutions, around their stability thresholds quite complex non-linear system response and flow dynamics is detected. For the system remaining supercritical always a single solution is selected by ΩH, while crossing the bifurcation thresholds within a modulation period the triggered system response is more complex, reaching from alternation between different solutions towards the appearance of intermittent behavior.© 2022 Elsevier LtdFor passive matrix organic light emitting diodes, crosstalk effect is serious problem. This problem adversely affects the image quality of display with driver circuit operation. In this study, 16x16 pixel monochrome green emissive passive matrix (PM) OLED Display Module was successfully fabricated which exhibits high efficiency, high luminance uniformity and MIL-STD-3009 night vision (NVIS) compatibility. Current efficiency, power efficiency and external quantum efficiency has been obtained as 22.79 cd/A, 10.23 lm/W and 4.61%, respectively. Additionally, crosstalk effect was removed by adjusting spin rate of the hole injection layer so that display image quality optimally has been achieved.© 2022 Elsevier LtdThe effect of different doses of gamma-ray irradiation has been investigated on zinc tin oxide thin film transistors fabricated via the sol–gel spin-coating method. A negative threshold voltage shift was observed for 10 MRad gamma irradiation dose but the shift became positive after higher radiation doses (50 MRad and 100 MRad). The drain current showed a slight increase at 10 MRad (air) irradiation but reduced at further higher doses of irradiation. Field effect mobility degraded slightly as the irradiation dose increased. The subthreshold swing and the corresponding interfacial defects increased with increasing the dose of irradiation. The ZTO TFT demonstrated only a moderate degradation after 100 MRad (air), making it a viable candidate for radiation-hard electronics applications.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Chemical plating as a simple and effective method has been widely used in the production of metal materials, which can essential to reduce the density and improve the application of metal materials. In this paper, the cobalt microspheres were prepared by chemical plating while the polystyrene-microspheres were as a template. It was found that the pH value of reaction had a significant impact on the microtopography of Co-microsphere. XRD results of the Co-microsphere illustrated that, the crystal shape of Co-microspheres were affect by the pH value. Otherwise, the SEM results indicated that the flower-like cobalt microspheres were prepared while the pH value was 12. In addition, the microtopography of Co-microsphere had a significant effect on microwave absorption property of Co@MWCNTs. The reflection loss results demonstrated that, the Co-12@MWCNTs had a good microwave absorption performance, while the maximum reflection loss was −38.94 dB and the effective absorbing bandwidth was 4.28 GHz at a thickness of 2 mm. Therefore, it is necessary to study the influence of pH value on the microtopography of Co-microspheres and microwave absorbing mechanism of Co@MWCNTs.© 2022 Elsevier LtdIn this work, CMOS inverters are subjected to electrical stress emulating a complete operation cycle and the shifts in the performance parameters (i.e., peak current and inversion voltage) evaluated. Moreover, degradation of the two MOSFETs is also measured as variations of their threshold voltage and mobility. The relationships between the observed transistors and circuit parameter shifts are explained in terms of the different device aging mechanisms (i.e., BTI, CHI and OFF-state) that are active depending on the voltages at the circuit terminals. Moreover, the combined effects of the aging mechanisms that are sequentially activated, at device and circuit levels, and their voltage dependence, are also discussed. Finally, a power law fitting of the inversion voltage degradation of the inverter is used to evaluate its variation at operating conditions.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties of polycrystalline La0.83Sr0.17Mn0.9Fe0.1−xZnxO3 (x=0, x=0.05) have been investigated by means of electron spin resonance, magnetic susceptibility, and Mössbauer measurements. Both samples show a clear ferromagnetic transition. The Curie temperature TC decreases on increasing Fe content. Mössbauer studies indicate that Fe in these compounds is in the trivalent high-spin state. The temperature evolution of the Mössbauer spectra at low temperatures (T<TC) is typical for ferromagnetic clusters with a wide distribution in size and magnetic correlation length. The inverse susceptibility of all the samples deviates from the Curie–Weiss law above TC, indicating the presence of fluctuations on approaching magnetic order. An anomalous downturn of the inverse susceptibility for x=0.05 significantly above TC and the concomitant observation of ferromagnetic resonance signals coexisting with the paramagnetic resonance up to approximately room temperature, is caused by a Griffiths-like behavior. This regime is characterized by the coexistence of ferromagnetic entities within the globally paramagnetic phase.© 2022 Elsevier LtdThe depletion mode Buried Chanel (BC) MOSFETs are known for their reduced Low Frequency Noise (LFN) as compared with normal Surface Channel (SC) MOSFETs in the application of Charge-Coupled Devices (CCDs) and CMOS imagers. To investigate the BC MOSFETs’ LFN mechanism comprehensively, we have developed a physical-based numerical device level simulator that accounts for the LFN contribution from each single individual oxide trap. During the simulation, the trapping current amplitude ΔID matrices are extracted efficiently by the potential-current based Green's function. The trap capture and emission time constants are calculated via Shockley–Read–Hall (SRH) theory with Wentzel-Kramers-Brillouin (WKB) tunneling approximation. To valid our simulator, both BC and SC type MOSFETs are designed and fabricated in a CMOS imager compatible process for noise measurement and comparison. Quantitatively agreement has been obtained for both types of MOSFETs in terms of LFN spectra on a wide biasing range from the extracted process-based oxide traps’ geometry and energy sites. It reveals that the low noise operation of BC MOSFETs is inseparable from both the ΔID suppression effect and the traps’ activation energy.© 2022 Elsevier LtdIn this work the gate-all-around nanosheet transistor is analyzed at high temperatures, from analog point of view. At first, the gate-all-around nanosheet (NS) behavior is compared with reported omega-gate nanowire (NW) transistors, at room temperature. It is worth noting that the nanosheets devices present a stronger electrostatic coupling between gate and channel (lower short channel effect -SCE), and higher intrinsic voltage gain, AV (better Early voltage) when compared with NW devices (60 dB for NS and 55 db for NW, with L = 200 nm). Therefore, the second part of this work focuses on the analog study only for NS transistors (with different metal gate stacks), presenting the trade-off between transistor efficiency and unit gain frequency, fT from room temperature to 200 °C. The obtained results are very promising for both gate stack transistors, where values of transistor efficiency about 37 V−1 (T = 25 °C and L = 200 nm) and fT about 260 GHz (T = 25 °C and L = 28 nm) are obtained. The optimal application point was obtained at the transition from moderate to strong inversion.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The thermodynamic properties of a spatially anisotropic spin-1/2 Heisenberg model for a Cu5 pentameric molecule is studied through exact diagonalization. The elementary geometry of the finite lattice is defined on nanomolecules consisting of an hourglass structure of two corner-sharing scalene triangles which are related by inversion symmetry. This microscopic magnetic model is quite suitable to describe the molecular nanomagnetic compound Cu5-NIPA. The ground-state phase diagram, as well as the corresponding total magnetization, are obtained as a function of the anisotropic exchange interactions and the external magnetic field. The thermodynamic behavior of the model at finite temperatures is also studied and the corresponding magnetocaloric effects are analyzed for various values of the Hamiltonian parameters.© 2022We present a feature detection method for adaptive grid refinement in hierarchical grids used in process technology computer-aided design topography simulations based on the local curvature of the wafer surface. The proposed feature detection method enables high-accuracy simulations whilst significantly reducing the run-time, because the grid is only refined in areas with high curvatures. We evaluate our feature detection method by simulating selective epitaxial growth of silicon-germanium fins in narrow oxide trenches. The performance and accuracy of the simulation is assessed by comparing the results to experimental data showing good agreement.© 2022 The Author(s)Sigma-phase Fe0.525Cr0.455Ni0.020 alloy was studied by means of Mössbauer spectrometry in the temperature range of 5–293 K. The average center shift, <CS>, determined from the recorded Mössbauer spectra was shown to significantly deviate from the Debye model in the temperature range below ∼50 K i.e. in the magnetic state of the sample. The deviation is obviously due to the effect of magnetism on the lattice dynamics of the studied sample. Analysis of the < CS > -data in the paramagnetic phase in terms of the Debye model yielded the value of 437(7) K for the Debye temperature.© 2022A series of multilayers consisting of Co2FeSi (CFS) and Pt are sputtered. Perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) is demonstrated in the CFS/Pt multilayers with CFS thickness in the range of 0.4 ∼ 1.0 nm. The individual thicknesses of Pt spacer and Co2FeSi layer as well as interface numbers are shown to strongly affect PMA. Two-step switching is observed in the multilayers with 8 nm Pt spacer, showing typically decoupled feature. The effective perpendicular anisotropy energy is determined to be in the order of 106 erg/cm3. The interfacial perpendicular anisotropy energy density is estimated to be 0.32 erg/cm2. The magnetic reversal with multi-domain feature is observed with increasing interface number. Sufficiently large saturation magnetization is derived from the multilayers with various repetitions. The thickness of magnetic dead layer is found to increase with the number of interface, which may be ascribed to more interdiffusion occurring at the multi-interfaces. Our results provide some useful information for the design and development of spintronic devices based on CFS/Pt multilayers.© 2022 The Author(s)Low-bias etching of silicon (Si) using sulfur hexafluoride (SF6) plasma is a valuable tool in the manufacturing of electronic devices and microelectromechanical systems (MEMS). This kind of etching offers an almost isotropic etching behaviour, since the low voltage bias does not provide enough vertical acceleration and kinetic energy to the ions. Due to this near-isotropic behavior, the aforementioned plasma etching finds application as an alternative to wet etching in, e.g., MEMS and optical applications since it provides a cleaner and more precisely controllable process. However, the degree of isotropy and, consequently, the final surface profile remain difficult to control. In this work, we apply a three-dimensional feature-scale topography simulation to low-bias SF6 etching experiments in Si to aid in process development and to investigate the physical etching mechanisms which govern the final surface geometry. We achieve this by accurately reproducing three distinct experimental data sets and by discussing the meaning of the phenomenological model parameters involved in the topography simulation in detail. We show that our phenomenological top-down flux calculation approach more accurately reproduces the experimental results than conventional strictly isotropic and bottom-up approaches. The reactor loading effect is taken into account as a general reduction of the model etch rates, which is supported by comparing simulated to experimentally determined etch depths in different loading regimes. Our model is also able to accurately reproduce reported trench geometries for different mask openings and etch times using a single parameter set for a given reactor configuration. Hence, we propose that the model parameters, in particular the average effective sticking coefficient, can be taken as a proxy of the reactor configuration. We provide an empirical relationship linking the average sticking coefficient of a reactor recipe to a measurable degree of isotropy of etched geometries. This empirical relationship can be used in practice to (i) estimate the average effective sticking coefficient of independent experiments and to (ii) fine-tune the etched geometry.© 2022In this work, the impact of switching the source and drain on the low-frequency noise of Gate-All-Around (GAA) Vertical Nanowire (VNW) n- and pMOSFETs fabricated on bulk silicon wafers is investigated. Switching the role of the electrodes results in an increase in the absolute value of the threshold voltage, a higher subthreshold slope and maximum transconductance. For the p-channel devices, significantly lower 1/f noise is observed in reverse operation compared with the normal forward configuration. Considering the mobility fluctuations origin of the 1/f noise, this indicates a pronounced impact of the choice of the source/drain contact on the conduction in the p-type silicon nanowires. On the other hand, little effect on the noise behaviour has been found from the in-situ boron doping density in the NWs. For the n-channel FETs, qualitatively similar results have been obtained with respect to the 1/f noise PSD. At the same time, the dominant flicker noise mechanism changes from Δμ dominated in F operation to rather Δn in R mode.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The effect of compression and heat treatment on the microstructural morphology and magnetic characteristics of the imperfectly crystallized yttrium–iron–garnet (Y3Fe5O12, YIG) matrix was observed by optimizing the sol–gel synthesis process. In particular, among the various temperatures when calcination was performed at 850 °C, we observed that an ε-phase Fe2O3 with a giant coercive field but low saturation magnetization was formed in the YIG matrix.© 2022A novel PDMS-bimetallic magnetic nanoparticle thin films based magnetic actuators have been fabricated using an eco-friendly cost-effective facile method. The magnetic thin films have received greater attention for their variety of specialized applications, particularly in the medical field. Actuators find very broad applications in microfabrication, microelectronics, medicine, and lab-on-a-chip systems. The FeM(Co/Ni/Cu/Zn) bimetallic magnetic nanoparticles have been synthesized through greener Mimosa Pudica leaf extract. These synthesized nanoparticles are combined with PDMS polymer to form flexible thin films to fabricate magnetic actuators. Optical characterization of the FeM nanoparticles showed a broad plasmon absorption band around 1100–1600 nm, and their corresponding thin-film absorption band shifted negligibly. The magnetic investigations showed that the obtained nanoparticles and their thin films are ferromagnetic with a significant remanent magnetization. Particularly Fe-Cu magnetic NPs and their FeCu@PDMS film displayed 90.82, 55.79 emu/g Ms and 33.34, 11.68 emu/g Mr values at 300 K respectively. These results make the FeM@PDMS flexible films are promising for advanced magnetics memory devices and magnetic induced actuators fabrication.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.We have presented a systematic study on structural, magnetic, and magnetodielectric (MD) properties of Y-type Ba2-xSrxMg2Fe11.48Mn0.52O22 (0 < x ≤ 1) hexaferrite. The temperature-dependent DC magnetization results exhibit Sr substitution enhances spin ordering transition temperature TI (TII) from 52 K (210 K) to 73 K (315 K). AC magnetic characterization suggests the presence of single cluster-glass transition (Tf1) at 45 K for x = 0.25. Interestingly, for higher Sr substitution x > 0.25, double cluster class transition is observed. The freezing temperature Tf1 decreases with an increase in x, while Tf2 increases substantially with x. The saturation magnetization (Ms) value is found to be decreased from 28.88 emu/g for x = 0.25 to 26.28 emu/g for x = 0.75 at 300 K. However, for x > 0.75 this value increases. Raman modes at 78, 135, 335, and 694 cm−1 show a gradual increase in Raman shift up to x = 0.75, but a drastic decrease is seen for x > 0.75. Along with enhanced magnetic properties, Sr doped sample shows better MD properties. The MD% value at RT increases with doping concentration up to x = 0.75 (MD% ∼1.2); beyond that, its value decreases. The maximum value of frequency-independent MD% and magnetoloss ML% of the BSMFM25 is found to be ∼3.5 and ∼0.2, respectively in the presence of a 1.3 T field at 100 Hz. The H-dependent MD exhibits symmetric anomalies close to the H-induced transition indicating an exchange-striction phenomenon in the samples.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, a simple ferrofluids (FFs) bearing, which consists of a rotor, a stator embedded with a cylinder magnet, and FFs is proposed. By controlling the volume of FFs, two types of liquid structures of the ring and droplet shapes are formed on the stator surface. Models of the bearing for the static supporting force are established and validated by experiments. The multicycle loading-unloading of the FFs bearings as well as the dynamic supporting force are performed. Results show that the static supporting force of the bearings can be predicted approximately by the theoretical model. Multicycle loading-unloading tests indicate that force values with excellent repeated accuracy can be achieved only within a limited range of oscillation in gap height. Compared with the FFs droplet bearing, the rotation speed manifests more significant impact on the dynamic supporting force of the ring structured bearing. Such design presents a new thought for micro-electro-mechanical system (MEMS) that requires precision supporting or frictionless bearing.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we employ the Landau–Lifshitz–Bloch equation to study the ferromagnetic resonance of a magnetic nanoparticle assumed in a mono-domain with uniaxial anisotropy. We consider a constant magnetic field applied perpendicularly to the easy axis of anisotropy. We investigated the temperature effect on the resonance spectrum through the complex magnetic susceptibility tensor. We found a decrease in the resonance frequency as the temperature is incremented and a decrement in the resonance field range when the driven frequency increases.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.This work has examined the influence of grain size in sintered Sm2(Co,Fe,Cu,Zr)17-type permanent magnets on the growth of an internal oxidation zone (IOZ). Two magnets of similar composition but with average grain sizes of 46 μm and 170 μm respectively, were exposed to temperatures of 500 °C in air for times up to 1000 h. Overall, the smaller grained magnet showed a reduced growth rate of the IOZ (∼39.01 μm2h−1) compared to the larger grained magnet (∼48.95 μm2h−1) and a smaller irredeemable loss in Br (3.11%) after 1000 h. However, growth rate of the IOZ is shown to depend on the growth direction, in respect to the crystallographic c-axis of the matrix phase. The smaller grain size was shown to be most effective at retarding the growth of IOZ under surfaces parallel to the c-axis. It is proposed therefore, that a smaller grained sintered magnet may be the microstructure of choice for use in demanding, high temperature applications, where a protective coating is not always a possibility, such as a high-performance electrical machine with a surface mount PM rotor. Orientation of the exposed face must also be considered to minimise the resultant magnetic induction loss caused by oxidation.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Sn-doped MnNiGe alloy of nominal composition MnNiGe0.915Sn0.085 has been examined through structural and magnetic investigations. Sn-doping stabilizes the hexagonal structure (with P63/mmc space group) at room temperature. On cooling from room temperature, it first orders antiferromagnetically (with commensurate structure) around 185 K. Further cooling results in a structural change of martensitic type around 145 K. The observed structural transition is also found to be associated with a simultaneous magnetic transition from high temperature commensurate antiferromagnetic state to low temperature incommensurate antiferromagnetic state. Both conventional and inverse magnetocaloric effect (MCE), with peak values of −6.01 J/kg-K and 6.56 J/kg-K for 0 to 5 tesla of changing magnetic field, have been visible around the magnetic and structural transitions, respectively. A significant effect of external hydrostatic pressure on the magnetic and MCE behaviors has also been observed.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic Barkhausen Noise (MBN) signals are adoped for the non-destructive evaluation of residual stress and plastic deformation due to their sensitivity to micro defects in material. Such MBN signals originate from discontinuous magnetization jumps accompanied by blocking of the pinning effect on the magnetic domain. This paper analyzes the influencing factors and laws of MBN non-destructive evaluation by numerically simulating discontinuous magnetization jumps. The pinning effect on the movement of the magnetic domain is considered as a random barrier field with a Gaussian distribution, and the discontinuous magnetization jumps are described as a transition in the local magnetization state. Solving Maxwell equations under varying current excitations based on the finite difference method allows simulating the magnetization evolution during non-destructive testing based on an iterative algorithm to realize MBN signal analysis. The theoretical analyses combined with existing experimental data show that the simulations can predict the influence of the excitation frequency, plastic deformation and stress level on the MBN signals, while also give explanations on some basic experimental phenomena and laws. This proposed theoretical simulation method is available to describe the mechanisms and causes of the MBN signals from a microscopic perspective for magnetic jump events.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the melanin-doped MgB2 samples were prepared under the same condition at different sintering temperatures. The XRD quantitative analysis indicates an increase in crystallite size with increasing sintering temperature. The pinning mechanism tends to be a collective of surface and point pinning in an indication of the role of the impurities and secondary phases in the forming of flux pinning centers. The electrical and magnetic measurements show significant enhancement on critical current density obtained from the doped samples compared to the pure ones. Enhancing critical current density and critical fields depend on the sintering conditions. Sintering at low-temperature results in a high critical current density and critical field values. The resistivity and the related superconducting parameters measurements were also completed.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Experimental and computational studies are performed on Co2FeGe Heusler alloy. Significantly large saturation magnetization (Ms), Curie temperature (Tc) and spin wave stiffness constant (D) of 6.1 µB/f.u., 1073 K and 10.4 nm2-meV respectively were observed experimentally. The experimental values of Tc and D are reported first time and are among the highest reported values of the same in Heusler alloy domain. The Co2FeGe Heusler alloy strictly follows Slater-Pauling (SP) rule, however, the minor experimental deviation from its SP value is justified by doing full-potential density functional calculations, which gives more accurate result when electron–electron correlation parameter (U) is taken into account with conventional generalized gradient approximation (GGA) scheme. Effect of lattice strain and U on the total and atom-specific magnetic moments and spin-polarization is studied in detail from which we conclude that they have a key role in the deviation of the experimental results from the expected theoretical values. Dynamical stability of the alloy is studied from the phonon dispersion curve and the effect of U is found to be distinct on the phonon density of states. Role of different types of atomic site disorders on the saturation magnetization is also explored computationally and related to the experimental results. The computational results provide in-depth and detailed study followed by experimental validations.© 2022 Elsevier LtdWe present a study of Sm3Sb3Zn2O14 (SSZO) through magnetization and specific heat capacity Cp(T) measurements. SSZO contains well separated planes of Sm3+ magnetic ions on a Kagomé lattice. Though our magnetic susceptibility (where the data are limited down to 2K) does not show any anomaly, the Cp(T) data which have been taken down to 0.35 K reveal a broad maximum at T∼1.5K followed by a sharp peak at T∼0.5K indicative of short-range correlations and long-range order, respectively.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.It is shown that for nearly all magnets only two types of magnon dispersions occur. For the first group of magnets, magnon dispersions are as for the linear spin chain (a sine-function of wave-vector for antiferromagnets but a sine-function squared for ferromagnets), quite independent of the lattice structure. Since the observed magnon dispersions are specific to the individual domain, the identical magnon dispersions show that the domains of all magnets are very similar in that all spins are perfectly aligned along the domain axis. The linear chain dispersion is explained by a strong coupling of the spins to the one-dimensionally ordered boson field in each domain. The bosons were identified as essentially magnetic dipole radiation generated essentially through stimulated emission by the precessing spins. In the ordered state of the boson field, the bosons are in a coherent and one-dimensional state, like the radiation field of a LASER. For the second group of magnets, magnon dispersions exhibit an analytical crossover from a power function of wave vector (∼qx) plus a gap to the dispersion of the linear spin chain. Occasionally it turns out to be necessary to add a phase shift in the argument of the sine function. The functionality of the local exchange interactions is restricted to determine the relative orientation of neighboring spins, i.e. to decide between the sine-function and the sine-function squared and to define the absolute values of the magnon energies. As a consequence, instead by exchange interactions, magnon dispersions have to be characterized by four parameters: the gap, the pre-factor of the ∼qx power function, the amplitude of the sine-function and the phase-shift in the argument of the sine function. For MnF2 the temperature dependence of these four parameters is evaluated, as far as experimental data are available. The exponent x is the only parameter that is characteristic of the dynamic dimensionality of the system and is temperature-independent. For MnF2 with a half-integer spin of S = 5/2 and a one-dimensional dynamic symmetry x = 3/2.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Domain walls (DWs) in antiferromagnets (AFMs) usually show unique internal spin textures and behaviors compared to their counterparts in ferromagnets (FMs). Besides the well-known experimental difficulties in detecting AFM DWs, theoretical understanding of their complex behaviors is still to be elaborated. Here we develop an analytical model to describe planar spiral DWs in an AFM sandwiched between two FM layers. By examining the system's energy profiles in its configuration space, we construct a phase diagram of the system and show how the behaviors of the DWs depend critically on the interlayer coupling between FMs and AFMs. Our results clarify the recent inconsistent experimental observations on the AFM planar spiral DWs, and provide new insights toward AFM spintronic applications.© 2022 Elsevier LtdThis work is concerned with the preparation of PalladiumSelenide (PdSe) via a simple technique that is dip coating based multilayer deposition technique as cathode for dye-sensitized solar cell (DSSC). The influence of Pd content at the fixed content of Se on the performance of the device has been investigated. The XRD analysis reveals that the dominant phase of Pd and minor phase of Se exist in the sample. The photovoltaic measurement results reveals that the DSSC based PdSe CE demonstrates comparable power conversion efficiency (η) compared with that of the Pt based device. The highest η of the device utilizing PdSe cathode with the Se:Pd ratio of 1:6 was 3.14 %, while that of the device with Pt cathode was 4.83%. The PdSe CE based device with the ratio of 1:6 owns the highest η due to the highest IPCE in the visible region. In conclusion, the performance of the device is found to be significantly affected by Pd content.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic and electronic properties of the Co-based spinel oxides ACo2O4 (A = Be, Mg, Ca, Zn, Cd) were studied within GGA + U approach. It was found that the Co3+ ion is in a low-spin state due to the effect of the crystal field of octahedral symmetry. It is shown that Co3+ ion undergoes a spin-state transition into the high-spin state under the critical pressure of P = −10 GPa – −20 GPa. This pressure-induced spin-state transition is caused by the redistribution of electrons between the t2g- and eg-orbitals arising with increasing interatomic distances. The role of interatomic distances between Co3+ ion and its ligands is discussed. Thin-film form also favors the appearance of a high-spin state of Co3+ ion. At the same critical pressure, there is a sharp increase in the majority spin bandgap and a sharp decrease in the minority spin bandgap. These findings allow manipulating the spin state of Co3+ ions and bandgap width through the pressure or strain arising in thin films.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.To develop a heat transfer device based on a temperature-sensitive magnetic fluid (TSMF), it is necessary to investigate its flow and heat transfer characteristics. This study used the fractional step method to numerically investigate the flow and heat transfer characteristics of TSMF between parallel plates with small spacing when the solenoidal magnetic field is applied. Due to the influence of the magnetic field and temperature, the flow characteristics of the TSMF between the plates are significantly different from ordinary working fluids such as oil, and the fluid near the plate flows faster than the fluid near the center. We used numerical analysis to analyze the formation of this phenomenon and investigated the influence of dimensionless Prandtl number and magnetic effect parameter on this phenomenon. As the result, the heat transfer increased with the increase of the magnetic effect parameter which is affected by the magnetic field or the distance between the plates. The center between the two plates in the heating region formed a vortex under high Prandtl number conditions, and the generation of the vortex enhanced the heat transfer.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Magnesium and yttrium doped manganese ferrite nanoparticles based on chemical formula MgxMn1-xYxFe2-xO4 (x = 0.0, 0.05, 0.10, 0.15) have been prepared by chemical coprecipitation technique and calcined to 600 °C. Thereafter, structural, morphological, optical, magnetic and dielectric investigations were performed. X-ray diffraction (XRD) suggests that the grown composition is cubic spinel. Parameters like crystallite size, lattice parameter, unit cell volume and theoretical density were determined. The crystallite size has been found to decrease from 47 nm to 37 nm for x = 0.0–0.15 respectively. Scanning electron microscope (SEM) equipped with energy dispersive X-ray (EDAX) has been used to investigate the morphology and elemental analysis. The optical band gap calculated using Kubelk-Munk (K-M) method increases from 1.84 eV for x = 0 to 2.35 eV for x = 0.15. The spin characteristics investigated through electron paramagnetic resonance (EPR) spectroscopy gives various parameters like g-value, resonance field (Hr), peak to peak line width (Hpp) and relaxation time (τ2). The value of g is determined and comes out to be 2.086, 2.047, 2.043 and 2.039 for x = 0.0, 0.05, 0.10 and 0.15 respectively. The hysteresis curves obtained using vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) shows ferrimagnetic behavior of composition. Saturation magnetization (Ms), retentivity (Mr), coercivity (Hc), remenance ratio (Mr/Ms), anisotropy constant (K1) and Bohr magneton number (n) were determined. The value of saturation magnetization decreases from 18.12 emu/g to 7.4 emu/g when the doping concentration increases from x = 0.0 to 0.15. Mr and Hc values are small representing the superparamagnetism. Mr/Ms suggests the single domain structure. The dielectric constant shows frequency dispersion which is typical in spinel ferrites. The value of dielectric constant is high in pure manganese ferrite and decreases with increase in Mg2+ and Y3+ content e.g., at 2.5 kHz the value of dielectric constant is 62 for x = 0.0 and 22 for x = 0.15.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.A fine-tuning method of the resonance frequency for a magnetostrictive vibration energy harvester by changing the magnetization state, namely using the ΔE effect of Young's modulus, is proposed. Adjusting magnetization strength by changing the distance between the magnet for magnetization and the magnetostrictive vibration energy harvester in ten-millimeters revealed to tune the resonance frequency in 0.1 Hz order. A plot of the resonant frequency against the change in the flux density on the magnetostrictive material showed good agreement with a quadratic function approximation. A magnetostrictive vibration energy harvester tuned using this fine-tuning method could generate electricity stably for eleven days, suggesting the possibility of this fine-tuning method for long-term use.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The low temperature thermodynamics of correlated 1D fermionic models with spin and charge degrees of freedom is obtained by exact diagonalization (ED) of small systems and followed by density matrix renormalization group (DMRG) calculations that target the lowest hundreds of states {E(N)} at system size N instead of the ground state. Progressively larger N reaches T<0.05t in correlated models with electron transfer t between first neighbors and bandwidth 4t. The size dependence of the many-fermion basis is explicitly included for arbitrary interactions by scaling the partition function. The remaining size dependence is then entirely due to the energy spectrum {E(N)} of the model. The ED/DMRG method is applied to Hubbard and extended Hubbard models, both gapped and gapless, with Ne=N or N/2 electrons and is validated against exact results for the magnetic susceptibility χ(T) and entropy S(T) per site. Some limitations of the method are noted. Special attention is given to the bond-order-wave phase of the extended Hubbard model with competing interactions and low T thermodynamics sensitive to small gaps.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The miniaturization of systems devices based on the magnetoelectric effect requires a better understanding of the factors that rule the coupling at the interface between different materials in magnetoelectric composites. In this context, this work presents the influence of stress generated at the interface PZT-CFO on multiferroic properties and the magnetodielectric coupling of the PbZr0,2Ti0,8O3/CoFe2O4 heterostructures fabricated by RF-Sputtering technique. It was found that tensile stress generated in the PZT/CFO interface modifies both XRD patterns and ferromagnetic hysteresis loop, inducing an additional contribution to the magnetic anisotropy compared with CFO and PZT layers. In addition, the dielectric properties of the PZT/CFO system are ruled by interfacial charges that accumulate in the PZT-CFO interface. On the other hand, changes in dielectric permittivity as a function of magnetic field (i.e., the magnetodielectric effects) result of the association between the ferroelectric domain movement modulated by stress on the PZT phase due to magnetostriction generated by the CFO phase and the magnetoelectric polarization contribution properly characterized by changes in the remnant polarization due to a magnetic field.© 2022 The Author(s)Ferromagnetic thin films were synthesized by implantation of Fe ions with energies between 40 keV and 120 keV in 60 nm of polycrystalline Pd. The possibility to engineer magnetic properties in such films through the Fe concentration depth profile was demonstrated. In-plane magnetic moments were measured both while varying the sample temperature at constant applied magnetic field, and varying the applied field at constant temperature. All samples were explicitly shown to exhibit ferromagnetism at sufficiently low temperature, with threshold temperatures in the range from 35 K to 140 K. Saturation moments at 5 K were between 3.5 and 4.6 Bohr magnetons per implanted Fe atom for implantation fluences between 5 × 1015 and 2.3 × 1016 ions/cm2. Coercivities were between 1 and 3 mT. The samples included in the study were carefully characterized with Rutherford backscattering spectrometry, and selected samples with elastic recoil detection analysis and cross-sectional transmission electron microscopy, providing information on Fe concentration profiles, impurity fractions, structure as well as sample modification during implantation. A new model was proposed to calculate the scaling of the films’ magnetic moments with temperature from the Fe concentration profiles. The model qualitatively reproduced the data and quantitative differences were explained. It can thus be applied to predict the modification of the magnetic moment at a given temperature for a similar film when the implantation parameters are varied.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.A well-defined analytical magnetic field pattern is of merit in various fields of technological applications, especially in magnetic resonance imaging (MRI). Since the field inherently depends on the geometrical form of its generator, it is essential to put forth a convenient current coil structure to obtain a specific field pattern. This article is about the mathematical formulation, design, and production of a special spheroidal coil generating a magnetic field that linearly changes along its solenoidal axis. We proved that a specifically designed air coil helically wound on a spheroid, induces a perfectly linear field gradient. We also showed that the characteristic field pattern does not suffer from any changes in the geometrical size of the coil.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The La0.66Sr0.34MnO3 (LSMO) films with thickness 200–330 nm have been grown at 750 °C on lattice-mismatched (001)-plane oriented yttria-stabilized zirconia (YSZ) using radio frequency magnetron sputtering technique. The films demonstrated columnar growth structure characterized by coexistance of grains with the averaged diameter of about 50 nm and well defined crystallographic orientations of a pseudocubic LSMO lattice, namely, (001)LSMO[110]//(001)YSZ[100] and (110)LSMO[110;100]//(100)YSZ[100]. Alternating current (AC) magnetic susceptibility, χ(H) ∼ dM/dH, and magnetoresistance, MR(H), of the films were measured at 78 and 295 K with DC magnetic field (H) applied either in-plane or out-of-plane. Unusually sharp peaks at H = ±HSW and clearly defined switching behaviour have been indicated at 78 K in both the χ(H) and MR(H) plots. The HSW values were found to increase with the out-of-plane angle, α, according to the relationship HSW = HSW0/cosα (HSW0 = 4.0 and 1.4 kA/m at 78 and 295 K, respectively) while negligible variation of HSW has been indicated by varying direction of H in a film plane. The investigations revealed close correlation between χ(H) and low-field magnetoresistance. The observed angle-dependent peak-like χ(H) anomalies have been explained assuming magnetization reversal of the multigrain films governed by interparticle interaction and pinning of magnetic domains at grain boundaries. Unusual pit-like anomaly of the transverse biased susceptibility (TS) indicated at H = ±HSW has been explained in a framework of the TS theory developed for isolated uniaxal ferromagnetic particles assuming coexistance of grains with several fixed easy axis orientations in a film plane.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The role of magnon-phonon coupling in the low-temperature behavior of the spin Seebeck effect (SSE) in YIG/Pt has been puzzling for more than a decade. To elucidate the origin of the anomalous peak around 80 K, we investigate the temperature evolution of SSE, spin Hall magnetoresistance (SMR), and magnetic anisotropy in the same YIG/Pt heterostructure. We find that these effects, along with magnetic damping, show the peaks at the same temperature (∼80 K). This simultaneous occurrence, where no heat is applied in the case of SMR, rules out the phonon-magnon drag related origin of SSE in the YIG/Pt system. We further show that the intrinsic surface anisotropy behavior in YIG is responsible for controlling the SSE, SMR, and magnetic damping in the YIG/Pt structure. Our findings not only help to understand these effects fundamentally but also provide an effective way for improving them by manipulating the surface magnetic anisotropy for spin caloritronic applications.© 2022In the industrial low-temperature grain-oriented (LTGO) silicon steel normalized sheet, there are a certain number of fine equiaxed grains distributed along the rolling direction. However, the formation mode of the fine equiaxed grains and the influence of them on magnetic properties have not yet been well understood. In the present work, the above issues were investigated using field emission scanning electron microscopy (SEM), field emission transmission electron microscopy (TEM), X-ray diffraction (XRD), high temperature confocal scanning laser microscopy (HTCSLM), etc. It was found that (1) the fine equiaxed grains could be divided into many grain colonies according to grain orientation, and within each colony, the grain orientations were similar; (2) during normalizing, the fine equiaxed grains were mainly generated inside the elongated deformed grains which contained a large number of subgrains; (3) the amount of α → γ phase transformation during the normalizing was very small. Therefore, it can be inferred that the fine equiaxed grains were mainly produced by subgrain coalescence, rather than by phase transformation. Moreover, γ-grain (〈1 1 1〉 // ND) colonies with ideal grain size could be formed in the fine equiaxed grain regions after ideal normalizing process. Due to the heredity of microstructure and texture, γ-grain colonies, which can facilitate the formation of the precise Goss texture ({1 1 0} 〈0 0 1〉 ) during high-temperature annealing, were formed in the primary recrystallized matrix after cold rolling, decarburizing and nitriding, as a result, the magnetic properties of the final product were significantly improved. The present work can provide help to further improve the understandings of the microstructural evolution in the LTGO silicon steel normalized sheet and the influence of normalized microstructure on magnetic properties.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.A novel inner-ringed multi-pitch rods core structure for lightweight induction coil sensor design, in which the higher-permeability magnetic rods are located in the inner ring of the induction coil, is proposed. The abbreviation for the novel core structure is “IRMPR core structure”. It is theoretically shown that the induction coil sensor sensitivity of the IRMPR core structure is equal to that of the single-rod solid structure. Compared with the traditional single-rod solid magnetic core structure, the mass of magnetic core of the IRMPR core structure is reduced more than 28%, however, the sensor sensitivity is not sacrificed. Besides, the performance of the IRMPR core structures with permalloy and Zn-Mn alloy magnetic cores were tested under 500Hz and 1–22kHz band conditions, and the performance was improved compared with the single-rod structure of the same materials. The results demonstrate the potential for IRMPR core structure application to various induction coils with different inner-ringed magnetic core materials under broadband conditions. The study also provides a method to vary the sensitivity and resonant frequency of the induction coil sensor by changing the magnetic core arrangement. Furthermore, thinner magnetic rod is more cost-effective and IRMPR core structure will be more compact for the integration of the sensors and their electronics within a single housing.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, different graphene (GR)/Fe93.5Si3.5Gd3 composite powders were prepared via high-energy ball milling. Through the analysis of the structural morphology and electromagnetic parameters of the composite powder, the effects of ball milling time and graphene on the wave absorption properties of the composite powder were investigated. It is shown that in the ball-milled composite powder, graphene is compounded with the alloy powder in an amorphous state, and the particle size of the composite powder decreases with the increase of ball milling time. Moreover, the addition of graphene and the introduction of high-energy ball milling did improve the electromagnetic parameters of the composite powder. With other conditions guaranteed to be the same, the real part of dielectric constant of the composite powder rises by up to 472.94% and the real part of permeability increases by up to 23.80%. The optimized change of electromagnetic parameters increases the conduction loss of the composite powder, together with the combined effect of spatial polarization and orientation polarization, it increases the dielectric loss of the composite powder. The magnetic loss of the composite powder is also greatly improved by the change of the main mode of magnetic loss to natural resonance. The increase in dielectric loss and magnetic loss has greatly improved the electromagnetic wave absorption performance of the composite powder. Among them, at 0.3 ∼ 8.5 GHz, the electromagnetic loss of 1.0 wt% GR/Fe93.5Si3.5Gd3 ball milled for 24 h reaches 1.20 ∼ 11.78. With other conditions being the same, it is respectively 718.06% and 708.22% higher than the composite powder without graphene and the composite powder with the shortest ball milling time, showing excellent microwave attenuating performance.© 2022The layered perovskite YBaCuFeO5 (YBCFO) is able to adopt chiral magnetic order up to unexpectedly high temperatures, paving the way to strong magnetoelectric coupling at room temperature. In this perovskite A-site cations are fully ordered whereas the occupancy of the B-sites strongly depend on the preparation process. Though the structure is not geometrically frustrated, the presence of partial Fe3+/Cu2+ disorder at the B-sites produces magnetic frustration. In an effort to increase the spin–orbit coupling in the system, we have synthesized and studied YBaCuFe0.95Mn0.05O5 in single crystal form, where the highly symmetric Fe3+ ions (3d5) are partially substituted with Jahn-Teller active 3d4 Mn3+ ions. We report the structural and magnetic properties of a highly ordered single crystal of this layered perovskite, which are presented in comparison with a polycrystalline specimen (three times more disordered). Single crystal neutron diffraction measurements reveal two collinear magnetic phases and the lack of incommensurate spiral order. The magnetic phases and transitions found in the crystal grown by the traveling solvent floating zone (TSFZ) method are fully described and analyzed in the light of its high level of Fe/Cu cationic order (∼90%).© 2022 Elsevier B.V.A fast calculation method of magnetic flux density in axial flux permanent magnet (AFPM) machine is presented. This method is based on an original combination of magnetic charges concept, image theory, and relative permeance functions. Using this combined approach, significant 3D effects, which are present in axial flux machines such as curvature and edge effects as well as slotting effects due to stator slots, are considered. The main electromagnetic specifications of the AFPM machine such as cogging torque, Back Electromotive Force (EMF), and local air-gap flux density are calculated accurately in very short times. To validate this approach, an original prototype of double stator ironless rotor AFPM machine with adjustable air-gap is used. Experimental protocol including measurements of global characteristics (EMF, Torque) and measurements of local field density is presented. The obtained results are in good agreement with the experimental measurements which allows validating the proposed computation method.© 2022Texture transition of shear bands in Goss–oriented grains of normalized Fe–3 %Si sheets with different diffused angles along φ2 axis during cold rolling was investigated by quasi in–situ electron back–scatter diffraction (EBSD) analysis. The diffused angle along φ2 axis of {1 1 1} 〈1 1 2〉 deformed matrix from initial Goss grains with φ2 axis diffusion below 10° decreases after cold rolling. Shear bands formed in {1 1 1} 〈1 1 2〉 deformed matrix have a similar diffusion along φ2 axis to the deformed matrix, and the diffused angle along φ1 axis is insignificant. The φ2–diffused angle evolution of shear band and deformed matrix in initially diffused Goss grains during cold rolling were analyzed using a crystal plasticity simulation.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In recent years, magnetic RAMs have stimulated considerable research interest due to its high area-density and low leakage-power with comparable speed that makes it a strong contender for possible replacement of conventional RAMs. However, the operational speed of MRAM is relatively lower than the SRAMs. Advanced switching mechanism such as Spin Transfer Torque (STT), Voltage-Controlled Magnetic Anisotropy (VCMA), Magneto Electric (ME) effect, and Spin-Orbit Torque (SOT) has been introduced to further improve the speed of operation. This paper explores the comparative analysis of STT and SOT-based MRAMs for the application of Large Last-Level Caches (L3Cs). It will give an insight into the MRAM from device to architectural level, in-aspect of performance parameters such as read-write energy consumption, leakage power, chip-area and read-write latency. This research work is carried out through a benchmarked simulation framework, starting from device to architectural level. At the cell level, it is observed that STT-MRAM takes 50% less area with 74% reduction in leakage power dissipation as compared to SOT-MRAM. However, the SOT-MRAMs is 4× faster than the STT-MRAM. At the architectural level, SOT-MRAM outperforms STT-MRAM in terms of read/ write energy and latency at the cost of marginal chip-area and leakage-power. Overall, in comparison to its conventional counterpart (SRAMs), SOT MRAMs are proved to be a superior candidate at a large size of LLCs in all aspects.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The relationship between the magnetization and magnetic moment at each Fe site in Sm(Fe1−xCox)12 compounds and their temperature dependence were investigated via synchrotron Mössbauer spectroscopy. The enhancement in the Fe magnetic moments in the Sm(Fe1−xCox)12 compounds with increasing Co content was observed at a similar rate as the increment in their saturation magnetization at 300 K. We found that the magnitudes of the Fe magnetic moments vary in a descending order: 8i > 8j > 8f, and they are independent of the Co content because the variation is caused by the magneto-volume effect. The curvatures of the temperature dependence of the Fe-sublattice magnetic moments are larger and also vary in the order of 8i > 8j > 8f because the enhancements in the exchange coupling strength decrease in the same order.© 2022 Elsevier LtdAn improved NMOS triggered dual-direction silicon controlled rectifier (NMOS-DDSCR) device is fabricated in 0.18 μm Silicon-on-Insulator (SOI) Bipolar-CMOS-DMOS (BCD) process. The proposed NMOS-DDSCR structure is designed based on the conventional DDSCR structure, which adds two additional auxiliary trigger paths achieved by NMOS transistors, diodes, and RC coupling circuits. The internal mechanism of NMOS-DDSCR is analyzed using two-dimension (2D) TCAD simulations, and the ESD performance is characterized by means of transmission line pulse (TLP) and very-fast TLP (VFTLP) measurements. Superior to the conventional DDSCR, the proposed NMOS-DDSCR exhibits a lower trigger voltage of 8.2 V, a higher human-body model (HBM) level of 4.0 kV, and a smaller leakage current of about 160 nA for low power application. In addition, the proposed NMOS-DDSCR has lower overshoot voltage, faster turn-on speed, and sufficient latchup immunity, which can be applied to ESD protection of 5.0 V input and output (I/O) pins in smart power integrated circuit (SPIC).© 2022An in-situ high temperature EM sensor was used to detect changes in the microstructural state caused by recovery and recrystallisation for IF steel samples during heat treatment. The relative permeability values determined from the sensor measurements at the different heat treatment temperatures showed the expected strong influence of temperature on the magnetic measurement. The relative permeability values determined at each temperature increased during the recovery and recrystallisation processes and correlated well with the different microstructural states determined by EBSD. The results show that the EM sensor measurement approach shows significant potential for in-situ microstructure monitoring during the annealing process of IF steels, with larger magnetic parameter changes between microstructural states at the higher temperatures typical of commercial annealing practice. In addition it is seen that the magnetic, and EM sensor, measurements show more sensitivity to recovery than hardness measurements, and can also monitor recrystallisation.© 2022The cut edges of electrical steel NGO laminations in electric motors experience mechanically induced plastic deformation and residual elastic stress, which deteriorate the magnetic performance of the material. This deterioration is accounted for empirically in electric machine modelling tools by introducing a ‘build factor’ on the iron losses. Currently, a wide range of cut edge deteriorated widths have been reported in the literature, depending on the method used for characterisation, the material and the cutting method. In this paper, cut edge plastic damage characterisation was carried out using EBSD kernel average misorientation (KAM) maps and nano-indentation to quantify the magnitude and width of the plastic damage at the cut edge for a stamped tooth of a segmented stator and a guillotined single sheet tester (SST) sample. The relationship between the EBSD KAM and nano-hardness values and plastic strain was found using tensile samples tested to varying applied strain levels. Therefore, the plastic strain gradient with respect to distance from the cut edge was determined. It was found that both EBSD and nano-indentation gave similar predictions of effective plastic strain values and damage width: up to 1.45–1.50 at stamped cut edge over 180 µm width and up to 1.35–1.4 at guillotine cut edge over 250 µm width. The relationships between the magnetic performance and elastic stress, plastic strain, and plastic strain with elastic stress were determined using single sheet tester (SST) measurements. In addition, SST 3D FEA models of the cut edge sample were built using COMSOL Multi-Physics software considering a single layer for plastic damage only and two layers for plastic damage + elastic stress and elastic stress. The modelling results for the guillotine cut edge SST samples were compared to measured data. It was found that to obtain accurate cut edge magnetic property deterioration for NGO electrical steel laminations both the plastic strain and residual elastic stress cut edge effects need to be included. In the cut edge model, a first layer width of 250 µm with magnetic properties for an effective plastic strain of 1.17 under residual compressive elastic stress of −133 MPa and a second layer width of 220 µm with magnetic properties for residual compressive elastic stress of −119 MPa give excellent results for hysteretic BH curves and specific iron loss evaluation.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.It is known that large perpendicular magnetic anisotropy is found at interfaces of cobalt (Co) with palladium (Pd). We investigated Pd/[Co/Pd]30/Pd multilayer thin films with very thin Co and Pd layers with ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) spectroscopy in air and in hydrogen gas. A number of samples characterised by different Pd thicknesses were studied. A ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) peak shift similar to Co/Pd bilayer thin films was observed in the presence of hydrogen gas in the sample environment for all samples. The FMR peak shift is larger for samples with thicker Pd layers. Additionally, we found a dependence of the linewidth on the Pd layer thickness and explain this with the presence of spin pumping.© 2022 Elsevier LtdNumbers of energy harvesting studies have reported that using the appropriate electrode materials could enhance the electrical output performance of the energy harvesters. In this work, we fabricated polyvinylidene fluoride (PVDF)-based piezoelectric nanogenerators (PENGs) using the solution-process method. Different combinations of silver nanowires, indium-tin-oxide (ITO), and poly(3,4-ethylenedioxythiophene) polystyrene sulfonate were used as top and bottom electrodes to investigate the effect of electrode materials on the electrical output performance. The open-circuit voltage (VOC), short-circuit current (ISC), the charge generated, instantaneous areal power measured, and internal impedance were measured. The obtained data reveal no significant difference between the different electrode combinations, with a mean absolute deviation of 0.21 V, and 0.03 μA for VOC and ISC, respectively. Thereby, an equivalent circuit for a real capacitor is adopted to analyze further and identify the impedance manifestation attributed to the PVDF layer and electrode materials. Overall, the electrode materials have an insignificant impact on the electrical output performance of PVDF-based PENGs in this study. Nevertheless, the obtained data inciting that tuning the PVDF impedance by introducing the 2D MXene nanofillers approach could be useful information to improve the performance of solution-processed PVDF-based PENGs.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The crystallographic and magnetic properties as well as the magnetocaloric effect (MCE) of the polycrystalline Yb0.5Gd0.5Ni5 alloy were investigated. The alloy crystallizes in the hexagonal CaCu5 structure. The magnetic properties showed the transition to a ferromagnetic state at Tc = 21.8 K. The heat capacity confirmed such behaviour. The Sommerfeld coefficient yielded a heavy-fermion value 790 mJ/mol.K2. Moreover, a −ln T dependence below 3 K at zero applied magnetic field was observed. The magnetocaloric effect shows an asymmetric shape of the −ΔSM dependence due to the presence of spin fluctuations.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Different from the non-magnetic pinning centers, the magnetic pinning centers have stronger flux pinning force due to the direct magnetic interaction between the magnetic pinning centers and the magnetic vortices, thus have been widely used to enhance the critical current density of various superconductors. In this article, nanoparticles of antiferromagnet CrB2 were introduced as magnetic pinning center to improve the flux pinning force density (Fp), irreversible field (Hirr), and critical current density (Jc) of MgB2. Compared to the pristine sample, the CrB2 doped MgB2 with low doping levels shows a significantly improved Jc and Fp, especially in the high field region. Hirr is also substantially enhanced. It is revealed that the magnetic flux pinning behavior of CrB2 doped samples obviously deviates from the surface pinning law followed by most pure MgB2. Through theoretical analysis and curve fitting, an extra pinning force superimposed on the surface pinning background is separated and identified, which follows the rule of point pinning. Such a pinning scenario is supported by the microstructure analyses which demonstrate that CrB2 nanoparticles are highly dispersed and embedded in MgB2 matrix, acting as effective pinning centers.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The modification of the magnetic ground state of the GdMnO3 compound has been explored with Y-doping on the Gd-site. The study on the magnetic properties indicates the existence of a weak ferromagnetic phase upon a 10% Y-doped sample. However, the strength of the ferromagnetic interaction becomes feeble in the 30% Y-doped sample. Such modifications of the magnetic ground states are analyzed considering the breaking of correlated weak ferromagnetic chains due to doping of non-magnetic Y-ions. In addition to that, the magnetocaloric effect has also been affected by the doping concentrations of Y-ions. The significant value of magnetic entropy change and relative cooling power of both the studied systems indicate the possible utilization of the materials as efficient magnetic refrigerants at the cryogenic temperature.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Ca3Ru2O7 is a polar metal that belongs to the class of multiferroic magnetic materials. Here, tiny amounts of Fe doping in the Ru sites bring about dramatic changes in the electronic and magnetic properties and generate a complex H–T phase diagram. To date, not much is known about the ground state of such a system in the absence of magnetic field. By performing muon-spin spectroscopy (μSR) measurements in 5% Fe-doped Ca3Ru2O7 single crystals, we investigate its electronic properties at a local level. Transverse-field μSR results indicate a very sharp normal-to-antiferromagnetic transition at TN=79.7(1)K, with a width of only 1K. Zero-field μSR measurements in the magnetically ordered state allow us to determine the local fields Bi at the muon implantation sites. By symmetry, muons stopping close to the RuO2 planes detect only the weak nuclear dipolar fields, while those stopping next to apical oxygens sense magnetic fields as high as 150mT. In remarkable agreement with the nominal Fe-doping, a ∼6% minority of the these muons feel slightly lower fields, reflecting a local magnetic frustration induced by iron ions. Finally, Bi shows no significant changes across the metal-to-insulator transition, close to 40K. We ascribe this surprising lack of sensitivity to the presence of crystal twinning.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.A mathematical model is developed for the susceptibility of a composite of soft magnetic material, held together by a magnetic binder. The model ignores the volume average of the stray field in the binder, and allows for different volume fractions of soft magnetic particles, with different shape factors, yielding results directly analogous to those of Böttcher for dielectrics in Effective Medium Theory. A high and a low susceptibility is identified, with the composite susceptibility almost always equal to the low susceptibility term. The electrical analogy is that susceptibility corresponds to a non-dimensional electrical capacitor, with the high and low capacitors in series. The high susceptibility term results from weighted particle susceptibilities in series. The low susceptibility term is usually independent of particle susceptibility. This model is validated against both finite element calculations, and published data obtained from composites of titanomagnetite ironsand, industrial ferrite and nano-sized magnetite particles.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic force microscope (MFM) is an established experimental tool for imaging stray fields with high spatial resolution and sensitivity. The MFM contrast can however contain contributions from the sample topography, variations in the surface Kelvin potential and magnetic contributions arising from grain-to-grain variations of the areal density of the magnetic moment, apart from the contrast generated by the micromagnetic pattern of the sample. Differential imaging techniques can be used to disentangle these contrast contributions. The calibration of the response of the MFM tip on different spatial wavelengths of the field allows a quantitative determination of the magnetic vector field in the plane parallel to the sample surface scanned by the tip. Generally, the tip becomes less sensitive for smaller spatial wavelengths. Obtaining a high spatial resolution thus requires a high measurement sensitivity that can be obtained by MFM operation in vacuum and by using high-quality factor cantilevers. As a result, field sensitivities better than 80μT/Hz can be obtained, even with low magnetic moment tips.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The circulation reversal of magnetic vortex in ultra-small (sub-100 nm) ferromagnetic nanodots with a small off-centered hole is investigated. At zero applied field, the vortex state and the quasi uniform state are bi-stable in nanodisks. The existence of the small hole, which diameter is around the dimension of a vortex core, makes the vortex state in sub-100 nm magnetic nanomagnets is energetically more stable than uniform state. The results indicate perfect controllability of the circulation reversal using the in-plane magnetic field. We also reveal that the mechanism of the circulation reversal in sub-100 nm nanodisk is different from that in larger disk (a few hundreds nanometer to micrometer). It is paramount to control and manipulate the magnetic elements of dimension below 100 nm for their integration into nanoscopic spintronic and magnonic devices.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.A study about the magnetic anisotropy in a 3x3 array, constituted by square nickel nanometric pillars (NPs), is present. The NPs geometry was defined by wide D = 30 nm and length L = 120 nm. The center to center NPs distance a = 35, 40, 50 and 80 nm, were chosen to create variations in magnetic anisotropy, originated by the hard dipolar interactions. A concentric central cavity was included, within the variables in the study, with lateral dimension of d = 0, 10 and 20 nm. The data was generated through micromagnetic simulation by using a ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) standard problem. The OOMMF package was used by applying an external magnetic field in parallel and perpendicular directions, relative to the pillars symmetry axis. The anisotropy field (HA) was obtained by the typical FMR uniaxial model. The HA values decrease with the center to center NPs distance for all cavity size. Based on previous reported studies in nanowires, the volumetric NPs packing (P) was related to HA. Thus, an empirical dependence of HA was proposed to describe the linear decrease with P. Even with the geometric characteristics of array it was evident, by the calculations with perpendicular field, that the simplified uniaxial model is no longer appropriate. Therefore, an analysis using the model composing two anisotropy constants (K1 and K2) was included. This proposal and the traditional uniaxial model are not suitable as the distance between the pillars decreases.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Following the high magnetoresistance (MR) ratio reported for fully epitaxial CoFe/bcc-Cu/CoFe current-in-plane giant magnetoresistance (CIP-GMR) grown on MgO(0 0 1) single crystalline substrate, we attempted to grow epitaxial CoFe/bcc-Cu/CoFe CIP-GMR devices on industrially viable Si(0 0 1) substrate through an epitaxial NiAl buffer layer. We found that the deposition of MgO insulation layer on the NiAl buffer layer is crucial to prevent current shunting in the NiAl layer which reduces MR ratio. The epitaxial CIP-GMR device grown on Si(0 0 1) exhibited sufficiently high MR ratio up to 15.9(±0.1)% at room temperature; however, it is somehow lower than that grown on the MgO(0 0 1) substrate, 20.6(±0.1)%. Detailed microstructural analysis revealed that fcc phase of Cu presented in the bcc-Cu spacer, which is considered to be the reason for the lower MR ratio of the device grown on Si(0 0 1) substrate.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The Microwave induced sol-gel auto-combustion process was used to make lead hexaferrite, PbFe12-xBixO19 (x = 0.2 to 0.8), with Bi3+ as a replacement. X-ray powder diffractometer (XRD), scanning electron microscopy (SEM), vibrating sample Magnetometry (VSM), Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FT-IR), and Impedance analysis was used to test the impact of added Bi3+ ions on the structure, morphology, magnetic, and dielectric properties of lead hexaferrite. Single-phase hexagonal ferrite nanoparticles with average crystalline sizes of 43 to 59 nm were achieved with the space group of P63/mmc. The magnetic analysis revealed that when the Bi3+ ion is supplemented in the Pb ferrite, the coercive and saturation magnetization of the material was amplified. The substance's dielectric constant, electric conductivity, and loss tangent were calculated for frequencies of 20 Hz to 10 MHz, indicating that it is appropriate for wide applications like permanent magnets, high-density magnetic recording media.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.With the development in biomedical and biotechnological areas, novel and efficient microfluidic devices integrated with sufficient and rapid mixing function have been attracting enormous scientific attention as versatile and robust platform for low cost and non-contact biological analysis and diagnose. Here, we design and fabricate a magnetic micromixer integrated with special designed microwires, a Y-shaped microchannel and uniform magnetic field for realizing rapid mixing between ferrofluid and deionized water. A comprehensive analysis on the dynamic behavior of ferrofluid is performed by using 3D Eulerian-Eulerian model. Good consistency between experiment and numerical results demonstrates that the enhanced mixing in the presence of longitudinally arranged microwires is due to the introduction of eddies, whose impacts are strengthened with the increase of the number of microwires (nw). However, increasing nw requires a long microchannel and long time to complete mixing. In order to further improve the mixing performance of our micromixer, a horizontally arranged microwire combined with a particular uniform magnetic field is proposed to provide enough magnetic force for enhancing the mixing of ferrofluid and deionized water, receiving optimal mixing efficiency 99.06%. The flexible tunability of external uniform magnetic field enables desired performance of our designed system.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic hysteresis properties of commercially available samples of sintered permanent magnets with the composition of Sm(Co0.796–xFe0.177CuxZr0.027)6.63 (x = 0.117 – 0.131) were investigated. To analyze the processes of magnetization and magnetization reversal, the magnetization curves from the thermally demagnetized state, major hysteresis loops, recoil curves, the dependence of the reversible magnetic susceptibility vs. magnetic fields strength, Kelly plots and angular dependences of the coercivity were used. These results indicate that magnetization reversal processes are more complicated than pinning. A model of magnetization reversal processes is proposed to explain why in some experiments the magnets exhibit a pinning mechanism of magnetization reversal and in some experiments a nucleation mechanism.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Two-dimensional (2D) materials with intrinsic magnetism have sparked a lot of attention due to their potential applications in spintronics. Recently, monolayer molybdenum triiodide (MoI3), which is a member of the transition metal trihalides (MX3) family, has been predicted to be a stable bipolar ferromagnetic semiconductor (BFMS) with intrinsic magnetism. By means of first-principle calculations based on the GGA + Ueff approach, we modified MoI3 through substitutional doping with 3d transition metal (TM) atoms to improve its spintronic properties. We focused on the study of structural, electronic and magnetic properties of the pristine and 3d TM (TM = Sc, Ti, V, Cr, and Mn) doped MoI3 systems. Our findings reveal that substitutional doping of MoI3 monolayers with Sc and Ti atoms changes their electronic character from a BFMS to a ferromagnetic semiconductor, while V- and Cr-doped MoI3 monolayers result in half semiconducting properties (HSC). More interestingly, the Mn-doped MoI3 monolayer reveals a half-metallic character with enhanced magnetism and sustains these properties even under spin–orbit coupling (SOC). In addition, robust ferromagnetism and high mean-field Curie temperatures were found in all doped systems, especially in the V-doped MoI3 monolayer. By exhibiting these unique electronic and magnetic properties, these TM-doped MoI3 systems could serve as potential candidates for spintronic applications.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.We calculate the magnetic anisotropy (MA) energy of W-type ferrites, Ba(Sr)Me2Fe16O27, where Me is Mg, Co, and Ni, using a cluster model and LS coupling on magnetic ions, along with the structural data obtained via x-ray and neutron diffractions. We show that the local MA energy of Fe3＋ and Me2+ on each non-equivalent site depends strongly on the local lattice structure around the magnetic ions. The bulk MA energy calculated for W-type ferrite with Me=Mg is found to be weakly dependent on the details of local lattice structures, and the calculated result is consistent with that observed for SrMg 2Fe16O27. Results for W-type ferrite with Me=Co suggest the appearance of a cone-type magnetic structure; however, c− plane MA may appear when a small amount of Co2+ resides on 12k sites. The finding could resolve the experimental controversy for the magnetic structure of W-type ferrite with Me=Co. Based on the results, we discuss site-selective substitution of Me2+ (Me = Fe, Co, and Ni) to enhance the performance of permanent magnets.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.A stable fusion of two skyrmions is called biskyrmion, which has a topological charge equal to 2. Here, we investigate this object with two cores in frustrated ferromagnetic racetracks. Biskyrmion dynamics induced by a spin-polarized current is analyzed, and the biskyrmion Hall effect is compared with the usual skyrmion Hall effect. We also study the chance of biskyrmion fractionalization in a single skyrmion, a phenomenon that reduces the topological charge of the system by one-half. From the topological perspective, a change in the topological sector is a drastic phenomenon allowed only in discrete lattices. In general, such a change leads to the total annihilation of the topological structure. Here, we show that the biskyrmion splits into a skyrmion and a burst of spin waves (emerging from the destroyed skyrmion). Such dissociation is possible by impelling the biskyrmion against a peculiar hole-defect, which must be able to destroy only one skyrmion, also impeding that the generated spin waves strike the other skyrmion. Our results suggest practical ways to manipulate the shape and chirality of spin textures via lattice defects, which can be intentionally inserted in magnetic thin films.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic anisotropy of a typical magnetic sample with an easy axis perpendicular to the surface has many advantages over an in-plane easy axis due to advantages like better thermal stability, higher data storage density, lower energy consumption, etc. The perpendicular magnetic anisotropy arises due to the spatial inversion asymmetry (SIA) at the interfaces between a ferromagnet (FM) and a heavy metal (HM). In such systems, one can achieve a current-induced magnetization reversal (CIMR) via spin–orbit torque with the assistance of an in-plane (IP) magnetic field. This IP field requirement for the CIMR process is an obstacle for the practical application. Recent studies on CIMR at magnetic fields free condition are achieved by breaking the lateral structural symmetry by achieving thickness-gradient in a particular layer. In previous reports, the SIA normal to the surface in a heterostructure leads to an asymmetric contribution as chiral damping. In this work, a system Ta/Pt/CoFeB/Pt with normal and lateral SIA has been prepared by introducing a thickness-gradient in the FM CoFeB layer, which leads to create a tilted perpendicular magnetic anisotropy. The presence of the lateral SIA gives rise to another asymmetric component besides the chiral damping component. In this study, the total asymmetric component of the Ta/Pt/CoFeB/Pt heterostructure has been calculated into two contributions Ht and Hch, to extract the distinct information of the tilt asymmetry due to the lateral SIA and the chiral damping due to the normal SIA, respectively. In this study, by varying the bottom Pt thickness of the Ta/Pt/CoFeB/Pt heterostructures we have observed that the two asymmetry contributions Ht and Hch both decreased with increasing bottom Pt thickness.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.We study the interplay of rotations of t2g-orbitals in vanadium perovskites such as La1−xSrxVO3 induced by spin–orbital polarons and by charged defects. We also analyze the resulting decay of orbital order as well as the suppression of anisotropy of kinetic energy on varying the doping. The strong local correlations and the superexchange interactions are modeled by an extended 3-orbital-flavor Hubbard–Hund model. Because of the charged defects, it is crucial to extend the model by long-range Coulomb defect potentials as well as by long-range electron–electron repulsion. Thereby, the resulting binding of doped holes (i.e., spin–orbital polarons) to negative defects leads to screening by effective dynamic dipoles. The resulting dipolar fields, in combination with disorder, control the defect states and form a soft Coulomb gap inside the Mott–Hubbard gap and thereby control the low-energy properties of the system.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we present the structural, electronic, magnetic and transport properties of a equiatomic quaternary alloy NbVTiAl. The absence of (111) and (200) peaks in X-ray diffraction (XRD) data confirms the A2-type structure. Magnetization measurements indicate a high Curie temperature and a negligibly small magnetic moment (∼10−3 μB/f.u.) These observations are indicative of fully compensated ferrimagnetism in the alloy. Temperature dependent resistivity indicate metallic nature. Ab-initio calculation of fully ordered NbVTiAl structure confirms a nearly half metallic behavior with a high spin polarization (∼90 %) and a net magnetic moment of 0.8 μB/f.u. (in complete contrast to the experimental observation). One of the main objective of the present paper is to resolve and explain the long-standing discrepancy between theoretical prediction and experimental observation of magnetization for V-based quaternary Heusler alloys, in general. To gain an in-depth understanding, we modeled various disordered states and its subsequent effect on the magnetic and electronic properties. The discrepancy is attributed to the A2 disorder present in the system, as confirmed by our XRD data. The presence of disorder also causes the emergence of finite states at the Fermi level, which impacts the spin polarization of the system.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Sufficient understanding on the formation mechanism of the La(Fe,Si)13 phase (1:13 or τ1) in La–Fe–Si alloys would be helpful in optimizing the parameters for high-temperature annealing. In-situ annealing experiments of a centrifugally as-cast LaFe11.6Si1.4 plate were performed by using a differential scanning calorimeter (DSC) in the present study. We confirmed that the τ1 phase is resulted from a peritectic reaction between La-rich liquid phase and α(Fe) solid phase when isothermal annealing at 1423 K. A new finding of a eutectoid decomposition that may occur within the residual La-rich liquid phase upon cooling was revealed. The isothermal transformation kinetics of the τ1 phase in the as-cast plate followed a simplified model of diffusion-controlled continuous network growth. The isothermal entropy change (|ΔSM|) was calculated using the Maxwell equation on M−H data. The maximum |ΔSM| value reached 26.89 J/(kg·K) under 30 kOe in the LaFe11.6Si1.4 sample annealed at 1423 K for 120 min.© 2022Mechanism of exchange bias (EB) and spin reversal (SR) in the vicinity of compensation point, Tcomp, was considered in a framework of quantum–mechanical mean field theory. Specific differences between EB and SR phenomena in compensated ferrimagnets, associated with an impact of the crystal field, have been considered, and characteristic single crystals of GdCrO3 and ErFeO3 were studied. It was shown that an applied magnetic field induces an additional weak canting of the transition metal M3+ magnetic moments in the vicinity of Tcomp, disturbing the energy balance between isotropic and anisotropic exchange interactions in the system of transition metal and rare-earth ions. This is a source of unidirectional anisotropy associated with the orientation of uncompensated ferromagnetic moment of transition metal ion with respect to the direction of magnetic field. It was demonstrated that a thermodynamic behavior of ErFeO3 in the vicinity of Tcomp, can be described using the concept of effective spin. The parameters of microscopic interactions were determined and the temperature dependences of the canting angles, effective exchange fields, temperatures of spin flips, coercivity fields, and exchange bias fields were calculated, for both GdCrO3 and ErFeO3.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The effect of substrate induced strain and Fe/Rh stoichiometry on the antiferromagnetic (AFM)-ferromagnetic (FM) first order transition in sputter deposited FeRh thin films has been studied. Fe1−xRhx films of about 50 nm thickness and with x = 0.45, 0.50, 0.55 were deposited using magnetron sputtering on MgO (001), Al2O3 (0001) (AlO) and quartz (Qtz) substrates. These films were found to be epitaxial under compressive strain on MgO and polycrystalline under tensile strain on AlO. Films with x = 0.50 and 0.55 showed a first order AFM-FM transition near or above 300K. Our study shows that the transition temperature (Tt) is dictated by strain as it was found to vary linearly with out-of-plane strain for films on MgO and AlO. In the case of films on Qtz substrate, an open loop in isothermal magnetoresistance (MR) with a large negative MR was observed at room temperature.© 2022 The Author(s)In micromagnetic simulations it is necessary to compute the effective field associated to the exchange interaction, which corresponds to applying the Laplace operator to the magnetization field. The most widely used approach for computing the exchange field is to apply finite-difference schemes to homogeneous Cartesian meshes. In many situations it would be computationally advantageous to perform micromagnetic simulation on inhomogeneous meshes, but doing so presents a challenge with regard to the calculation of the exchange field. Here we present the construction of an exchange field calculation method for inhomogeneous meshes. A novel second order differential operator method is introduced and applied to a series of analytical functions on irregular meshes and compared to existing methods, finding an accuracy improvement of up to 81% relative to the second order finite difference method. The method is then used in combination with the MagTense framework and tested on the μmag standard micromagnetics problems 3 and 4. Here we find that especially for tetrahedral meshes, the proposed method results in much faster convergence as function of mesh size. We demonstrate that the method converges stably even for meshes where some mesh elements have a volume as small as 1/8 compared to the base resolution. Finally, we show that the method works equally well for meshes with spatially varying material parameters.© 2022 Elsevier LtdIn SPICE simulations of PIN diodes and IGBT devices using finite difference method, one discretizes an undepleted N− region into several equally spaced nodes with a time-dependent distance of Δx(t), and then transforms the ambipolar diffusion equation, a time–space partial differential equation, into a set of time-dependent ordinary differential equations. However, the time-dependent property of Δx(t) destroys the carrier number conservation. In this paper, we propose an approach to correct the effect of the Δx(t) by introducing an auxiliary system. It has the same total current and the total carrier number in the undepleted N− region as the real system, but has different electron and hole current components. The difference is caused by adding compensation current terms with the equal amplitude and opposite sign to the electron and hole current terms in the auxiliary system. These compensation current terms are proportional to the boundary speed of the undepleted N− region and do not change the total current. The auxiliary system can be easily solved using SPICE behavior models and its carrier density is a good approximation to the real one. Our simulations show that the compensation current correction is important for fast switching PIN diodes, but may not be very important in IGBT devices due to their large gate-related capacitance.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Mapping microstructural to macroscopic magnetic properties is challenging yet necessary for the development of novel non-destructive testing techniques based on magnetic measurements. The macroscopic properties of a material reflect the underlying magnetization processes and the microstructural configuration as a result of the history of the material. Magnetic nondestructive evaluation techniques are needed for the health monitoring in critical structures and the quality monitoring of materials used in components, such as transformers and motors. In this work, we assess the usability of metrics related to AC magnetometry and magnetic Barkhausen Noise through measurements on several series of samples of various grain sizes and levels of plastic deformation. AC magnetometry is preferred to magnetic Barkhausen Noise as it provides more repeatable and reliable metrics than mBN which suffers from higher uncertainty. Also, differential permeability curves are preferred to hysteresis loops because they can be obtained directly through ac magnetometry and provide several types of information, such as the peak value, the coercivity, the overall shape, the emergence and location of multiple peaks which are related to stresses. In the case of stress-dependent magnetization processes, both differential permeability and mBN results are consistent, regardless of the way strain is applied, and corroborate results previously reported. However, permeability measurements are inconclusive on the effect of grain size on magnetization processes while the mBN voltage increases monotonically with decreasing grain size, in both types of samples. The mBN energy associated with each applied field step is proposed as a complementary measure for the assessment of the contribution of the irreversible processes in a material where the permeability measurements are inconclusive. Finally, the experimental observations have been used to set up micromagnetic calculations by modeling a plastically deformed material as a soft matrix with grains enclosed by boundaries with high transverse anisotropy which act as pinning centres and prevent further rotation of the magnetization and its alignment with the applied field thus reproducing the typical phenomenological features of plastically strained materials.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Topologically protected spin configurations are predicted to be the future of information storage and other computational applications. Through various investigations it has been proven that magnetic skyrmions consume a low driving current compare to magnetic domain wall, which can reduce the Joule heating significantly in memory storage devices and facilitate energy efficient, faster and miniaturized memory storage. Recently, numerous host materials are studied in condensed matter for exploiting the skyrmions. Experimentally magnetic multilayers consisting of repeated ferromagnetic (FM)/ heavy metal (HM) can stabilize interfacial skyrmions at near room temperature. In this seminal review, a brief introduction of the microscopic origin of the magnetic skyrmions with the theoretical models that have been used to simulate the interfacial skyrmions along with the important experimental techniques, which have been utilized to detect the interfacial skyrmions is presented. We also highlighted the progress on the potential applications of skyrmions in racetrack memory, logic gates, and neuromorphic devices.© 2022The grid structure formed by the ionic bonding between bentonite and carrier liquid could support and uniformly disperse the micro-nanometer magnetic particles. In order to overcome the sedimentation of magnetorheological fluid the bi-dispersed magnetic grease with excellent magnetism suspension stability and thixotropy was prepared for the first time. The suspension stability was accurately measured by the L-C vibration detection. By observing the time dependence of the viscosity under coupling effect shear rate and magnetic field the thixotropy phenomenon was found and analyzed. The results showed that the addition of bentonite increased the suspension stability by 17.873%. A surprising thixotropy with changes regularly was found even the viscosity increased by an order of magnitude. Moreover the rate of viscosity changes was accelerated with the decrease of shear rate and the increase of magnetic field. Under the action of shear rate the formation and destruction of the magnetic response of the particle cloud structure were promoted by the grid structure with a large internal surface area. This work has improved the suspension stability of rheological fluid and found the thixotropic phenomenon with regular changes which is of great significance for the precise control and stable operation of damping braking and transportation systems.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The excellent anisotropic Mn55Bi45 powder was prepared by arc melting and surfactant-assisted low-energy ball milling (LEBM). The microstructure and magnetic properties of the alloy were investigated. The ionic polyvinylpyrrolidone (PVP) was selected as a surfactant. The results show that the addition of PVP can improve the low-temperature phase (LTP) content and magnetic properties of the Mn55Bi45 alloy. The coercivity (Hcj) of the anisotropic Mn55Bi45 powder is 14.7 kOe, the maximum energy product ((BH)max) is 7.1 MGOe and the saturation magnetization (Ms) is 57.5 emu/g when it is 10 wt% PVP and after 3 h ball milling. The angle dependence of coercivity shows that mechanism of anisotropic Mn-Bi alloy follows to the Stoner-Wohlfarth model.© 2022Here we present the effect of ferromagnetic magnetoresistive sensor on magnetic susceptibility of nanoparticles (NPs) deposited on its surface. Deposition of the CoFe2O4 nanoparticles on the CoFeB/Ta/CoFeB platform, comprising thin ferromagnetic layers, changes the blocking temperature of the NPs. The magnetic dipole interaction between the NPs and the platform affects the frequency and field dependences of the blocking temperature of the NPs, because the effective energy barrier of magnetization reversal is higher than in NPs deposited on a diamagnetic substrate. Obtained results demonstrate backward effect of the sensor on the analyzing NPs array. An allowance of this effect is important for the correct application of a magnetoresistive and low frequency inductive sensors in medicine and biology.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The influences of the Zr doping on the structure, vacancy defects, and magnetic properties of GdMn1-xZrxO3 (x = 0.00–0.20) ceramic samples synthesized using a solid-state reaction method were investigated. All the GdMn1-xZrxO3 samples formed a single-phase structure, and no phase transformation occurred within the experimental doping range; however, Zr doping caused lattice distortion. The microstructure of the GdMn1-xZrxO3 samples was compact, and Zr doping reduced the grain size. The positron annihilation spectrum (PAS) measurements showed that Zr doping had a great influence on the cation vacancy concentration of GdMn1-xZrxO3 samples. The vacancy concentration increased with increasing Zr doping content from 0.00 to 0.10, and then decreased with the further increase in Zr doping content. XPS results showed that the charge compensation induced by Zr doping was achieved mainly by the decrease of cation valence (forming Mn2+) in the x = 0.00–0.10 ceramics. Appropriate Zr doping obviously improved the transition temperatures and magnetization of the GdMn1-xZrxO3 samples. This investigation demonstrated that the cation vacancy concentration is one of the important factors that could tailor the magnetic properties of GdMn1-xZrxO3ceramics.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Pure inorganic flexible thin film with anisotropic magnetism is crucial for high temperature flexible/wearable spintronic devices and magnetic sensors. Here, a pure inorganic flexible Mn-doped BiMn0.05Fe0.95O3 (BMFO) thin film with a novel anisotropic saturation magnetization phenomenon is demonstrated on (0 0 1)-oriented fluorophlogopite (F-Mica) single-crystalline substrates by sol–gel method. The results of XRD indicate that the intensity ratios of the (1 0 1) and (1 1 0) direction increases with the increase in thicknesses. And an obvious anisotropy behavior in magnetization was observed in the thicker flexible BMFO thin films, and the anisotropic magnetization is slowly weakened as the thickness decreases. Meanwhile, the saturation magnetization (Ms) of both in-plane and out-of-plane increases with the increase in the thickness. These results indicate that the thickness can modulate the anisotropic magnetism for the flexible BMFO thin films. The maximum value of (Ms-in-plane-Ms-out-of-plane) is obtained in the flexible BMFO sample with the thickness of 550 nm. Moreover, the real nonvolatile ferroelectric polarization with Pr = 58.22 μC/cm2 was obtained in the flexible BMFO sample with the thickness of 336 nm. These flexible BMFO thin films with anisotropic saturation magnetism, mechanical anti-fatigue characters and well ferroelectric properties are promising for the applications in high temperature flexible spintronics and magnetic sensors.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Polyethylene glycol (PEG) coated iron oxide nanoparticles are of interest because of their distinctive properties and potential applications such as magnetic resonance imaging, magnetic hyperthermia and drug delivery. In this study, PEG coated iron oxide nanoparticles were obtained by a two-step synthesis route including coprecipitation and coating. Different amounts of PEG6000 were used for coating and the effect of PEG amount on the structural and magnetic properties of the nanoparticles was investigated. Crystal structure, surface coating and particle size of the nanoparticles were characterized by X-ray diffraction technique, Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy and transmission electron microscopy. The particle size of iron oxide nanoparticles remained almost constant (7–8 nm) with the increase of PEG amount. It was determined from thermogravimetric analysis that the coating percentage of the nanoparticles steadily increased from 2.6 to 6.9 % with the increase of PEG amount from 5 to 15 g. Magnetic properties of the nanoparticles were studied by vibrating sample magnetometer and all samples were found to be superparamagnetic. PEG coated iron oxide nanoparticles showed higher saturation magnetization, Ms values than the uncoated iron oxide nanoparticles. Also, Ms of the coated nanoparticles increased with the increase of PEG coating and reached a value of 62.4 emu/g showing an increase of 19 % over uncoated iron oxide nanoparticles while maintaining the superparamagnetic behavior. This remarkable rise in the Ms of PEG coated iron oxide nanoparticles may improve the control and delivery of the nanoparticles for potential applications.© 2022 The Author(s)The single ion properties of the zig-zag chain compound SrTm2O4 have been investigated using heat capacity, magnetic susceptibility, magnetization, inelastic neutron scattering, and polarized muon spectroscopy. Two crystal field models are employed to estimate the single ion properties; a Density Function Theory based model and an effective charge model based on the Hutchings point charge model. The latter describes our experimental results well. This model estimates an easy-axis anisotropy for one of the Tm3+ sites and an easy-plane anisotropy for the second site. It also predicts a mixed ground state with dominating J=0 characteristics for both sites. Additionally, muon spin rotation/relaxation (μ+SR) spectra reveal oscillations, typically a sign of long-range magnetic order. However, the temperature dependence of the precession frequency and the relaxation rates indicate that the system is in an extended critical regime and the observed relaxation is actually dynamic.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic and thermodynamic properties of two electron system confined in 2-D quantum structures submitted to an applied magnetic field are studied taking into account the spin–orbit and electron–phonon interactions. The confinement is considered as a harmonic potential and the electron–electron interaction is taken as coulombic. We have first solved the Schrödinger equation to obtain energy levels and then obtain all the thermodynamic functions using canonical ensemble. The numerical calculation of our formalism is applied essentially for the GaN and InAs which are (III–V) compounds. Our results show that even at B=0 T, the susceptibility of GaN shows diamagnetic behavior for all temperatures. However, with an increase in the magnetic field, susceptibility increases and the system shows paramagnetic behavior for both cases associated with and without polaron effect. We demonstrate that taking into account the Rashba spin–orbit interaction leads to a shift of the cutoff magnetic field Bc (value of B for which the magnetic nature of the dot changes from diamagnetic to paramagnetic) to the higher magnetic field with an increase in temperature. We also show that by taking into account the polaronic effect, Rashba spin–orbit interaction lowers the mean energy of the system. The heat capacity curve shows a peak at a low temperature (Schottky anomaly) and shifts toward high temperature with an increase in confinement and magnetic field strength. The consideration of the polaron effect shifts the heat capacity curve to lower temperatures.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.This paper is focused on the study of magneto crystalline anisotropy which we performed on oriented TbMn0.98Fe0.02O3 single crystal by magnetization and AC susceptibility measurements. Our measurements revealed huge magneto crystalline anisotropy with respect to main crystallographic axes. The paramagnetic Weiss temperature θp spans a broad range of values which can indicate the strong magnetocrystalline anisotropy in the system. Easy magnetization axis is c-axis and b-axis is hard magnetic axis. The magnetic phase transitions at TN, Tlock and T1 are connected with anomalies in magnetization and AC susceptibility measurements performed along b-axis. Field induced magnetic transitions were observed at 2 K in the case of a sinusoidally modulated collinear magnetic structure for magnetization measurements along a-axis and c-axis. Hysteresis loops measurements indicate suppression of Tb3+ ordering in high magnetic field which depends on crystal orientation. In respect to iron doping our results resemble and extend results obtained on powdered crystals. Iron doping shifts both TN and Tlock to lower temperatures, antiferromagnetic JAF interaction in ac-plane decreases leaving barely changed ferromagnetic interaction JF. The critical field of the field induced phase transition increases with iron doping.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In this study, metallic Fe–Mn soft magnetic powders were produced via hydrogen reduction of the oxide powders consisting of nanoferrites produced by a wet process. The effects of solution concentration and pH value during the wet process on the magnetization and coercivity after the hydrogen reduction were investigated. The experimental results indicated that the solution concentration exhibited no effect on the coercivity, whereas the pH produced a large effect on the coercivity. In the wet process at pH greater than 12, irregular-shaped oxide powders were precipitated. The reduced irregular-shaped metallic Fe–Mn powders showed a small coercivity of approximately 90 A/m. In contrast, at pH = 7–8, both irregular- and plate-shaped oxide powders were precipitated, and the reduced Fe–Mn powders showed a large coercivity of ∼ 250 A/m. The reduced plate-shaped Fe–Mn powders exhibited smaller grain sizes (diameter: 15.9 µm) than those of the irregular-shaped Fe–Mn powders (diameter: ∼120–140 µm), indicating that the plate-shaped Fe–Mn powders exhibited increased coercivities. The plate-shaped metallic powders were produced by the reduction of the plate-shaped oxide powders, which contained ferrihydrite and green rust. These results reveal that the pH value of the wet process changes the oxide shape, which in turn affects the shape and grain size of the metallic Fe–Mn powders. By optimizing the wet process conditions, the coercivity of the Fe–Mn powder was improved to 80.9 A/m, although this value is lower than that of the atomized pure Fe powders.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Here, we investigated Gd3Cu3Sb4 compound, with the focus on its magnetic structure. We performed magnetization and susceptibility measurements and determined X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy valence band spectra. We also performed a detailed density functional theory calculations. We found that collinear antiferromagnetic structure is preferred over the non-collinear one observed earlier in the analogue Ce3Cu3Sb4 compound. The calculated energy of the unit cell is lower, when assuming a collinear scenario, and magnetic measurements seem to also support this result.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.We previously derived direct-current type negative dielectric susceptibility χ, a state which was termed “diaelectric” in previous work. One candidate for a strong diaelectric material was postulated to be a permanent magnet. According to conventional theories, superconductors or room temperature diamagnets can be thought of as fingers or frogs as in the case of frog levitation by magnets and magnetic levitation between fingertips as explained in previous studies. In this study, we regard magnets as anti-electric materials such that this diaelectric phenomenon may satisfy all conditions necessary to repel the external charges outside the magnet. This dielectric state stems from the concept of an image charge in which the opposing charge may be induced by an external charge that is referenced to a centered plane, and the concurrent same polar charge then coexists as a counterpart of the dipole in the image charge portion, thus repelling the external charge. The resulting finite magnetic fields in permanent magnets may stem from non-zero permanent dipole currents.© 2022The development of high-performance magnetic field-sensitive materials is in urgent need for magnetic sensors. In this paper, the effect of magnetic field annealing on the soft magnetic properties, thermal stability and stress-induced giant magneto-impedance (GMI) effect of Co69Fe5.5Ni1Si14.5-xPxB10 (x = 0, 0.5, 1, 1.5, 2) amorphous alloys were investigated in detail. Thermal analysis shows that replacing Si with a small amount of P can increase the thermal stability of the amorphous alloys. The permeability of the samples with magnetic field annealing is about 150% higher than that of the samples with stress-relieve annealing. The stress-induced GMI (GSI) results show that when the applied tensile stress is 0 MPa, 100 MPa, and 300 MPa, the maximum GMI ratio of the 1 at. % P-doping alloy with magnetic field annealing first increases from 76.6% to 102.8% and then decreases to 82%. Under the optimized measurement conditions, the magnetic field response sensitivity ξ of the Co69Fe5.5Ni1Si13.5P1B10 ribbon reached to 35.3%/Oe, the GSI ratio reached 34.3%, which has significant improvement compared to that of the stress-relieve annealing samples. Therefore, the magnetic field annealing technique greatly improved the GSI effect of the Co-based amorphous alloys, and the results obtained show a new way to develop high-performance GSI sensor materials and can be used in the construction of stress sensors.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This article has been retracted: please see Elsevier Policy on Article Withdrawal (https://www.elsevier.com/about/our-business/policies/article-withdrawal). This article has been retracted at the request of the Editor-in-Chief. Figure 1 of the article displays data manipulation. This is an ethics violation. As such this article represents a severe abuse of the scientific publishing system. The scientific community takes a very strong view on this matter and apologies are offered to readers of the journal that this was not detected during the submission process.© 2022Commercial N45 sintered Nd-Ce-Fe-B magnets were processed by the grain boundary diffusion (GBD) with Tb and Tb70Fe30 alloys. Although the substitution of Tb (30 at.%) by Fe in the Tb70Fe30 alloy, the coercivity was still remarkably enhanced from 12.71 kOe to 22.17 kOe, nearly as well as the Tb GBD magnet. Especially, the Tb70Fe30 GBD magnet possessed a higher remanence of 13.01 kGs than that of 12.72 kGs for the Tb GBD magnet. The thickness of the Tb-rich shell was reduced in the Tb70Fe30 GBD magnet. Moreover, the antiferromagnetic RE6Fe13Cu phase was found in grain boundary in both diffused magnets, while more Fe atoms provided in the Tb70Fe30 alloy decreased the decomposition of the matrix grains due to the formation of the RE6Fe13Cu phase, thereby suppressed the remanence degradation. This work provides new prospects for the development of the Nd-Ce-Fe-B magnets processed by grain boundary diffusion.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.AlCoCrFeNi high-entropy alloy (HEA) coating was formed on the surface of sintered NdFeB magnets by high-velocity oxygen-fuel (HVOF) spraying. The surface and fractured cross-sectional morphologies, phase composition and corrosion resistances of the coating were investigated using SEM, XRD, accelerated corrosion immersion test and electrochemical test, respectively. At the same time, the effect of AlCoCrFeNi coating on magnetic properties of NdFeB magnet was also studied. The results show that the surface of HEA coating exhibits the typical spraying morphologies, and the thickness is approximately 15 μm. The HEA coating is mainly composed of single BCC phase, and has little effect on the magnetic properties of the NdFeB magnet. In the sulfuric acid immersion test, few bubbles can be generated on the surface of the HEA coated sample after immersed for 300 min, and the weight loss is only 0.49 g/dm2, only 0.93 % of the uncoated sample. In the electrochemical test, the AlCoCrFeNi coated NdFeB sample also shows better corrosion resistance than the uncoated NdFeB sample. The present work provides a promising coating to improve the corrosion resistance of sintered NdFeB magnets.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Magneto-optical effects are caused by parameters of the off-diagonal components in the dielectric tensor of materials, which is a complex number. Because the real parts of off-diagonal components rotate the photo-induced polarization in the materials from the direction of the incident light electric field, the parts must become one of the effective parameters for light energy flow control in photonic crystals. In this study, we theoretically proposed a mechanism to realize light intensity imbalance to the left and right by inverting the sign of the real parts for 2D magnetic photonic crystals based on a finite-difference time-domain simulation and photonic band calculations. Our analyzes reveal that the maximal intensity peaks of light magnetic field distributions rotate ∼60∘ around the hole of the crystal at the Γ point in the Brillouin zone, and these rotations are caused by the real parts. The imbalance is caused by the deflections of light energy flow owing to the rotation, which are explained based on the following two mechanisms: the walk-off phenomenon and uneven bifurcation. Furthermore, the proposed mechanism was experimentally confirmed by observing the imbalance in the scattered light intensity from the surface of rough-cutting magnetic photonic crystals fabricated from a cerium-substituted yttrium iron garnet. The results of this study serve as a foundation for the development of light energy flow control by engineering photonic crystals using the real part of the off-diagonal components in dielectric tensors.© 2022 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, impacts of post metallization annealing (PMA) temperatures on interfacial and electrical properties of Ge n-channel metal–oxidesemiconductor field-effect transistors (nMOSFETs) with ZrO2/Al2O3/GeOx/Ge gate stacks employing post-oxidation passivation are systematically evaluated. The interface trap density (Dit) and slow trap density (ΔNst) of the Ge gate stacks gradually increase with the annealing temperature increasing from 350 °C to 500 °C. Besides, the gate stacks with PMA at 400 °C exhibit higher permittivity, indicating the potential utilization in equivalent oxide thickness (EOT) scaling of gate stacks. By evaluating the electrical properties of the Ge nMOSFETs with different PMA conditions, it is found that the contact resistance and channel resistance of nMOSFETs are also strongly affected by the PMA process due to the formation of NiGe alloy and the mobility enhancement by the improved gate stack, indicating the optimization of PMA process is critical for the performance improvement of Ge nMOSFETs with ZrO2-based high-κ dielectric.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Several studies have shown the exceptional responses of spinel cobalt ferrites as advanced ceramics. Nevertheless, there is still a gap in the literature regarding the effect of synthesis parameters on the properties of the spinel products. This work aims to correlate temperature and annealing time with the structural, optical, and magnetic properties of CoFe2O4. Precursors were prepared by sol–gel and thermally treated at 550, 650, and 750 °C for 2, 4, and 6 h. The microstructure was characterized by XRD, BET, SEM, and Raman spectroscopy. Treatment longer than 6 h at temperatures higher than 650 °C produced less inverted nanoparticles with larger crystallites. Although the initial annealing conditions did not influence the ferrites bandgap, VSM results showed an opposite response. The maximum in coercivity (1654.25 Oe) was obtained in the sample annealed in the shortest time (2 h) and at the lowest temperature (550 °C). Statistical analyses prove that despite not affecting the results in the same manner, both initial conditions affected the CoFe2O4 properties. Our results open up the possibility of improving the CoFe2O4 manufacturing process for commercial exploration.© 2022Linear electromagnetic actuators (LEAs), which conduct linear physical movements driven by electromagnetic force, are widely used in various applications. However, LEAs are very sensitive to magnetic fields because of their ferromagnetic materials. The failure of LEA under magnetic field interference is a potential threat to the system reliability and safety. Therefore, it is significant to reduce magnetic field interference on LEAs. In this paper, a novel method to increase the immunity of LEAs against disturbing magnetic field by simply adding two small iron legs is proposed. The iron legs change the magnetic field distribution in LEA, and significantly reduce the magnetic field interference of LEA. Compared with conventional magnetic shielding, the proposed method shows great advantages of higher failure threshold, smaller space occupation and lower material cost. Experimental tests are also performed to verify the theoretical analysis, and the results fit well, which prove the effectiveness of this method. In general, this paper provides a simple and effective method to improve the immunity of LEAs against disturbing magnetic field, and the idea can also be extended to the antimagnetic design of other similar devices.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In order to realize the secondary use of Nd-Fe-B magnet scraps, Nd-Fe-B recycled magnets have been widely applied. However, the poor corrosion resistance due to the rare earth oxide (RE-O) in grain boundary limits their application. In this work, 0.3 wt% of Cu powder with average grain size of 1 μm was added to improve the corrosion resistance of Nd-Fe-B recycled magnet. In comparison with the initial Nd-Fe-B recycled magnet, mass loss of accelerated corrosion test after 168 h for the Cu-modified Nd-Fe-B recycled magnet dramatically drops from 30.35 mg/cm2 to 0.0078 mg/cm2. Correlated with XRD Rietveld refinement and TEM results shows that the improved corrosion resistance is attributed to the crystal structure of RE-O change at the grain boundary phase from hcp/amorphous with high oxygen content to the Cu-rich GB phase with lower oxygen content at triple junctions after Cu modification. The formed new grain boundary phase in the Cu-modified magnet possesses low relatively Volta potentials, contributing to the enhancement of anti-corrosive properties. This work paves an effective way to obtain optimal corrosion resistance and maintain high magnetic properties simultaneously in Nd-Fe-B recycled magnet, which is beneficial to recycling of waste magnets.© 2022We investigate the magnetocaloric effect in the intermetallic ferromagnetic PrRh2 compound in which two possible crystalline electrical field level schemes were reported, from inelastic neutron scattering. The levels schemes parameters (set A and set B) were considered in our model Hamiltonian and anomalous effect were predicted in the isothermal entropy variation and in adiabatic temperature change magnetocaloric quantities. These anomalies were physically understood. The set A leads to a strong quenching in the Pr3+ magnetic moment and the set B leads to a first order magnetic phase transition.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Liquid phase epitaxial (LPE) Bi-substituted YIG films exhibit a large growth-induced magnetic anisotropy (GIMA) perpendicular to the film surface. The GIMA depends on the melt composition and supercooling in the LPE growth. Our film shows a large Ku value of 0.1 × 104 J/m3 even at a Bi content, x, of 0. We assume that GIMA enhances the spin-orbital coupling (SOC) in the local d-electron spins of Fe3+, and that the SOC-enhanced thermal energy transfer from the phonon system to the spin system increases spin currents in spin-thermoelectric (STE) generation. We discuss the characteristics of STE generators on the basis of data obtained from ferromagnetic resonance measurements.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.To save energy and reduce noise in high-efficiency transformers that use grain-oriented steel (GO), iron core loss reduction and magnetic flux density improvement of the GO are necessary. However, the addition of other elements (such as Co, Ni, and Mn) to the GO, which is mainly composed of Fe and Si, to improve its magnetic performance makes it difficult to roll GO into sheets because of the resulting decrease in ductility. Therefore, we synthesized Mg1−xCoxO two-component powders via coprecipitation to form an annealing separator on GO sheets and simultaneously improve their magnetic properties. The Mg0.7Co0.3O powder, which includes nano-sized polygonal particles with high crystallinity, was manufactured under base conditions and inert heat-treatment conditions at 800 °C to facilitate the preparation of an aqueous slurry. Compared to MgO powders, the Mg0.7Co0.3O powder forms forsterite more easily because of the low activation barrier of the solid-state reaction between it and SiO2 because of Co addition. In addition, Mg0.7Co0.3O-based forsterite glass film, which was coated on the GO sheet in a reduction environment, improved the magnetic properties of the GO sheet, such as core loss and magnetic flux density, because of Co diffusion from the forsterite to the GO sheet.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The mixed spin-1/2 Ising model and spin-1 Blume–Capel model in an hexagonal nanowire structure under the presence of crystal field is considered. The free energy is obtained through the transfer matrix technique, which is solved numerically. Our main result lies in the presence of pseudo-transition in low temperature region near the ferrimagnetic/ferromagnetic boundary, due to the influence of a crystal field. The evidence of a pseudo-transition is observed in several quantities. Free energy first derivative quantities like entropy and internal energy show an abrupt but continuous jump, whereas quantities associated with second derivatives of the free energy like the specific heat exhibit a strong sharp peak, quite similar to a second order phase transition. We also investigate magnetization patterns and do not find evidence of spontaneous magnetization. Nevertheless, assuming a small magnetic field, we can induce a magnetization which resembles a spontaneous magnetization at a pseudo-critical temperature.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.High magnetic performances are achieved using limited amount of heavy rare earth. The high coercivity of Nd-Fe-B-type magnets are obtained by magnetron sputtering heavy rare earth and cobalt on their surface, followed by vacuum heat treatments. It means that limited heavy rare earth can be used to achieve the higher performance of magnets to meet the demanding requirements. Dy-Co film was successfully deposited on the surface of commercial sintered Nd-Fe-B magnets with direct current (DC) magnetron sputtering, and the elements entered into NdFeB – type magnets through grain boundary diffusion process (GBDP). The maximum energy product, (BH)max, 423.07 kJ/m3 is achieved after the processing. The coercivity, Hcj is increased by 25.7 %, while the remanence, Br, declines slightly. Microstructural investigations indicate that the main phase grain is surrounded by a well-formed (NdxDy1-x)2Fe14B shell. The higher magnetic anisotropy field, HA, of (NdxDy1-x)2Fe14B hard magnetic phases and the optimized grain boundary structure with Dy-Co diffusion contribute to the increase of Hcj. The temperature stability of Dy-Co diffused magnets is improved.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The magnetism of many cerium-based compounds has been studied considering the hybridization of its local f1 state with itinerant electrons, a mechanism that originates an anisotropic RKKY-type interaction between two neighboring local moments. The orbital degrees of freedom of the f-levels play a fundamental role in this mechanism, as shown in the well-known and broadly used Coqblin–Schrieffer formalism, which, however, is valid only for ions very far apart, yields an effective Hamiltonian that is not hermitian and does not reflect the interchange symmetry when applied for two identical ions. Therefore, the off-diagonal terms of the interaction energy do not exhibit the Friedel oscillations typical of the RKKY interactions. Through an exact evaluation of Ruderman–Kittel-like integrals, we extended such formalism to any ionic separation, corrected the non-hermiticity and the lack of ionic interchange symmetry, which recovered the Friedel oscillations. These improvements strongly impact the contribution of each angular momentum component to the ionic interaction-energy and hence whether ferro- or anti-ferromagnetic alignment is favored. As an example, we calculated the temperature dependence of the magnetic susceptibility for a simple system of Ce-Ce free dimers and show that striking differences exist when compared with the susceptibility evaluated using the original Coqblin–Schrieffer formalism.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Magnetodielectric (MD) composite ceramics NiFe2O4/Pb(Zr0.53Ti0.47)O3 (NFO/PZT) and Ni0.4Zn0.6Fe2O4/Pb(Zr0.53Ti0.47)O3 (NZFO/PZT) were prepared by conventional oxide ceramic technology. The MD effect and electric-field-induced magnetic permeability (EIMP) to different excitation signals were studied in detail, including ac and dc magnetic fields, and ac electric field. Among them, the amplitude H0 of ac magnetic field plays a main role in the MD effect. The MD behavior mainly comes from the magnetoelectric coupling between the ferroelectric and magnetic components in the magnetoelectric composites after a detailed analysis. The maximal dielectric change of NFO/PZT and NZFO/PZT composite ceramics reach 0.83% and − 0.49%, respectively. Nevertheless, the EIMP is weak to the ac electric field. The possible application of MD materials in device was proposed on the basic of the research results of the electrical or magnetic properties under the outfield excitation.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The ferrofluid second-order buoyancy is the unique characteristic of the ferrofluid, the applications based on this characteristic were dampers, vibration absorbers, gyroscopes, and so on. At present, one of the critical steps is to obtain the accurate values of the second-order buoyancy. Previous methods only estimate the second-order buoyancy with the permanent magnet submerged in a closed container and only simulate the single magnetic field. A new method is derived by calculating the differential pressure with different surfaces of the cylindrical permanent magnet to obtain the second-order buoyancy, which is applicable for the open container in this paper. The two-dimensional axisymmetric model with a free boundary is calculated by the magnetic-flow coupled finite element method. Besides, experimental research is conducted to verify the simulation. Furthermore, it found that the free surface and the postures of the cylindrical permanent magnet will influence the second-order buoyancy.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic circular dichroism (MCD) spectroscopy is a powerful method to investigate and characterize magnetic materials' spin and excited electronic states. This spectroscopy method, relying on measuring the absorption difference between left circularly polarized (LCP) light and right circularly polarized (RCP) light is more precise than other spectroscopic methods. It was induced in a sample by a strong magnetic field oriented parallel to light propagation. A magnetic circular dichroism measurement system was launched in this study. The measurement setup consists of a collimator xenon lamp crossing at a polarizer angle to the main modulator axis. The obtained circular polarized light passes through the sample and is finally collected by a spectrometer. The study analyzed magnetic photonic crystal positions and transition types TiO2/SiO26/Bi:YIG/TiO2/SiO26 in the range of 500 to 700 nm; three paramagnetic transitions 6A1(6S)→4T2(4G), 6A1(6S)→4T1(4G) and, 6A1g(6S)→6T2g(6G) due to crystal field transitions at 510, 550, 580, 610, and 680 nm were identified.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Linear and non-linear response analysis of thermoelectric effects are performed in the magnetic tunnel junctions (MTJs) using non-equilibrium Green's function method. By introducing the band-pass transmission idea, the charge and spin thermoelectric generators are found for the band-pass (or anti-reflective) MTJs. An improvement in the thermoelectric properties is shown for the anti-reflective MTJs (A-RMTJs) as optimal efficiency of 65.35% and figure of merit of 21.74 at room temperature and perpendicular configuration of magnetizations. Therefore, one can design the practical A-RMTJs for applications in the field of spincaloritronics.© 2022 The AuthorsMagnetic Particle Imaging (MPI) is a multidisciplinary research field. It has many promising applications, and the imaging devices are actively being scaled to human size. As such this work aims at providing insight into some of the different fields connected by MPI. The research areas covered within this work include, amongst other things, simulations of magnetic particles, magnetic particle spectroscopy, MPI scanners and future theranostic applications. A short introduction in each field is given followed by a discussion of some recent trends and developments within it.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The sensitivity of the induced magnetic signals to microstructures makes it possible to characterize nondestructively the mechanical properties of ferromagnetic materials. In this study, utilizing the hysteresis loop measurement and the magnetic Barkhausen noise measurement, the correlation between the mechanical and the magnetic properties of low-alloy multiphase transformation-induced plasticity (TRIP) steel after plastic deformation was investigated, then the strength of the TRIP steel after plastic deformation was characterized. The results showed that, as the strain level increased from 0 to 0.2, the martensite volume fraction of TRIP690 steel increased from 0.78% to 3.64% which contributed to the enhancement of mechanical properties and the change of magnetic properties, and in particular, hardness and tensile strength had linearly increased by approximately 42% and 20%, respectively. Meanwhile, the peak value of the magnetic Barkhausen noise signal (MBNS) increased linearly with the increasing strain levels, the coercivity increased rapidly and then slowly, while the susceptibility decreased exponentially. By theoretically deriving the effects of the ferromagnetic phase volume fraction, dislocation density and residual stress of the TRIP690 steel on susceptibility and coercivity, the variation of the MBNSs under the influence of phase transformation, dislocation and residual stress was analyzed. The above non-destructive magnetic technique makes it possible to evaluate the mechanical response of the TRIP steel after plastic deformation, which allows it to be further applied to the quality evaluation of steel parts in stamping, such as body-in-white for the automotive industry.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Spintronics on flat surfaces has been investigated over the years, and the scenario is relatively well-known; however, there is a lack of information when considering non-flat geometries. In this paper, we are interested in the spin current on the spherical surface of a ferromagnetic insulator. We are mainly concerned with the superfluid spin current transport when spin current is injected at the north pole and propagates to the south pole. We evaluate the spin transport over the spherical surface using the magnetoelectric circuit theory and the semiclassical magnetization formalism. Including the magnetization damping by the Landau–Lifshitz–Gilbert equation, we obtain a spin current that propagates over distances larger than the magnon ballistic decay length, evidence of spin superfluidity. In addition, provided that the ejected spin current is always radially aligned, along with the dissipationless nature, a spherical shell could be used as an efficient oriented spin valve.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.We study the thermal stability of ΔE-effect and field sensitivity on the Fe67Co10Cr3Si5B15 (FCCSB) ribbons with different acid-etching time. The testing temperature (T) range is from 30 to 240 °C. For all samples, we observed a general feature of ΔE-effect increasing with magnetic field up to a saturation value. The slope of ΔE versus field, defined as field sensitivity, is positive in contrast to that of the samples without Cr, suggesting the Cr-adding can alter the lattice response to the field from shrink to expansion due to the antiferromagnetic interaction of Cr-Fe. Without acid treatment, the sample annealed at 390 °C under field of 2000 Oe yields a maximum ΔE-effect. With the additional acid treatment for 40 mins before annealing, the thermal stabilities of ΔE-effect and field sensitivity are enhanced. Cross section TEM images provide an evidence for the etching induced surface crystallization. Thus, we attribute the etching enhanced thermal stability of ΔE properties to the modification of interfacial stress. This study provides useful information for the application of FCCSB ribbons as a field sensor with anti-corrosion properties.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Giant magnetoimpedance (GMI) effect is suitable for application in magnetic field sensing technology due to its high sensitivity to magnetic field. Improving GMI effect through the optimization of some intrinsic properties such as component and domain structure of magnetic materials encounters great challenges. Inspired by the material-structure integrated design philosophy and metamaterial design paradigm, a joule-annealed Co68.7Fe4Si11B13Ni1Mo2.3 magnetic microwire with square spiral macrostructure is proposed here to tremendously enhance GMI ratio (∼43,000%) and magnetic field sensitivity (∼6300%/Oe), which smashes the restriction brought from the material itself on GMI effect intensity. The coupling effect of ferromagnetic resonance arising from intrinsic properties of the magnetic material itself and LC resonance induced by the inductance of the square spiral structure and the parasitic capacitance of the microstrip line proves to be responsible for the obtained ultra-large GMI effect. Moreover, considerable GMI performance can still be obtained above the ferromagnetic resonance frequency, broadening the operating frequency range and breaking the restriction caused by the single ferromagnetic resonance. These make the square spiral microwire an excellent candidate for sensing application. This work provides a new and comprehensive approach of material-structure integrated design with the superiority of symphony of material itself and macro-configuration to realize ultra-large GMI effect.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Cr1-xTe epitaxial films have been grown on SrTiO3 (1 1 1) single-crystal substrates using molecular beam epitaxy. The effects of substrate temperature on the structural, electronic, and magnetic properties of the Cr1-xTe films are studied. As the substrate temperature increases, the Cr content increases, which results in the increase in the Curie temperature and in-plane magnetization and decrease in the out-of-plane magnetization and coercive field as well as significant changes in magnetoresistance and perpendicular magnetic anisotropy of the Cr1-xTe films. All Cr1-xTe films show metal-to-semiconductor-like transitions which are coupled with paramagnetic-to-ferromagnetic transitions whose temperatures depend on the Cr concentration x. Upon the application of magnetic fields, all samples show negative magnetoresistance effect which is strongest near the transitions and can be understood within the framework of electronic phase separation. These results demonstrate that the substrate temperature have significant effects on the magnetic and magnetotransport properties of Cr1-xTe films and should be carefully controlled in order to obtain desired electronic and magnetic properties.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.This paper proposes a non-linear magnetic equivalent circuit (MEC) model for three different dual stator consequent pole permanent magnet (DSCP-PM) machines. It also includes both no-load and on-load electromagnetic performance criteria. The fundamental of the MEC model is that it takes into the influence of winding flux leakage and iron saturation consideration. Besides, winding magneto motive forces (MMF) of DSCP-PM machines are applied to model both distributed winding and concentrated winding. An iterative algorithm is applied to resolve the problem when magnetic steel is severely saturated. Furthermore, the modeling for DSCP-PM machine provides a standard for modeling this machine. Finally, the MEC model's accuracy and practicality for DSCP-PM machine are validated by the finite element (FE) method.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.This paper discusses laser hardening depth inspection via the industrial 3MA- eddy current module by combining numerical modeling and experiments. The hardening treatment process leads to difference in microstructure from the surface to the bulk, which engenders various signatures in the eddy current signals, using single frequency Eddy current excitation, it is possible to define a link between the measured quantities and laser hardening depth. The results of finite element simulations confirms that the obtained signals are intrinsically linked to the magnetic properties of the specimen material. From the profile of the eddy current signals versus laser hardening depth, the skin depth is accurately evaluated at the indicated frequency.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Size control in the synthesis of Co nanoparticles (NPs) through thermolysis of Co2(CO)8 is achieved by adjusting the chain length of linear carboxylic acids used as ligands. As the chain length increases, steric effects reduce the reactivity of the carboxylic acids, thereby slowing the nucleation rate. In the subsequent growth phase, completing deposition of Co precursor onto fewer nuclei yields an increased NP size. Oxidation of Co NPs under ambient atmosphere causes formation of an antiferromagnetic CoO shell that can exchange couple to the Co core, resulting in exchange bias. The superparamagnetic blocking temperature (TB), coercivity (HC), and exchange shift (HEB) strongly depend on the size of the NP, and the most pronounced effects of exchange bias are observed for the smallest Co core size.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Starting with a minimal model for the CuO2 planes with the on-site Hilbert space reduced to a charge triplet of the three effective valence centers [CuO4]7−,6−,5− (nominally Cu1+,2+,3+) with different conventional spin, different orbital symmetry, and different local lattice configuration, we develop a unified non-BCS spin–pseudospin model to describe the main phase states of doped cuprates. We argue that antiferromagnetic insulating, charge ordered, superconducting, and Fermi-liquid phases are possible phase states of a model parent cuprate, while typical phase state of a doped cuprate, in particular mysterious pseudogap phase, is a result of a phase separation. Superconductivity of cuprates is not a consequence of pairing of doped holes, but the result of quantum transport of on-site composite hole bosons, whereas main peculiarities of normal state can be related to an electron–hole interplay for unusual Fermi-liquid phase and features of the phase separation. Puzzlingly, but it is the electron–lattice interaction, which in the BCS model determines s-wave pairing, in the model of local composite bosons gives dx2−y2-symmetry of the superconducting order parameter, thus showing once again a substantial involvement of the lattice in the cuprate's HTSC.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Magnetorheological (MR) fluids have been extensively utilized in broad applications in diverse fields because they are characterized by many attractive features, such as high yield strength, low sensitiveness to impurities, wide operating temperature range, and fast response. Constitutive modeling is a very useful tool for characterizing the rheological properties of MR fluids, which plays a significant role in the design and optimization of MR devices. Over the past few decades, many constitutive models have been proposed for MR fluids. This article aims to provide an overview of the constitutive models of MR fluids and the applications of these models in MR device modeling, including quasi-static modeling, dynamic modeling, and finite-element modeling, along with a brief coverage of the constituents and rheological properties of MR fluids. The attention is mainly focused on the macroscopic parametric constitutive models of MR fluids, and a quantitative comparison among them has been conducted by utilizing a series of representative experimental data sets; while the microscopic constitutive models are briefly introduced since they are quantitatively fewer than the macroscopic models due to their inherent complexity in physics and limited applicability in practice. The review also analyzes the gaps in studies on the constitutive modeling of MR fluids, identifies the research directions, and makes suggestions for future development.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanoparticles-mediated hyperthermia was widely studied in the last decades as applicable in cancer therapy. The majority of magnetic hyperthermia research was devoted to improvement of heating efficiency by application of various nanomaterials. The influence of biocompatibility, magnetic properties, sizes, composition, and concentration of magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) on hyperthermia efficiency was extensively studied. Also, the limits preserving biological safety and the chemical stability of MNPs delivered to the tissue were established. However, much less research concerned the impact of the physical interactions between the closest MNPs on the hyperthermia efficiency. Our goal was to demonstrate the relationships between the internal structure of soft tissue containing MNPs, and the thermal effects of an alternating magnetic field. Because agarose-based gel exhibits a tissue-like internal structure, we performed hyperthermia experiments in two types of such gel containing bare and polyethylene glycol-coated Fe3O4 nanoparticles. We described the structural difference and we estimated the ferrogels specific absorption rate coefficients (SAR) from calorimetric experiments. Magnetic measurements showed 11% lower magnetic saturation of PEG-coated MNPs than of the bare MNPs. While the SAR of ferrogel with PEG-coated MNPs was 15% greater than bare MNPs. The structural characteristics calculated from TEM and SEM images were significantly different. Particularly, we observed the nanoparticle agglomeration in the gel with bare MNPs. The bare MNPs uniformly packed and located inside agarose double helices were observed for the first time. The distribution of MNPs and their spatial configuration in gel influenced strongly the strength of bonds blocking the movement of MNPs and determined the ferrogels heating efficiency. As the tissues to which we delivered MNPs were composed of agarose gel-like structures, our results may be useful in further research on hyperthermia in vivo.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties and exchange bias effect of the polycrystalline and nanocrystalline La0.375Ca0.625MnO3 compounds have been presented. With reduction of the particle size, uncompensated surface spin induced ferromagnetism is pronounced in nanocrystalline sample. However, at higher magnetic field value, long range charge ordering (associated with antiferromagnetic nature) is predominant even in nanoparticles similar as bulk counterpart. Exchange bias properties of both compounds have been found at low temperature with increasing nature depending on the cooling magnetic field. Significantly large value of the exchange bias effect in this particular bulk compound and modification of it in nanocrystalline sample is addressed considering the disordered polymorphs developed within the charge-orbital ordered phase.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.By using a facile hydrothermal synthesis, NiCo alloys with a particle size of 50–300 nm were prepared. The effects of the Ni:Co molar ratios on the microwave absorption properties in NiCo alloys were studied. The results showed that for Ni:Co molar ratios from 4:6 to 6:4, the morphology of the alloys changed from flower-like to nanoball-shaped. Specifically, the average size of Ni6Co4 was 84 nm, which showed a large specific surface area and produced increased interfacial polarization and multiple scattering. Ni6Co4 alloys exhibited excellent dielectric and magnetic properties, which enhanced microwave absorption properties. The optimum reflection loss in Ni6Co4 alloys was −53.29 dB at 9.44 GHz, and its thickness was 3.29 mm. The effective absorption bandwidth reached 6.64 GHz when the Ni6Co4 alloy thickness was 2.84 mm, which covered the C, Ku, and whole X bands. Additionally, the potential microwave dissipation mechanisms of as-fabricated NiCo alloys were illuminated, which were primarily derived from the optimized impedance matching, strengthened interfacial polarization, dipole polarization relaxation, and magnetic loss. These designs supply an effective way of obtaining promising candidate materials as high-efficient microwave absorbers.© 2021 Elsevier LtdField plate (FP) is a widely used electric field optimization technique in lateral power devices. However, we found that the electric field distribution optimized by FP still has poor uniformity due to the excessive induced charges at the end of FP. To solve the problem, a novel silicon on insulator based lateral double diffused metal oxide semiconductor (SOI-LDMOS) with a field plate auxiliary doping layer (FPADL) is proposed. Our investigation proved that the FPADL introduces an additional part of space charge and partially balances the excessive induced charges at the end of FP. As a result, the FPADL introduces an additional electric field peak and improves the electric field distribution. Thereby, the SOI-LDMOS with FPADL has improved breakdown voltage (BV). The effect of FPADL is verified experimentally. In our experiment, the FPADL is realized by modifying the mask of buffer layer to avoid increasing the process cost. The measurement results showed that, comparing with the conventional SOI-LDMOS with FP, the proposed SOI-LDMOS with FPADL improved the BV by 9.52% with the on-resistance and the process cost maintained. Therefore, the proposed SOI-LDMOS with FPADL is a promising device.© 2022Here we report the study of cobalt doped titanium nitride thin films grown by reactive co-sputtering of cobalt and titanium targets in the presence of argon and nitrogen gases. Thin films were grown with different cobalt concentrations and analyzed by atomic force microscopy, spectrophotometry, X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy, X-ray reflectometry and vibrating sample magnetometry. We have found that the films readily oxidize after exposure to the atmosphere and form a cobalt doped titanium oxynitride. The variable cobalt concentration in the films affects the optical, chemical and magnetic properties. The bandgap of the films generally becomes narrower at higher cobalt concentrations. Cobalt is found to be in a mixture of the high spin + 2 and low spin + 3 oxidation states. At the lower cobalt concentrations, the magnetization is low and it is temperature-independent. Whereas at higher cobalt concentrations, the magnetic response becomes temperature-dependent with a mix of paramagnetism and superparamagnetism at 3–5 K.© 2022Solid state refrigeration is promising to replace the traditional vapor compression refrigeration technology because of the environment friendliness and energy saving. The application of solid state refrigeration requires the refrigerants possess not only favorable caloric effects but also wide refrigeration temperature region. However, the narrow working temperature region is a bottleneck problem for this technology. In this paper, we propose a method by combining the magnetocaloric and elastocaloric effects in one refrigerant to solve this problem. The ferromagnetic shape memory Ni43Mn41Co5Sn11 alloy exhibits large magnetocaloric effect across martensitic transformation and elastocaloric effect above martensitic transformation temperature simultaneously. By combining the successive caloric effects at adjacent temperature region, a broad refrigeration temperature region from 250 to 355 K can be achieved. This work indicates the combination of different caloric effects would be an effective way to widen refrigeration temperature region.© 2022 The AuthorsThe effect of uniaxial stress on iron losses of M400-50A grade non-oriented electrical steel sheets cut by punching process is experimentally studied. Samples cut along the rolling and transverse directions and having different number of cutting edges are used for this purpose. Measurements are carried out in the range of 10–100 Hz frequency of sinusoidal excitations at different magnetization levels under varying uniaxial stress by using a single sheet tester. The iron losses are obtained from the measurements and comparative analyses are made for different cases. The study shows that the effect of stress on the iron losses of the punched samples varies depending on the degradation level that the samples have after the cutting process. By considering this varying effect, when the combined effect of stress and punching is analyzed, it is observed that the iron losses increased up to 55.2% under compressive stress. It is also observed that the increase in the losses due to the effect of cutting can be recovered by applying tensile stress.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Sr3Co2Fe24O41 hexaferrite powders were prepared via sol-gel synthesis and calcination. The hexaferrite powders after calcination in the temperature range of 1225–1245 °C had almost a single Z-type phase. The Z-type hexaferrite-epoxy (10 wt%) composite sample exhibits ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) at 2.9 GHz and strong electromagnetic (EM) wave absorbing performance with the lowest reflection loss (RLmin) < −50 dB around the FMR frequency. The FMR frequency gradually shifted to 3.9 and 6.5 GHz when external magnetic fields (H) of 250 and 450 Oe were applied, respectively. It is demonstrated that EM wave absorption in the hexaferrite-epoxy composites arises from ferromagnetic resonances (FMR) in the gigahertz band. The frequency of RLmin changes in accordance with the shift in the FMR frequency induced by an external magnetic field. The Z-type hexaferrite–epoxy composite is a highly promising material for EM wave absorption in the gigahertz band (2–10 GHz).© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Two novel compounds Bi2Ni(SeO3)4 and Bi2Ni(SeO3)4·2H2O were synthesized by hydrothermal method and their crystal structures were solved via single crystal diffraction. The magnetic Ni2+ ions are arranged in a cubic-like mode, while both Bi2Ni(SeO3)4 and Bi2Ni(SeO3)4·2H2O exhibit magnetic frustration. Notably, the magnetic measurement shows that Bi2Ni(SeO3)4 has a Weiss temperature of −21 K but does not exhibit any magnetic ordering down to 2 K. This study provides a scheme for realizing magnetic frustration with compounds of cubic-like magnetic lattice. In the future, it is intriguing to uncover the ground magnetic state of Bi2Ni(SeO3)4.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The performance of electromagnetic devices like motors and transformers is dictated by their efficiency of magnetic energy conversion, and the adequate modeling of this efficiency is essential in device design processes. However, a universal model that yields satisfactory results for this process under both alternating and rotating magnetic fields has yet to be developed. The present work addresses this issue by extending a previously proposed vector dry-friction modeling method to include frequency dependence using fractional derivative operators. The resulting vector model relies on eight parameters that can be adjusted to fit a wide range of experimental data, and thereby provides accurate estimations of magnetic losses over broad frequency bandwidths under both alternating and rotating magnetic fields. The model provides excellent agreement with the commonly observed reduction in magnetic losses when approaching saturation under low frequency rotating excitations, and further includes overshadowing with eddy current loss as the frequency increases. The accuracy and universality of the model are demonstrated under both alternating and rotational magnetization conditions based on comparisons with experimental results.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we report results of the experimental study of the dynamics of a gas bubble separating from the air cavity in a magnetic fluid placed in an inhomogeneous magnetic field created by a ring magnet. Two experiments were carried out for samples with different concentrations: video recordings of the interphase boundary in a flat channel and recordings of electromagnetic vibrations caused by the gas bubble oscillations in a magnetic fluid. It is shown that the bubbles have a stable size. The respective dependencies of the bubble size on the magnetic fluid concentration and the air supply argue that it is possible to use the considered setup as a microdoser or a gas meter in microfluidics applications.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Soft magnetic nanocrystalline Fe80Cu1Nb2Si11−xB6Px (x = 0, 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6) alloy powders with nearly spherical shape were produced by gas-water combined atomization. Effects of the substitution of Si with P on the glass forming ability, crystallization behavior, magnetic properties of the powders, and the properties of magnetic powder cores made of these powders were studied. The P addition enhances the glass forming ability of the powders, facilitates the nucleation of α-Fe (Si) grains, and refines the grain size during annealing. Coercivity (Hc) and the saturation magnetic polarization (Js) of the powders decrease with the increase of P content. The Fe80Cu1Nb2Si6B6P5 powder annealed under 773 K exhibits better overall properties with grain size of 20.3 nm, Hc of 98 A/m, and Js of 1.42 T. The magnetic powder cores prepared from the Fe80Cu1Nb2Si6B6P5 powder have an effective permeability of 23.3 and a relative permeability of 90.5% under a DC magnetic field of 7.96 kA/m, and the core loss of 495 mW/cm3 at f = 100 kHz and Bm = 0.05 T.© 2021Magnetic nanoparticles (MNP)s of Fe3O4 were synthesized in the co-precipitation reaction of iron chlorides dissolved in water and ammonia water. To produce polyethylene glycol (PEG) coatings of the NMPs, we added PEG to the ammonia water during the fabrication process. Magnetic fluids, ferrofluids, for research were prepared as oleic acid suspension of bare and PEG-coated nanoparticles at four concentrations. The results of the conducted calorimetric experiments confirmed that the efficiency of heating ferrofluids strongly depends on the concentration of nanoparticles in fluids. The results also indicate that the ferrofluids containing PEG-coated NPs heat up more than ferrofluids with bare nanoparticles. They are characterized by a higher specific absorption rate (SAR) value calculated from the initial slope of temperature versus time curve during heating.© 2022 The AuthorsWe have studied the influence of controlled defects on the magnetic properties of La0.67Sr0.33MnO3 (LSMO) thin films. We used 100 nm thick epitaxial LSMO films, which were grown on SrTiO3 substrates and introduced stoichiometry changes and defects using oxygen ion irradiation through nanoporous alumina masks. Oxygen irradiation through the mask creates cascades of defects in spatially-modulated regions in the plane of the LSMO film. The magnetic properties of the samples were compared before and after the irradiation. We have found that irradiation reduces the ferromagnetic ordering temperature, decreases the total magnetization, enhances the coercivity, and induces exchange bias below 50 K. The coercivity enhancement is dramatically higher below 50 K and can be associated with exchange bias. These results can be explained by the formation of Mn-rich antiferromagnetic or ferrimagnetic phases within the bombarded regions that are exchange coupled to the non-irradiated - ferromagnetic host.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The structural, magnetic, and electrical properties of Mg1−xZnxFe2O4 (0.0 ≤ x ≤ 0.8) nanoferrites synthesized using a solvent-free combustion route have been investigated. The X-ray diffraction study (XRD) reveals the single-phase nature of ferrites and the size of the crystallites is increased from 10.4 nm to 16.5 nm. Raman spectra show that the position of the vibrational modes varies with Zn. Transmission electron microscope (TEM) analysis shows that the particle size increases from 9.92 nm to 12.59 nm. An enhancement in magnetization is observed up to x = 0.4 at 300 K which decreases thereafter. Further, the samples exhibiting superparamagnetism and the blocking temperature decrease from 138.96 K to 65.27 K. The conductivity at 303 K decreases up to x = 0.6 whereas the activation energy enhances from 0.45 eV to 0.60 eV. The highest value of resistance is obtained for Mg0.4Zn0.6Fe2O4 sample. The results suggest that the prepared samples are promising candidates for biomedical and high-frequency device applications, respectively.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Extensive calculations with hybrid and GGA functionals of the electronic and magnetic properties in cubic AlN for the charged Al and N vacancies are carried out to study the formation energies, the defect equilibrium the induced localized magnetism, the type and range of the magnetic interactions and the possible realization of the magnetic percolation via epitaxial strain engineering during the coherent growth of AlN films. Our calculations are based on the plane wave pseudo-potential spin polarized density functional theory. Our calculations with hybrid and GGA show that only Al vacancies can induce localized magnetic moments. Point defect equilibrium calculation shows that among all the charged Al vacancies, the charge-neutral is the stablest moment carrying state. Study of the collective magnetism between vacancy pairs using the Heisenberg model shows that these defects couple ferromagnetically for the first and third FCC distances and antiferromagnetically for the fourth distance. Thermodynamic considerations show that we cannot achieve magnetic percolation at equilibrium conditions since the minimal vacancy concentration needed for wall to wall percolation is many order of magnitude higher that the equilibrium calculated concentration. Nevertheless, our work shows that we can drastically enhance the vacancy concentration during the coherent growth of AlN films via a tensile epitaxial strain.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In this study, TlInS2 layered semiconducting compound in which In3+ ions were partially substituted by ∼ 1.6 % Fe3+ transition metal ions was prepared by means the Bridgman – Stockbarger technique. The crystal structure of TlIn1-xFexS2 with x= 0.016 in combination with magnetization dynamics and magnetic resonance measurements have been studied. Energy dispersive X-ray (EDX) spectrum of Fe – substituted TlInS2 compound confirms the presence of all the constituent elements in stoichiometric proportions. We concluded that the magnetic properties of TlIn1-xFexS2 were induced by substituting trivalent iron atoms in the place of In3+ ion sites located at the center of In3+S42- structural units of TlInS2 crystal. EPR study reveals that the local site symmetry around Fe3+ center is orthorhombic. The orthorhombic local symmetry can be considered to originate crystal field arising from Tl ligands in the trigonal cavities surrounding Fe3+ transition metal ion. The angular dependence resonance lines show that the crystal lattice contain two structurally equivalent Fe3+ centers localized at different tetrahedron arrays of crystal structure. The temperature dependences of the magnetization measured in the zero - field cooling (ZFC) and field cooling (FC) regimes in the magnetic field of ∼ 50 Oe is found to correspond to a paramagnetic behavior at low temperatures. It has been founded that Fe moments in the TlInS2 host lattice can be ordered to ferromagnetic – like structure. This conclusion in magnetic behavior of TlIn1-xFexS2 compound is well - justified by the existence of very narrow hysteresis loops in the field dependent magnetization curves. Thus, in this work we propose that Fe – diluted TlInS2 is a new and promising dilute magnetic semiconductor with a large potential for future spintronic applications.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Experimental study of magnetocaloric effect (MCE) was performed by direct and indirect methods on La0.70Ag0.25MnO3+δ nanoparticles with rhombohedral LaAlO3 – type crystal structure (R3¯c space group – No. 167, hP30). The content of oxygen was modified by annealing at 800 °C/48h in different atmosphere (air, O2 and Ar). The Curie temperature TC increases from 250 K to 319.5 K and to 322.9 K with the content of oxygen. The adiabatic temperature change ΔT(4T) = 1.52 K, the change of magnetic entropy −ΔSmax(4T) = 3.96 Jkg−1K−1 and the relative cooling power RCT(4T) = 172 J/kg are maximal for sample treated in Ar and decrease with oxygen content. The frequency dependence of ΔT (f) and the shape of maximum in ΔT (T) and −ΔSmax (T) indicate relaxation processes and presence of magnetic inhomogeneities which are present mostly in sample treated in Ar. The samples demonstrate the stability of the MCE up to 1000 cycles of switching on and off the magnetic field without any signs of degradation.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Structural, magnetic, magnetoelectric (ME), dielectric and ferroelectric properties of multiferroic composites based on ferroelectric PFN-PT and ferrimagnetic Co1−xNixFe2O4 have been studied. By changing the Ni content, we tuned the magnetic anisotropy of the magnetic part and studied its role on the magnetoelectric response of the composite. Our results showed that the ME voltage coefficient in the composites of 0.7(PFN-PT)/0.3(NixCo1−xFe2O4) is highly influenced by the content of Ni. The maximum value of ME voltage coefficient, 11.32 mV/(cm.Oe), was obtained for the composite with x=1 and the minimum value, 5.32 mV/(cm.Oe), was found for the composite with x=0.75. In addition, by changing the Ni content, we observed that the behavior of Hmax, the field in which maximum ME voltage was observed, follows the trend of coercivity Hc. We interpreted the results in the framework of dynamic piezomagnetic coefficient and also cation distribution in the spinel structure of the magnetic phase.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Anomalous Hall effect (AHE), which arises when a current is passed through a ferromagnetic material subjected to a perpendicular magnetic field, is proportional to the magnetization of the sample. Additional hump-like features in AHE are often attributed to the presence of non-trivial spin textures leading to topological Hall effect (THE). However, several recent reports have emphasized in context of ferromagnetic SrRuO3 based heterostructures that the sample inhomogeneity can also result in THE-like features. In order to investigate this issue in general for any ferromagnetic heterostructure, we have considered a phenomenological model to calculate the changes in the shape of hysteresis loop due to various interfacial effects. These changes in the magnetization have been accounted for by considering that the interdomain magnetic coupling parameter (α) varies exponentially with the distance from the interface along the growth direction of the heterostructure. In case of symmetric interfaces on both sides of a ferromagnet, we have considered the variation of α as a Gaussian function. We have found that the additional AHE contribution due to the net change in magnetization in such cases are akin to experimentally observed THE, even though we have not considered any topological quantity explicitly in our model. Thus, we propose another situation with nonuniform magnetization profile that may be used to explain additional features in AHE, which might not necessarily be intrinsic THE.© 2021In today's world, thanks to additive manufacturing technology, it has become easier to manufacture fast and robust small-scale swimmers/robots. Small scale swimmers have a great potential to be used in minimally invasive applications by reaching hard-to-reach places in the human body. In this study magneto-responsive milli and sub-milli size robots were fabricated. Fe flakes were synthesized by surfactant-assisted ball milling. The flakes were embedded in the polymeric resin matrix. This blend was then used to print millimetric swimmers in different shapes and sizes utilizing the stereolithography technique. The development of functional millimeter-scale robots/swimmer prototypes cost and time efficiently opens up widespread possibilities in biotechnology and medicine. This work demonstrates the three-dimensional design, development, and production of magnetically actuated milli-swimmers. Afterward, the performance of these ellipsoidal, star, and cubic shaped sub-milli and milli-swimmers is tested and compared to theoretical data for further research and improvement.© 2021 Elsevier LtdProgress of neuromorphic computing and next-generation information storage technologies hinges on the development of emerging nonvolatile memory (eNVM) devices, which are typically organized employing the crossbar array architecture. To facilitate quantitative performance analysis of eNVM crossbar array architecture, this paper proposes a way to study the one-transistor-one-resistor (1T1R, R: eNVM devices) crossbar arrays based on matrix algebra method. The comparative analysis of 1T1R crossbar array modeling based on matrix algebra method and compact-model SPICE simulations verifies the accuracy of the proposed method, which can be directly used for static quantitative analysis and evaluation of 1T1R crossbar array performance. With the proposed method, the optimization of array operation schemes and current backflow issue are discussed. Our analysis indicates that the proposed method is capable of flexibly adjusting array parameters and consider the influence of line resistance on array operation, and can provide guidance for improving the sensing margin of the array through multi-parameter co-simulation. The proposed matrix algebra-based 1T1R crossbar array modeling method can bridge the gap between the accuracy and flexibility of the available methods.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.General formulation for the Mean-Field and Effective-Field theories, with correlations, on the Ising model spin-1/2, were derived to describe the switching properties between the LS and HS states in SCO nanoparticles, with objective of present a new theoretical approach on the spin-crossover materials. These two methods were applied on the Ising spin-1/2 model in a 3D spin crossover nanoparticle. By applying the Mean-Field theory and Effective-Field theory in this way, we have solved a set of coupled equations that correlates the averages of the spins located at the edge (σE), corner (σC), surface (σS) and bulk (σB), present in a lattice of SCO nanoparticles. Besides the magnetizations and thermal evolution of the HS molar fraction, we have obtained some phase diagrams and free energies of the system.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The industrial production of soft ferromagnetic composites demands a quantitative description of process parameters and magnetic performance. Here, Fe–Si/SiO2 soft ferromagnetic composites were prepared via a two-step method combining chemical vapour deposition and hot-pressed sintering. Investigations of surface and section morphology, phase composition and crystal structure were undertaken to characterise the deposition duration-dependence of SiO2 insulation coating thickness in Fe–Si/SiO2 soft ferromagnetic composites. A vibrating sample magnetometer, a resistivity tester and a B–H analyser were used to study the magnetic behaviours of Fe–Si/SiO2 soft ferromagnetic composites. Based on curves of deposition duration-dependence of SiO2 insulation coating thickness and other theoretical models, quantitative relationships between deposition duration and magnetic performance were determined for Fe–Si/SiO2 soft ferromagnetic composites. These results demonstrate that the coating and crystallisation of SiO2 insulation coatings had no influence on the crystal structure of Fe–Si substrate particles and that SiO2 insulation coating thickness increased linearly with deposition duration. Total core loss of Fe–Si/SiO2 soft ferromagnetic composites was strongly predicted by SiO2 insulation coating thickness. A quantitative equation relating magnetisation intensity to Fe–Si/SiO2 soft ferromagnetic composite deposition duration was derived on the basis of experimental data and subsequent model selection. Additional quantitative equations relating electrical resistivity and eddy current loss to Fe–Si/SiO2 soft ferromagnetic composite deposition duration were determined according to electromagnetic theory. These results establish a precise adjustment mechanism for magnetic behaviour in Fe–Si/SiO2 soft ferromagnetic composites and promote the industrialisation of a new preparation process combining chemical vapour deposition and hot-pressed sintering.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The diameter of the magnetic core and thickness of the surfactant layers have an important role in the viscosity of ferrofluid. These factors are not reported in the previous theoretical investigations properly. We presented the graphical results of these critical factors in the present analysis. The present study describes the theoretical results of the viscosity without the magnetic field due to the variation in the diameter of the magnetic core and the thickness of the surfactant layer. The rotational viscosity in the presence of the stationary and alternating magnetic field is also presented. The results show that increasing the magnetic core's diameter reduces the viscosity of ferrofluid and increasing the thickness of the surfactant layer increases the viscosity. It is also observed that a stationary magnetic field always enhances the viscosity of ferrofluids and in the case of an alternating magnetic field, the viscosity of ferrofluids depends not only on the strength but also on the frequency of the field.© 2021For perhaps the first time, we documented the manufacturing of a Ultraviolet detector focused on ZnO nanoflowers utilized a simple spray pyrolysis process on porous silicon substrates. The morphological, structural, and optical characteristics of the sample were investigated using FESEM, X-ray system, photoluminescence spectroscopy (PL), and a UV–vis spectroscopy. The device demonstrated 3.07 × 103 sensitivity when exposed to 355 nm UV-light (1.24 mW/cm2) at 3 applied voltages. In contrast, dark current was 2.8 × 10−6 A, and the photodetector's internal gain was 12.75. Moreover, the rise time and full time were determined to be 1.2 sec and 1.8 sec under UV-light (355 nm, 1.24 mW/cm2) at 3 V applied voltages. Every-one of these results indicates that such a high quality Ultraviolet-detector could become a reasonable alternative for industrially interconnected photo-electronic application fields as a low-cost UV detector.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A heat capacity anomaly in the vicinity of magnetic transition was observed in single crystal GaFeO3 for the first time. The crystals grown along the expected electric polarization direction were characterized by X-ray diffraction, Mössbauer and magnetic measurements. Two separate data analyses of heat capacity showed similar results within the experimental accuracy. Critical exponent, α=-0.2(1), and amplitude ratios of positive and negative reduced temperatures near the critical point, A+/A-=1.2(1), are consistent with behavior of a 3-D Heisenberg ferromagnet.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The transfer of quantum information between the output propagating microwave mode and the radiation that emerges out from the hybrid quantum source through cavity magnonics has been investigated in detail. To examine the quantum optical properties of the system, we employed the input–output theory. We note that significant amounts of quantum entanglement, coherent information-distillable entanglement bits transfer and the Gaussian quantum discord between the output optical and microwave modes are obtained from the proposed quantum source. It is found that the Gaussian quantum discord bounds the quantum entanglement and coherent information. Furthermore, we found that the Gaussian quantum discord is the best quantifier of the source to capture the quantum correlations of the source other than the quantum entanglement and coherent information.© 2022 Elsevier LtdIn this work, a Gate-All-Around Nanosheet transistor (GAA-NSH) is used to design an operational transconductance amplifier (OTA) operating from room temperature to 200 °C. A simulation model for the transistor was created using Verilog A language including a lookup table (LUT) with current response and capacitance data obtained from measurement of fabricated devices. Two OTA designs were made, for supply voltages (VDD) of 2.1 V and 1.5 V. The first design was analyzed at room temperature (25 °C) with different bias points that defined the transistors efficiency (gm/ID) of the first stage input differential pair and current mirror load. A comparison with other OTA projects using FinFET and Tunnel FET (TFET) devices was performed considering similar gm/ID for all designs. The GAA-NSH design presents a larger voltage gain than the FinFET design (71.8 dB vs. 67.6 dB), while consuming less power (544.5uW vs. 1.41mW) and utilizing smaller devices and an overall smaller area footprint. Improvements are a consequence of the superior gate electrostatic coupling of the GAA-NSH transistors that can be seen through the improved transconductance and output conductance values. Compared with the TFET device, the GAA-NSH presents a tradeoff between Bandwidth and power consumption. Finally, the second OTA designed is analyzed from room temperature to 200 °C, and a decrease of the voltage gain and GBW was observed due to the mobility degradation at high temperature.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.By minimizing the magnetostatic potential energy and by finding zeros in the sum of the squares of the torques, we find the equilibrium states of six dipoles of identical strength at the vertices of a regular hexagon and a variable-strength dipole at the center. The seven dipoles spin freely about fixed axes that are perpendicular to the plane of the hexagon, with their dipole moments directed parallel to the plane. When the central dipole is weak compared with the perimeter dipoles, a “circular” state applies in which the perimeter dipole moments circle around the central dipole, which points toward a perimeter dipole. When the central dipole is strong, a more symmetric “dipolar” state applies in which the perimeter dipole moments align approximately with the field of the central dipole. Over an intermediate range of dipole strengths bounded by two critical values, both states are locally stable and the state of the system depends upon its history. Iron filings are used to observe both states in experiments on small spherical neodymium magnets. A “misaligned” state that is barely unstable theoretically is also observed experimentally; this state resembles the circular state except that the central dipole moment points toward a point of contact between two perimeter magnets.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the dynamics of two skyrmions lying in distinct layers of an antiferromagnetic bilayer system, consisting of nanostripes with the shape of racetracks. The top and bottom nanostripes are separated by an magnetic insulator spacer and they are coupled through a ferromagnetic exchange, allowing the interaction between the skyrmions from both layers. Depending on the distance between the skyrmions they attract each other sufficiently to achieve a bound state. We also analyze their dynamics when an electric current is applied in a unique layer and we determine how the bound state nucleation depends on the current density and vertical distance between the skyrmions. Finally, we analyzed the robustness of the bound states by considering two situations: (1) a system constituted by clean or homogeneous antiferromagnetic racetracks; (2) a system in which randomly distributed magnetic impurities in both layers are included in the system.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.A magnetic bimeron is a version of skyrmion, which is predicted for the in-plane magnetized thin films with interfacial Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction. Here we theoretically investigate the possibility to create individual bimeron using stray field of magnetic force microscope (MFM) tip. We demonstrate that a local magnetization reversal of the film by localized MFM field in combination with an additional uniform perpendicular magnetic field enables the stable bimeron formation. The possibilities for detection of the bimeron by the methods of magnetic force microscopy, Lorentz transmission electron microscopy and magnetic resonance force spectroscopy are discussed.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Structural, electronic and magnetic properties of the cobalt (Co) adsorption and incorporation on the AlN (0001)-(2 × 2) surface have been investigated using spin-polarized first-principle total-energy calculations. The exchange–correlation energies are treated within the generalized gradient approximation. Provided that Co is a transition metal with highly correlated electrons, the Hubbard correction is considered with U = 1 eV. The magnetic properties have been investigated considering different magnetic configurations and different coverages. In the Co adsorption, a ferromagnetic (FM) behavior is obtained for coverages from ¼ monolayer (ML) to 1 ML. Concerning the Co incorporation, we observed: FM, antiferromagnetic (AFM) and non-magnetic (NM) behavior at low, intermediate and high coverages, respectively. In the Co substitution, the ¼ an ¾ ML of coverage are FM and the ¼ and ¾ ML of coverage are AFM. We employed the surface formation energy formalism to investigate the thermodynamic stability of the different surfaces. According to the formalism, Co deposit takes place at Co-rich and Al-poor conditions. The DOS and PDOS indicate that the 1st ML of the surfaces is metallic and the lower layers are semiconductor.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In the present work, changes in microstructure, texture and magnetic properties during unidirectional cold rolling of a Fe-21Cr-5Mn-1.5Ni alloy were investigated. For microstructural characterization, scanning electron microscope (SEM) and electron backscattered diffraction (EBSD) were used, while for bulk texture measurements, X-ray diffraction (XRD) was used. Magnetic measurements (M-H and B-H curves) were used to characterize the strain induced martensite (SIM). The band thickness (thickness of grain along normal direction (ND)) reduced significantly more in austenite, than in ferrite with increasing deformation (cold rolling). Also, during deformation, more strain was partitioned in austenite than in ferrite. The saturation magnetization increased with increase in cold rolling reduction and SIM was ∼ 11% after 80% cold rolling. The as-received sample showed strong cube ({1 0 0} 〈1 0 0〉 ) and Brass ({1 1 0} 〈1 1 2〉 ) in austenite and strong α (RD//〈1 1 0〉 ) and γ (ND//〈1 1 1〉 ) fibres in ferrite. After 80% cold rolling, strong Brass ({1 1 0} 〈1 1 2〉 ) and Goss ({1 1 0} 〈0 0 1〉 ) were developed in austenite, while the existing α and γ fibres further strengthened in ferrite. The area under the B-H curve was found to be proportional to strain. Both texture and strain were found to be responsible for this increase.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In the paper the Blume–Emery–Griffiths model is studied for a magnetic bilayer with coordination number z=5. The Cluster Variational Method in Pair Approximation is employed. A special emphasis is put on the magnetic and magnetocaloric properties in the cases of the 1st order phase transitions. For such cases the magnetization, quadrupolar moment and magnetic entropy, as well as the isothermal entropy change and the adiabatic temperature change during demagnetization process are calculated. It is shown that in the vicinity of the temperature corresponding to the 1st order phase transitions the adiabatic demagnetization is not possible. Instead, the demagnetization process with the smallest entropy production is proposed.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.This paper reports the impacts of nickel substitution on dielectric, magnetic, and structural characteristics of Ba4Cu2-xNixFe36O60 hexaferrites prepared via the sol–gel method. The sample was annealed for 5 h at 1200 °C. The crystalline structure, magnetic and dielectric features were examined by X-ray diffraction, vibrating sample magnetometer, and impedance analyzer individually. The specific absorption bands of hexagonal ferrites were identified by FTIR spectroscopy and in the 420–600 cm−1 range. M−H loops of samples were determined to examine the magnetic properties of synthesized materials. Magnetic measurement shows that samples exhibit ferrimagnetic behavior at room temperature. The magnetic properties are described in cation distribution and grain size effect. Dielectric properties of the samples were observed in the frequency range (1–3 GHz). Cole-Cole graphs of prepared materials revealed the influence of grain boundaries. A single semi-circle in the impedance Cole-Cole plots approves a special part of grain boundaries in the conduction process. Dielectric properties are affected by the electron hopping mechanism between Fe2+ and Fe3+ ions. These performances expose that these nanomaterials are appropriate for high-frequency applications.© 2021In this paper, we study the domain wall motion induced by vertical current flow in asymmetric magnetic tunnel junctions. The domain wall motion in the free layer is mainly dictated by the current-induced field-like torque acting on it. We show that as we increase the MTJ asymmetry, by considering dissimilar ferromagnetic contacts, a linear-in-voltage field-like torque behavior is accompanied by an enhancement in the domain wall displacement efficiency and a higher degree of bidirectional propagation. Our analysis is based on a combination of a quantum transport model and magnetization dynamics as described by the Landau–Lifshitz–Gilbert equation, along with comparison to the intrinsic characteristics of a benchmark in-plane current injection domain wall device.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In this manuscript, we first compute Lorentz equations with magnetic b−lines in binormal direction in Minkowski space based on novel studies of evolution for magnetic particles. Then, we further calculate the fractional flow equations for magnetic b−lines with inextensible Heisenberg optical antiferromagnetic flow in Minkowski space. Thus, we determine optical soliton surface related with inextensible Heisenberg optical antiferromagnetic flow in Minkowski space. Later, we consider the corresponding magnetic and geometric quantities to describe necessary and sufficient conditions that have to be satisfied by magnetic optical flux surfaces of inextensible Heisenberg optical antiferromagnetic model.© 2021Magnetorheological elastomers (MREs) is made by embedding micro/nano-sized magnetic particles in a polymer matrix. Among them, the distribution and arrangement of internal magnetic particles have an important influence on the performance of magnetorheological elastomers. Therefore, the current research mainly focuses on the influence of the distribution and arrangement of magnetic particles inside MREs on its performance. However, there are few studies on the trajectory of magnetic particles in the prefabrication process of magnetorheological elastomers. In order to solve the above problems, this paper firstly calculated the magnetic interaction force and fluid force of the magnetic particles through numerical simulation. Then, the equation of motion of the magnetic particles is obtained through the coupling of the magnetic interaction force and the fluid force. Finally, the numerical simulation is verified through experiments. In addition, it is found through numerical simulation that the trajectory of magnetic particles is determined by the direction of the magnetic interaction force, instead of its magnitude. After that, the relationship between the direction of the magnetic interaction force and the motion trajectory is analyzed and summarized. The findings of this study have a directive function in explaining the mechanism of magnetic particle arrangement.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In the present work, the Sm0.74Zr0.26(Fe0.8Co0.2)11Ti alloys with ThMn12 structure are produced by optimum direct quenching (DQ30) and over-quenching (OQ44) followed by different annealing time (OQ44 + annealed). The correlation between the preparation processes, phase constituent, microstructure and their relation to magnetic properties are thoroughly studied. The magnetic properties results reveal that the OQ44 + proper annealed can effectively optimize magnetic properties with enhanced maximum energy product (BH)max of 7.87 MGOe in the OQ44 + annealed 825 ℃ for 5 min alloy. Moreover, compared with the optimum DQ30 alloy, the OQ44 with further annealing is benefit for the precipitation of the soft α-(Fe,Co) phase and obtains a more uniform microstructure, which is also responsible to enhanced exchange coupling and possesses better magnetic performance in the Sm0.74Zr0.26(Fe0.8Co0.2)11Ti alloy.© 2021The influence of Bi3+ doping on the structure, magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of La0.7-xBixSr0.15Ca0.15MnO3 (x = 0, 0.05, 0.10, 0.15) was studied. The samples were prepared by the Pechini sol–gel method. The powder X-ray diffraction data demonstrates that the major phase of samples possesses a single perovskite structure with the Pbnm orthorhombic space group. Rietveld refined data shows that the lattice parameters and unit cell volume become large with an increase of Bi3+. The magnetization measurement demonstrates that the Curie temperature and relative cooling power decrease with the increase of Bi3+ content, while the maximum magnetic entropy change first increases with the increase of Bi3+ content, and then decreases. La0.6Bi0.1Sr0.15Ca0.15MnO3 exhibits a giant value of magnetic entropy (2.16 J/kg·K at around 291 K) under an applied magnetic field of 2 T, and the RCP for this compound is found accordingly as 99 J/kg, which can be used as one of the potential magnetic refrigerant materials close to room temperature.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.We investigated the interaction between spin waves and surface acoustic waves in the [CoFeB/Au]N multilayer deposited on the silicon substrate by Brillion light scattering spectroscopy. We showed that this kind of coupling manifested as an anticrossing in magnetoelastic dispersion relation, can be modified by changing the number of repetitions within the multilayer. The observed modification is attributed mostly to the change in the strength of dipolar interactions which alter the dispersion branch of spin wave fundamental mode and shifts the anticrossing towards larger wave vectors where the magnetoelastic coupling is stronger. The studied range of the wave vector was varied between 0.6·105 cm−1 and 2.2·105 cm−1 while the frequency range of investigations was between 3 and 20 GHz.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The main concentration of this article is to investigate a series of abundant new soliton solutions to the ferrites materials. The Kraenkel-Manna-Merle (KMM) system is used as a governing model that expresses the nonlinear ultra-short wave pulse motions in ferrite's materials having an external field with zero-conductivity. We extract the solutions in different forms like, Jacobi's elliptic, hyperbolic, periodic, rational function solutions including a class of solitary wave solutions such that dark, singular, complex combo solitons, and mixed complex soliton solutions. Recently developed integration tool known as Φ6-model expansion method is applied to analyze the governing model. Moreover, the constraints conditions are explicitly presented for the resulting solutions and singular periodic wave solutions are recovered. Furthermore, for explaining the solutions in physical phenomena, the three dimensional and two dimensional graphs are plotted under the selection of appropriate parameters. The accomplished results show that the applied computational system is direct, productive, reliable and can be carried out in more complicated phenomena. The findings indicate that the system has very rich soliton structures theoretically.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In this work, polycrystalline KBiFe2O5 (KBFO), belonging to the brownmillerite class of monoclinic structure with space group P2/c, is synthesized using a solid-state reaction route. Magnetodielectric (MD) and magnetoimpedance (MI) characteristics of KBFO are studied over a wide temperature (10–300 K), magnetic field (0–1.3 T), and frequency (100 Hz to 1 MHz) range. Zero-field-cool (ZFC) and field-cool (FC) magnetization data show a bifurcation around 11 K, indicating blocking temperature (TB). At room temperature, MD and MI data as a function of the magnetic field shows maximum MD and MI coupling to be ∼−0.6% and ∼0.7%, respectively, at 50 kHz. With the decrease in temperature from 300 K to 50 K, magnetodielectric strength decreases (−0.6% to −0.06%), whereas magnetization increases from canted-antiferromagnetic (MS ≈ 0.16 emu g−1) to a weak ferromagnetic state (MS ≈ 0.44 emu g−1). It indicates the existence of Inverse Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction causing MD coupling in KBFO. MD behavior is also reflected in magnetic field-dependent dielectric relaxation phenomena demonstrated through magnetic field-dependent activation energies. The difference in activation energies of magnetic field-dependent conduction mechanism (Eg ≈ 0.370 ± 0.018 eV) and MD loss relaxation (Eg ≈ 0.183 ± 0.006 eV) indicate both have a different origin. The presence of the capacitive MI effect demonstrates that the observed magnetodielectric coupling is intrinsic. The existence of both temperatures-dependent MD and MI coupling in KBFO makes it suitable for dynamic random access memory as well as novel magnetic sensors.© 2022The paper presents the effect of replacing air gaps with magnetic spacers made of three different materials. For this purpose, the technology of producing prototype cores for three-phase LLC and LCL filter chokes was developed, computer simulation of the distribution of the magnetic field lines was performed, and the magnetic properties were measured. Performed simulations and measurements confirm a significant reduction in flux dispersion when the gap is replaced with a soft magnetic insert. The use of such a solution will significantly reduce or eliminate the dispersion of magnetic flux, which is the reason for the increase in power in the core, excessive heating of the core, and noise generated by the arisen vibrations.© 2022Magnetic targeted therapies have been shown to be very effective at treating tumours in animal models (e.g. Muthana et al. (2015)), but have yet to be widely adopted in a clinical setting. The aim of this work is to correct a widely occurring, but subtle, error in the interpretation of models of magnetically targeted delivery. This can result in inaccuracies in the predicted targeting efficiency of up to an order of magnitude. In order to correct this error a model for magnetic targeting that is based upon a particle conservation law is developed. The close relationship between this model and the standard approach is demonstrated. Interpretation of magnetic particle dynamics in terms of a conservation law leads to an improved understanding of the overall process and results in an alternative, and correct, definition of the targeting efficiency. The particle conservation law approach is illustrated by considering targeting in a flow through a simple network, consisting of a vessel that branches into two daughter vessels, and compared to the standard procedure for computing targeting efficiency, which is based solely on a count of representative particle trajectories. It is shown that the analysis based on the conservation law yields a prediction that compares much more favourably to the results of simple in-vitro experiments performed in this set-up (Riegler et al., 2010) than the standard, but erroneous, approach based on counting particle trajectories. The method of computing targeting efficiency that is developed here, has wider applicability and can, for example, be applied to targeting in complex mammalian vasculatures.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Vector quantities and tensorial properties rule the magnetization mechanisms in ferromagnetic materials. Every ferromagnetic material is anisotropic to some degree in its magnetic response, so this anisotropy has to be considered for a general model. In this study, a multiscale approach based on a statistical description of the magnetic domain distribution and the knowledge of the crystallographic texture is used to predict the anhysteretic behavior along an arbitrary space direction. Combined with the vector Bergqvist dry-friction hysteresis model, qualitatively reliable simulation results are obtained under alternating and rotational magnetization. FeSi 3% grain-oriented (FeSi GO) electrical steel is chosen as study material: FeSi GO are widespread so that extensive data are available and strongly anisotropic, forcing the model toward the “worst-case” scenario from the viewpoint of anisotropy. Moreover, under high excitation of rotational magnetization, losses drop due to the disappearance of the magnetic domains. This behavior is represented correctly by the proposed simulation method. In such conditions, the magnetization behavior is led mainly by the anhysteretic behavior, strengthening the predictive ability of the proposed model. In this manuscript, comparisons between simulations and measurements under many amplitudes of alternating and rotational magnetization for different levels of imposed excitation or magnetization are provided and used to validate the simulation method.© 2021Rare earth soft magnetic alloys have potential in high frequency applications due to strong easy-plane anisotropy. As the research progressed, a new resonance peak in the MHz frequency band, the domain wall resonance peak was observed, which seriously affects applications of magnetic materials in power device. A way to decrease it is by increasing domain wall resonance frequency (fdw). In this paper, the composites of easy-plane Y2Fe17 and polyurethane were presented and the easy-plane Y2Fe17 were treated by nitriding and doping. It is found that both nitriding and doping are effective in increasing the permeability. And the frequency of domain wall resonance peaks is varied due to the variation in exchange interaction by nitriding and doping. These results provide insight into soft magnetic properties of soft magnetic composites (SMCs) in the MHz frequency band, particularly for SMCs in power devices applications.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.The peculiarities of electronic transport of the WTe2 single crystal, in particular, the minimum on the temperature dependence of the resistivity in a magnetic field and quadratic field dependence of the Hall resistivity, were studied. The values of the mean free path were estimated. It is suggested that the observed quadratic field dependence of the Hall resistivity may be associated with the strong electron-surface scattering mechanism, which was previously observed in compensated metals with a closed Fermi surface, under conditions of inhomogeneous distribution of electric current over the conductor cross section.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.We report the discovery of spin glass (SG) and exchange bias (EB) phenomena in NdSrNiMnO6 nanoparticles. Doping at Nd site in the double perovskite compound Nd2NiMnO6, induces antisite disorders leading to antiferromagnetic antiphase boundaries within the system, which are further responsible for the observed phenomena. The role of particle size on these effects has been discussed as the amount of antisite disorder may vary with particle size. We observed a high Curie temperature (TC ∼ 264 K) for small size samples. As the particle size increases, the ferromagnetic (FM) transition becomes indistinct and system transforms to a magnetically frustrated state containing co-existence of FM, antiferromagnetic (AFM) and SG phases. Meanwhile, TC decreases with increasing particle size and the FM ordering becomes unclear for largest particle size sample. The detail investigation of ac susceptibility, memory effect, DC magnetization and magnetic relaxation measurements exposes the SG behavior in the largest particle size sample. By varying the amount of antisite disorders in the NdSrNiMnO6 with increasing particle size, we obtained intrinsic EB effect with a large EB field (∼640 Oe). Further, the EB effect has also been explored by carrying out the cooling field dependent EB measurements in addition to training effect experiments. The exchange interaction between the AFM core and SG like shell of the system is explained through a phenomenological core shell model.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We examine the transport properties of a double quantum dot system coupled to a topological superconducting nanowire hosting Majorana quasiparticles at its ends, with the central quantum dot attached to the left and right leads. We focus on the behavior of the local density of states and the linear conductance, calculated with the aid of the numerical renormalization group method, to describe the influence of the Majorana coupling on the low-temperature transport properties induced by the Kondo correlations. In particular, we show that the presence of Majorana quasiparticles in the system affects both the spin-up and spin-down transport channels, affecting the energy scales associated with the first-stage and second-stage Kondo temperatures, respectively, and modifying the low-energy behavior of the system.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Based on the Monte Carlo simulation, the magneto caloric effect of a spin-7/2 3D-Ising system with pure ferromagnetic interaction was studied. The effective magnetic field h dependent entropy change ΔS was examined and result shows that ΔS follows a quadratic polynomial of hn where n is the cooling exponent. In the high field region the quadratic term h2n becomes comparable with the linear term hn. The quadratic term is strongly suppressed by the increment of the crystal field coefficient D. The ratio of the coefficient of the linear and quadratic term B/C is nearly 250 for D = 4 J (J is the exchange coefficient) and the quadratic term becomes negligibly small compared with the linear term. Furthermore in this ferromagnetic Ising system n continuously decreases from 0.71 to 0.62 for the rise of effective crystal field coefficient De from 0 to 4. This happens due to the enhancement of the + 7/2 spin from 70% to 87% for the increment of the same amount of De. It turns the system from spin-σ to spin-1/2 3D-Ising in nature.© 2021Bi1-xPrxFeO3 material with perovskite structure was prepared using organic tartaric acid-assisted sol–gel self-propagating combustion method to obtain high-efficiency microwave absorption materials. The influence of the introduction of Pr on dielectric properties and permeability was further studied. After 15% Pr introduced, the lowest reflection absorption loss reaches –32.34 dB, but the absorption bandwidth is only 2.25 GHz. When Pr is 5%, the lowest reflection absorption loss value of −27.31 dB is obtained, and the effective bandwidth which below −10 dB is 3.41 GHz. The structural changes in the process of Pr replacing Bi were analyzed to explore the properties of BPFO perovskite. The influence of strong interaction force, residual magnetization, and natural resonance of ceramic nanoparticles on microwave absorption performance was explored. This work supplies a reliable candidate material for making up electromagnetic attenuation ceramic materials with excellent properties.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Magnetism can be induced in two-dimensional (2D) group IV monochalcogenide monolayers (MLs) by the decoration of transition-metal (TM) atoms. The induced magnetism in the group IV monochalcogenides enhances their potentiality in 2D spintronic devices, which has attracted extensive attention nowadays. In this context, the structural, electronic, and magnetic properties of transition metal atoms (Mn, Fe, Co) adsorbed SnX (X = S, Se, Te) MLs are investigated by using first-principles calculations. The TM atoms adsorbed SnX MLs are found to be energetically stable with the pnma space-group, and show the semiconducting nature with electronic band gaps in the range of 0.52–1.05 eV revealing the negligible spin–orbit coupling effect in most of the studied systems. The asymmetry between spin majority and spin minority channels is revealed in the electronic density of states of the adsorbed systems, which is mainly contributed by the hybridization of the 3d orbitals of TM atoms with the 4p and 4s orbitals of Sn and X atoms. Magnetic states are realized for SnX atoms in the adsorbed systems with the induced magnetic moments between −0.03 to −0.33 μB, which indicates the antiferromagnetic alignment between TM atoms and neighboring SnX atoms. Co adsorbed SnSe and Fe adsorbed SnTe MLs are found to have significant magneto-crystalline anisotropy energy values of 0.37 and 0.84 meV/TM atom, respectively, with the preferred perpendicular direction. In addition, the p-type doping is induced in the SnX MLs as indicated by the calculation of charge transfer between the adsorbed TM and SnX atoms. The results demonstrate potential applications of TM atoms adsorbed SnX MLs for spintronic and magnetic storage devices.© 2021High-temperature damage in Cr25Ni35Nb alloys can be differentiated into four stages: the almost perfect stage, Carbide grain boundary coarsening stage, early creep stage and critical failure stage. In this paper, a novel approach based on a magnetic signature to monitor the alloy transitions between the four stages is proposed. Since the difference (ΔNi/Cr) between the content ratio of Ni to Cr in grains and the average value of the ratio of Ni to Cr of the alloy vary at different stages, these variations are highly correlated to the magnetic signature, coercive force (Hc). Thus, the curve of Hc vs ΔNi/Cr, which is “M” shaped over the whole life of the alloy, can be used to estimate the remaining life of the alloy tube using the easy measurement of coercive force. The first “U” inflection point indicates that the early creep stage has started and the second inverted “U” inflection point indicates that the critical failure stage is coming up. By identifying the inflection points, the alloy critical failure time can be predicted.© 2022 The AuthorsMicromagnetic simulations are an essential tool in the theoretical study of magnetic skyrmions. When confined into nanometric samples, these structures can serve as bits of information among other possible applications. Accurate simulations are one of the major sources of theoretical results. In the case of confined skyrmions, it is known that the boundaries play a critical role in their stabilization. However, most of the micromagnetic simulations are done using a finite-difference method with quadrilateral meshes, that do not exactly fit the boundaries. The use of this mesh can introduce a significant numerical error that can completely change the results of the simulations. We present here two different finite-difference meshes to study skyrmions in confined disks, taking advantage of the symmetry of that geometry. A two-dimensional cylindrical mesh for non-symmetric scenarios but geometrically symmetric (boundary conditions) that reduces the propagation of the numerical error, and the particular case of a one dimensional mesh for axisymmetric scenarios where the computation time is hugely reduced.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.A green chemistry-based approach to nanoparticle synthesis is an eco-friendly, simple, and cost-effective way to fabricate nanoparticles. This study aims at the biomedical applications of green synthesized near-infrared (NIR) active superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles (SPIONs). The SPIONs obtained by the green synthesis route are non-toxic and their surface is free from any chemical impurity. The MTT [3-(4, 5-Dimethylthiazol-2-yl)-2, 5-Diphenyltetrazolium Bromide] assay was accomplished on human cervical cancer (HeLa) cells and shows that the SPIONs are biocompatible and thus safe for cells even at higher concentrations up to 500 μg/ml. The synthesized SPIONs display an absorbance in the tissue transparent NIR wavelength region. The SPIONs exhibit a superparamagnetic behavior with high saturation magnetization of 66 emu/g. Owing to their excellent optical and magnetic properties, the potential of these green synthesized SPIONs as an exogenous contrast agent in deep-tissue magnetomotive optical coherence tomography (MM-OCT) imaging was evaluated ex-vivo using chicken breast tissue. A significant enhancement in the contrast and the penetration depth was observed with time. The heating response of green synthesized SPIONs was evaluated under the application of an external magnetic field. The results suggest that these SPIONs could be used as theranostic agents for deep tissue biomedical imaging and therapeutic applications.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Topological protection of chiral magnetic structures is investigated by taking a two-dimensional magnetic skyrmion as an example. The skyrmion lifetime is calculated based on harmonic transition state theory for a discrete lattice model using various values of the ratio of the lattice constant and the skyrmion size. Parameters of the system corresponding to exchange, anisotropy and Dzyaloshinskii–Moriya interaction are chosen in such a way as to keep the energy and size of the skyrmion unchanged for small values of the lattice constant, using scaling relations derived from continuous micromagnetic description. The number of magnetic moments included in the calculations reaches more than a million. The results indicate that in the limit of infinitesimal lattice constant, the energy barrier for skyrmion collapse approaches the Belavin–Polyakov lower bound of the energy of a topological soliton in the σ-model, the entropy contribution to the pre-exponential factor in the Arrhenius rate expression for collapse approaches a constant and the skyrmion lifetime can, for large enough number of spins, correspond to thermally stable skyrmion at room temperature even without magnetic dipole–dipole interaction.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Ferrimagnetic (FiM) materials have attracted much attention owing to their dynamic magnetization capacity, which has potential applications in spintronics. Herein, electronic and magnetic properties of Lu2NiIrO6 double perovskite oxide are investigated under the effect of Ca-doping at Lu site using ab-initio calculations. It is established that the undoped system is FiM Mott-insulator with an energy band gap of 0.20 eV, which is attributed to a strong antiferromagnetic (AFM) interactions between high energy half-filled Ni+23d8 (eg2↑ eg0↓) and low energy partially filled Ir+45d5 (t2g3↑ t2g2↓) ions. The structural and dynamical stability of the doped system is confirmed by computing the formation energy and phonon dispersion bands, respectively. The analysis of magnetic ordering by comparing FiM, ferromagnetic, and AFM energies of the Ca-doped Lu2NiIrO6 system reveals that FiM ordering is the ground state alike the undoped case. A half-metallic behavior is obtained for Ca-doped system, because the admixture of Ir 5d orbitals in the spin majority channel is primarily responsible for conductivity. Moreover, a substantial enhancement in the magnetic moment on one of the Ir ions is also observed due to the reduction of Ir-O hybridization.© 2021The capacitance of magnetic tunnel junctions (MTJs) with the tunneling magnetocapacitance (TMC) effect has drawn lots of attention but there is still a lack of research on the capacitance anisotropy. In this work, a study of the capacitance in MgO-based MTJ is performed. The negative capacitance is observed and indicates the importance of interface capacitance in the MTJ. In further research, the interface capacitance depends on the relative orientation of magnetization in the two ferromagnetic layers (FMs), exhibiting a strong anisotropy. The Debye-Fröhlich model combined with the magnetization dependence of relaxation time is introduced to explain the behavior. Theory and experiment results of the relaxation time as a function of the relative angle of the two FM magnetizations are well fitted. It reveals that the TMC originates from the interface charge accumulation and spin-dependent tunneling. All the results suggest that the interface capacitance with apparent anisotropy plays an essential role in the TMC.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Extra-low-carbon steels are becoming increasingly important for their high magnetic permeability, and reasonable price in industrial applications such as magnetic suspension systems, actuators, and sensors. The application of these steels to the aforementioned parts and industries depends on their magnetic properties. The various manufacturing processes used to make equipment and tools based on this kind of steels affect their magnetic properties. In this study, the effect of electro discharge machining (EDM) parameters on the magnetic properties of extra-low-carbon steel has been experimentally extracted, and the optimum levels of the parameters have been determined for optimum magnetic properties. The selected parameters include pulse-on time, pulse-off time, current, and gap voltage, and the design of experiments was done by the Taguchi method. After machining and preparing the specimens, their hysteresis curves were measured using vibrating-sample magnetometer (VSM), and the magnetic properties of the machined extra-low-carbon steels were calculated. The results show that the optimum parameter levels for the lowest magnetic coercive force include the pulse-on time of 160 microseconds, pulse-off time of 60 microseconds, 16 Amps current, and 70 Volts gap voltage. Also, for the lowest remanence magnetization, the pulse-on time, pulse-off time, the current, and gap voltage are 50 microseconds, 60 microseconds, 16 Amps, and 90 Volts, respectively. The optimum parameters for maximum saturation magnetization are 50 microseconds, 90 microsecond, 12 Amps and 80 Volts for the pulse-on time, pulse-off time, the current, and gap voltage respectively.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Clay-polymer nanocomposites have considerable importance in various areas of engineering; however, the addition of hydrophilic clays into hydrophobic polymer matrices is a challenge due to the low affinity between them, causing performance problems. Thus, the aim of this work was developing a method to improve dispersion and generate a high aligned morphology in clay-polymer nanocomposites. For this, clay nanoparticles with magnetic properties were produced and incorporated (3 wt% and 5 wt%) in low-density polyethylene matrices. The effect of the alignment on the thermal and thermo-mechanical properties of polymer was evaluated. The use of an external magnetic field during the molding process led to an efficient alignment of the nanoparticles, where the magnetic clay nanoparticles lined up along the magnetic field lines. The presence of nanoparticles had a crucial impact on the thermal properties of the nanocomposites with increments up to 40 °C in the initial degradation temperature of the polymeric matrix by forming physical barriers distributed across the samples. The alignment of nanoparticles also resulted in increments of up to 43% in the storage modulus of the polymer as a result of improved adsorption of mechanical energy. The results indicated a very promising methodology with potential application in the production of new polymeric materials with high barrier properties to liquids and gases and thin films with magnetic shielding properties.© 2021 The Author(s)We studied the temperature and strain dependence of the perpendicular magnetic anisotropy in La0.67Sr0.33MnO3 thin films by performing temperature- and angle-dependent magnetotransport measurements. Three films of similar thickness (14 u.c., 14 u.c. and 15 u.c.) but with different out-of-plane crystallographic strain (1.9%, 0.9% and -0.7%) are studied. The films are grown on LaAlO3 and SrTiO3 substrates by pulsed laser deposition. We observe a clear increase in the out-of-plane magnetic anisotropy with increasing out-of-plane strain in the angle-dependent magnetotransport measurements which is present up to 80 K for the highest (1.9%) strained sample. The deformation of the unit cell, as discussed in earlier reports, point to the magnetocrystalline anisotropy as the main driver altering the magnetic easy axis direction. Our results highlight the utility of the effective magnetocrystalline anisotropy as a tool to control the desired anisotropy in crystalline thin films of La0.67Sr0.33MnO3.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.As for the corrosion damage quantification of steel strands by self-magnetic flux leakage (SMFL), the influence of load on cable-stayed bridges was seldomly studied. In this paper, an experimental study was conducted to analyze the loading impact of the damage quantification-based SMFL signal. A characteristic index C was proposed to evaluate the corrosion degree accurately. The experimental results show that the variation of the SMFL signal caused by the corrosion under the load condition is analogous to the unstressed strand under different measuring distances, corrosion widths, and corrosion degrees. The effect of corrosion damage still dominates the signal distribution of SMFL, but increasing load magnifies the SMFL signal's magnitude. The proposed characteristic index C can quantitatively characterize the corrosion damage of steel strands under different loading magnitudes and corrosion widths conditions. When the corrosion degree is less than 30.89%, the corrosion degree of tensile steel strands could be quantified by the proposed index C.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.A Fe87Hf5B8 alloy forms a crystallization layer with textured coarse α-Fe grains in the free surface of the melt-spun amorphous ribbon, which deteriorates the uniformity of nanocrystalline structure after annealing and leads to a high coercivity (Hc) of over 16 A/m. Doping of 0.1–0.2 at.% Y into the Fe87Hf5B8 alloy inhibits the surface crystallization of the melt-spun precursor and contributes to a uniform and fine nanostructure in the whole annealed ribbons. The Y-doped nanocrystalline alloys possess lower Hc of around 9 A/m and maintain high saturation magnetic flux density of 1.70 T. The suppression of the surface crystallization by Y doping is attributed to the improvement of amorphous-forming ability, which is mainly caused by the reduction of oxygen impurity content in the alloys.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We theoretically investigate the quantum magneto-transport property of a two-dimensional semi-Dirac system under a perpendicular magnetic field. Based on the low-energy k⋅p Hamiltonian within the framework of linear response theory, we find that the Landau levels (LLs) are proportional to the two-thirds (2/3) power law of the magnetic field and level index. There is a gap in the LL spectrum and the LL spacing decreases with the increase of the level index. Further, the Hall conductance is strictly quantized with the sequential integer plateaus (in unit of 2e2/h ) at 0, ±1, ±2, ⋯ as the Fermi energy increases. The Shubnikov–de Haas (SdH) oscillation shows some pronounced peaks when the Fermi energy coincides with the LLs. The width of the Hall plateau and the interval of the SdH peak decrease with the increase of Fermi energy due to the decreasing LL spacings. Moreover, the Hall resistance is dependent linearly on the magnetic field in the low field regime but quantized in the high field regime. The longitudinal resistance is nearly a constant and shows distinct peaks in the low and high magnetic field regimes, respectively. Those magneto-transport spectra reflect the structure of LLs well. Our results provide further understanding on the electron states of semi-Dirac electron systems and may be useful in explaining the result of magneto-transport experiment.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.In this work we study the surface effects on small antiferromagnetic (AF) nanoparticles with diameters ϕ ≤ 11 nm and Néel temperature TN ∼ 12 K under spin-flop conditions by means of Montecarlo simulations. Our model consists of spherical nanoparticles with internal AF ordering and a surface with radial anisotropy. We have considered different values ​​of surface anisotropy (SA) and studied the effect it produces as a function of the particle size. Our results show that by decreasing the size of the nanoparticle, the effective anisotropy of the system increases and with it the spin-flop field. Likewise, the influence of SA induces magnetic disorder that is manifested in the magnetization curves as a function of applied field and temperature. These effects are studied by means of some antiferromagnetic order indicators that provide information about the degree of ordering of the system as a function of SA, particle size and temperature. The spin cluster structures play crucial role on the magnetic behavior of the particle as the size is diminished. We develop a very simple model that reproduce the observed behaviors as function of the SA and particle size for low temperatures.© 2022Well aligned Fe2MnGa nanowires (NWs) have been synthesized through low cost and versatile electrochemical deposition technique with constant stirring during the growth process in anodic aluminum oxide (AAO) templates. The average diameter is 50 nm and the lengths up to a few micrometers have been confirmed through morphological analysis. The NWs are found to be in body centered cubic structure with (2 2 0) preferred orientation. The magnetic behavior has been investigated at room temperature (RT) as well as at low temperatures. The dominant shape anisotropy compelled the preferable magnetization axis to be in axial direction of NWs. Angular dependence of coercivity shows coherent rotation of magnetic domain on reversal of external magnetic field due to the stronger interwire couplings. At lower temperatures, superparamagnetic contributions from very small nanoparticles in blocking state significantly improved saturation magnetization (Ms) from 0.101 to 0.205 emu and coercivity from 1354 to 1632 Oe. A mixed behavior of exchange bias has been manifested by the NWs at lower temperatures owing to the rearrangement of atoms between the interface of antiferromagnetic and ferromagnetic grains. This causes significant disturbance for pining effect resulting fluctuating exchange bias phenomenon.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn this work, fluorine plasma ion implantation is used to induce high densities of free holes in homoepitaxial n-GaN for the first time, as evidenced by electroluminescence and p-n junction rectification. F+ ions implanted into the near-surface layer capture electrons from shallow bulk donors, bending the band upward until a high density of free holes is induced at the valence band maximum, and surface donors, depinning the Fermi level to form p-type ohmic contact. Free holes tunnel from the metal into states at the valence band maximum, where they form a conductive p-type channel, benefitting the development of GaN-based junction devices.© 2022 Elsevier LtdIn this study, a new simulation-based design of thin-film-transistor (TFT) frequency-doubling circuits is proposed. Considering the increasingly high technological relevance of novel TFT channel materials showing strongly unipolar charge transport characteristics, the proposed frequency doubler adopts a unipolar circuit topology composed of organic p-type TFTs as a model system. By comparing different circuit structures and optimizing key TFT parameters, an apparent symmetry at the specific, non-traditional voltage-transfer curve of the simple two-transistor logic inverter is obtained, which is directly exploited to produce an ideal frequency-multiplying behavior over a wide operational frequency range.© 2021 Elsevier LtdWe report on the fabrication of an enhancement mode p-GaN/AlN/GaN high electron mobility transistor with selective area sublimation under vacuum of the p-GaN cap layer. The GaN evaporation selectivity is demonstrated on the thin 2 nm AlN barrier layer. Furthermore, the regrowth of AlGaN is a major key to increase the maximum drain current in the transistors and enables the co-integration with depletion mode devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Nitriding of FeNi and FeNiCo alloy particles was attempted. Precursor particles were synthesized by co-precipitates of Fe, Ni, and Co ions with the following compositions: Fe/Ni: 0.5/0.5 and Fe/Ni/Co: 0.5/0.45/0.05. The precursor particles were first reduced in hydrogen gas to obtain FeNi and FeNiCo alloy particles. Both the alloy particles were confirmed to have face-centered cubic (fcc) structures. Nitriding was subsequently performed using a mixture of ammonia and nitrogen gases. The formation of monophase (Fe0.5Ni0.5)4N and (Fe0.5Ni0.45Co0.05)4N was observed by the nitriding of the FeNi and FeNiCo alloy particles. No significant change in particle shape was observed by nitriding. Both the coercive force and saturation magnetization decreased by nitriding compared with those of the FeNi and FeNiCo alloy particles. Mössbauer analyses showed that Site I was preferentially occupied by Ni, and Site II was occupied by Fe and Ni with a Ni/Fe: 1/2 ratio in FeNi nitride particles. A similar spectrum to that of the FeNi nitride particles was observed in the FeNiCo nitride particles with a slightly increased average hyperfine field corresponding to the increase in magnetization.© 2021Developing porous and lightweight carbon-based magnetic composites has been utilized as an effective strategy to fabricate high-performance microwave absorber. Here, CoFe2O4/reduced graphene oxide (CoFe2O4/RGO) nanocomposites with different porous structure have been synthesized using a one-step solvothermal reaction method. The crystallization, micromorphology, magnetic properties, and electromagnetic parameters can be reasonably adjusted by simply controlling the reaction temperature. CoFe2O4/RGO-200 nanocomposites exhibit a strong reflection loss (RL) of −43.0 dB at 14.4 GHz is obtained with a thin thickness of 1.8 mm. Meanwhile, an ultrabroad effective absorption bandwidth reaching 5.6 GHz (12.4–18.0 GHz) is achieved. Moreover, taking advantage of the porous microstructure, magnetic/dielectric cooperation, synergistic effect, and interfacial polarization simultaneously result in the strong absorption capability and impedance matching, which both contributing to the microwave absorption mechanisms. The superior microwave absorption performance and facile preparation method illustrate that the porous CoFe2O4/RGO nanocomposites can be applied as the efficient microwave absorber for large-scale application.© 2022 The AuthorsPartial differential equations and variational problems can be solved with physics informed neural networks (PINNs). The unknown field is approximated with neural networks. Minimizing the residuals of the static Maxwell equation at collocation points or the magnetostatic energy, the weights of the neural network are adjusted so that the neural network solution approximates the magnetic vector potential. This way, the magnetic flux density for a given magnetization distribution can be estimated. With the magnetization as an additional unknown, inverse magnetostatic problems can be solved. Augmenting the magnetostatic energy with additional energy terms, micromagnetic problems can be solved. We demonstrate the use of physics informed neural networks for solving magnetostatic problems, computing the magnetization for inverse problems, and calculating the demagnetization curves for two-dimensional geometries.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This research work investigates the impact of a novel square-shaped metamaterial structure for wireless communications. Hence, the focus of this work was to produce a compact metamaterial inspired design by constructing on a 15 × 15 mm2 sized substrate material known as Epoxy Resin Fiber (FR-4). The trial and error method was used at this stage to construct the metamaterial structure. Overall, eight distinct square-shaped (SDS) metamaterial structures were designed on the 1.6 mm thick FR-4 material. Furthermore, the electromagnetic properties of the metamaterial were discovered by adopting Computer Simulation Technology Microwave Studio (CST) software. A frequency range between 0 and 6 GHz was adopted for this numerical simulation method. Several key parametric analyses were explored in this research work to gain an optimised metamaterial design structure for the proposed application field. From numerical simulations, the proposed unit cell SDS metamaterial exhibited quadruple resonance frequencies accurately at 1.260, 1.980 (at L-band), 4.128, and 5.256 (at C-band) GHz. Simultaneously, for validation purposes, the comparison of measurement and simulation data indicates that only the 1.980 GHz resonance frequency was raised by 0.085 GHz. Meanwhile, the rest of the resonance frequencies were decreased by 0.085, 0.067, and 0.014 GHz, respectively. The simulation results were further validated by utilising different software known as High-frequency Structure Simulator software (HFSS). Both simulation results showed slight differences, and the comparison was highly acceptable. Furthermore, the proposed SDS metamaterial exhibits left-handed behaviour at the first, third, and fourth resonance frequencies. On the other hand, the peculiarity of the proposed metamaterial is that the design possesses a higher and better effective medium ratio of 15.873 for the first resonance frequency. In conclusion, the proposed SDS metamaterial met the goals of this study and can be employed in wireless communication systems.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn this study, the bias dependence of low-frequency noise (LFN) in nanowire type gate-all-around (GAA) MOSFETs was physically modeled. In the model, the inversion carrier density distribution was considered based on the potential in the channel that changes according to the bias. The developed model was verified with measurement data of the fabricated device. The model could help circuit designers to optimize noise performance in analog/RF applications when designing integrated circuits using nanowire-type GAA MOSFETs.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn this article, a reliable parameter extraction method for GaN HEMT devices is proposed. When the parasitic capacitances are extracted, the judgment condition of the pinch-off voltage is introduced, which avoids the reduction of the reliability of the extracted parasitic capacitances caused by the random selection of the pinch-off voltage. A low gate voltage technology is used to effectively avoid the phenomenon of high forward grid voltage damaging or destroying the Schottky grid. At the same time, due to the influence of hybrid drain parameters (Cd and Rd), the extraction formulas of parasitic resistances and parasitic inductances are deduced in this paper. In order to model the gate leakage current of the device, gate-source resistance (Rgsf) and gate-drain resistance (Rgdf) are introduced and the intrinsic parameter extraction formulas are deduced. The small-signal model for a 1.25-mm GaN HEMT device is established and validated, which show that excellent agreement between measured and modeled S-parameters is obtained in the frequency range of 0.5–20.5 GHz.© 2021 The AuthorsWe propose a novel micromagnetic standard problem calculating the coercive field for unpinning a domain wall at the interface of a multiphase magnet. This problem is sensitive to discontinuities in material parameters for the exchange interaction, the uniaxial anisotropy, and the spontaneous magnetization. We derive an explicit treatment of jump conditions at material interfaces for the exchange interaction in the finite-difference discretization. The micromagnetic simulation results are compared with analytical solutions and show good agreement. The proposed standard problem is well-suited to test the implementation of both finite-difference and finite-element simulation codes.© 2022 Elsevier B.V.Ferrimagnetic alloys are promising media for the ultrafast, non-volatile recording of diffractive patterns for further development of computer-generated holography toward practical display applications. In this work we measure and analyze the influence of the overlapping effect during dense point-by-point recording of holographic patterns on the quality of their far field reconstructions. In particular, we numerically and experimentally derive the optimal degree of overlapping of the holographic points being written in GdFeCo alloys for the optimal fidelity of reconstructed 2-D images, which features unitary fill factor of the writing process.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this research, structural, magnetic, and thermal properties of cobalt- based Co64Fe21Zr10Cu5 alloy produced by mechanical alloying were investigated. Structural, morphological, thermal, and magnetic properties of the milled samples were estimated by using x-ray diffraction, scanning electron microscopy, energy dispersive x-ray spectroscopy, differential thermal analysis, and vibrating sample magnetometer. The results showed that after 10 h milling, a solid solution with iron- based structure was achieved. After 20 h milling time, the crystallite size value attained to about 12.5 nm. The magnetic measurements indicated the soft ferromagnetic behavior of the milled samples. The coercivity values showed a significant rise after 10 h milling time with respect to those for the initial powders. The thermal behavior of the samples demonstrated two exothermal peaks for 30 and 60 h samples. Both crystallite size and coercivity increased for annealed samples.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Ferrite nanoparticle based T1-magnetic resonance imaging (T1-MRI) guided magnetic hyperthermia is a promising method for accurate tumor treatment. In previous studies, ultra-small sized ferrite nanoparticles were required to achieve excellent T1-MRI performance. However, an ultra-small size is usually accompanied by weak magnetization, resulting in a low magnetic heating efficiency, which is insufficient for magnetic hyperthermia. Therefore, ferrite nanoparticles with high magnetic heating efficiency and excellent T1-MRI performance capabilities are still highly desired. Here, oxygen vacancies are introduced in Mn0.6Zn0.4Al0.2Fe1.8O4 ferrite nanoparticles by applying carbothermal treatments. As oxygen vacancy concentrations increase, the intrinsic loss power increases up to 2.55 nH m2/kg, which is 33% higher than that of Fe3O4 nanoparticles used in magnetic hyperthermia. Specific absorption rate (SAR) calculations indicate that the predominant heat generation mechanism changes from hysteresis loss and relaxation loss to eddy current loss owing to conductivity enhancement by carbothermal treatments. The eddy current loss accounts for 70.6% of the total SAR, and plays a crucial role in increasing magnetic heating efficiency. In addition, Mn0.6Zn0.4Al0.2Fe1.8O4 ferrite nanoparticles with oxygen vacancies exhibit a significantly high r1 value of 9.69 mM−1 s−1 and a low r2/r1 ratio of 1.6 on a 3.0 T scanner. This is because oxygen vacancies naturally exhibit oxygen affinity in water molecules. The findings of this study could serve as a methodological reference of preparing ferrite nanoparticles for T1-MRI guided magnetic hyperthermia.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we applied Monte Carlo simulation to investigate the dynamic magnetic behaviors of the ferrimagnetic mixed-spin (3/2, 5/2) Ising-type borophene nanoribbons with core-shell structure. The effects of the crystal field, exchange couplings and time-dependent oscillating magnetic field on the dynamic magnetic characteristics were discussed. In addition, the hysteresis behaviors of the system were also presented and the multiple-loop hysteresis phenomena were observed.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We investigate magnetization damping in symmetric NiFe/Ru/NiFe synthetic antiferromagnet using broadband ferromagnetic resonance. The field and frequency linewidth for both, acoustic and optical modes, were measured all along the dispersion relation. These results were compared with a model based on the Landau Lifshitz Gilbert equation. We show that this model explains most of the features observed in the field linewidth measurements, however the phenomenological inhomogeneous linewidth is necessary to fully explain the results. The measured damping parameter for the acoustic mode is in agreement with the intrinsic damping for NiFe, while for the optical mode and enhanced Gilbert damping due to the spin pumping effects was obtained.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In the present paper, we study the pivotal thermodynamic properties of the novel two-dimensional calcium-decorated hexagonal boron nitride superconductor. The analysis is motivated by the ongoing and growing interests in the two-dimensional superconductors and the fact that the discussed material is expected to exhibit relatively high critical temperature, which is well above the temperature of the liquid helium. The presented investigations are performed within the state-of-art Eliashberg formalism, according to the potential phonon-mediated strong-coupling character of the considered superconducting state. In particular, we calculate the thermodynamic properties that allow us to quantitatively determine values of the characteristic dimensionless parameters i.e. the zero-temperature energy gap to the critical temperature, the ratio for the specific heat, as well as the ratio corresponding to the critical magnetic field. The obtained result show that the discussed superconducting state is strongly influenced by the strong electron–phonon interactions as well as the retardation effects and cannot be adequately described within the Bardeen–Cooper–Schrieffer theory. This is to say, the analyzed material is yet another example of the two-dimensional superconducting crystal that may be of potential importance for the development of superconducting low-dimensional devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Perovskites with two different types of cations at one of the sublattices, namely the A-site or the B-site, are called double perovskites. For these compounds, cation ordering may exist when the difference between the ionic radii and oxidation states is significant. The only known example of isovalent cation ordering is Bi2AlFeO6. In this work, using density functional theory (DFT), we analyzed the role of the stereochemically active lone pair on Bi ions, the size of ionic radii, and magnetism on the formation of the B-site cation ordering. The studies were conducted for Bi-based double perovskite oxides with the general formula Bi2MM'O6, where M and M’ are Al, Ga, In, and Fe. Comparing Bi- to La-based double perovskites, we found that the lone pair had a minor effect on the cation ordering. Our results suggest that the ionic radius may play a major role in the rocksalt cation ordering in the non-magnetic Bi-based double perovskites. However, for the magnetic Bi2MFeO6 (M = Al, Ga, In) the interactions between Fe cations may stabilize the layered ordering.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Co-rich Co1−xMnx alloys have hcp or fcc disordered phase and those ferromagnetic orderings are significantly deteriorated with increasing Mn concentration x in bulk. On the other hand, those metastable bcc phases show properties attractive to magnetics and spintronics, as studied recently. Here, we report systematic study of structure and magnetism for epitaxial thin films. The single phase bcc Co1−xMnx(001) films were pseudomorphically grown on Cr(001) for 0.14<x<0.50 with a sputtering technique. The saturation magnetization was larger than that of pure Co for the films with x= 0.14 and 0.25 and smaller for the x= 0.34 films, disappearing completely for the x= 0.5 films. X-ray magnetic circular dichroism unveiled that this behavior stemmed from the composition dependence of elemental magnetic moments. Slight enhancement of magnetic moment of Co was observed in bcc alloy films. We also found that magnetic moments of Mn exceeded 2 μB at the maximum and were not as high as theoretical values, approximately 3 μB, obtained from ab-initio calculation with coherent potential approximation. This difference is qualitatively understood in terms of microscopic Mn atom pairing with antiferromagnetic coupling, being suggested from the ab-initio band structure calculations based on special quasi-random structure of bcc Co1−xMnx.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Vanadium based dichalcogenides, VSe2, are two-dimensional materials in which magnetic Vanadium atoms are arranged in a hexagonal lattice and are coupled ferromagnetically within the plane. However, adjacent atomic planes are coupled antiferromagnetically. This provides new and interesting opportunities for application in spintronics and data storage and processing technologies. A spin valve magnetoresistance may be achieved when magnetic moments of both atomic planes are driven to parallel alignment by an external magnetic field. The resistance change associated with the transition from antiparallel to parallel configuration is qualitatively similar to that observed in artificially layered metallic magnetic structures. Detailed electronic structure of VSe2 was obtained from DFT calculations. Then, the ballistic spin-valve magnetoresistance was determined within the Landauer formalism. In addition, we also analyze thermal and thermoelectric properties. Both phases of VSe2, denoted as H and T, are considered.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic vortices are promising candidates as information carriers for future energy efficient spintronic devices (e.g. memory), and the key challenge is to achieve reversible voltage driven magnetic switching of vortex state at nanometer scale. In this work, we demonstrated the strain-mediated voltage-controlled reversible switching between double-vortex domain and single domain in a nanoscale multiferroic heterostructure, consisting of a Co ellipse nanomagnet on a PbMg1/3Nb2/3O3-PbTiO3 piezoelectric substrate, by means of micromagnetic simulation. In this scheme, the double-vortex state can be deterministically written and erased triggered by applying electric voltage mediated by coupling strain. Besides, the critical strains for triggering the magnetic switching were also explored, which are strongly depended on geometric shape (i.e., aspect ratio) of the ellipse. These findings suggest the possibility of voltage-driven creation/erasure and switching of double-vortex states in elliptical nanomagnets, which provide a new pathway for development of energy efficient magnetoelectric memory and logic devices based on nanoscale multiferroic heterostructures.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A broadband microwave absorber with a sandwich structure has been designed, creatively taking lossless medium (paraffin or air) as the intermediate layer. The paraffin layer effectively adjusted the impedance of the absorber, especially at the high-frequency region, hence observably raising the upper limit of the effective absorption region from 14.5 GHz to 18 GHz. As a result, the effective absorption bandwidth (EAB, reflection loss less than −10 dB) is broadened to 10.1 GHz, covering the entire Ku band and the entire X band, with a total thickness of only 2.5 mm, among which the paraffin intermediate layer has a thickness of 0.8 mm. Based on Maxwell's equations, normalized Poynting vector and loss analysis are given, which reveals the paraffin layer can enhance the total loss, though paraffin is lossless. In addition, the intermediate paraffin layer can also be replaced with air or even vacuum, providing a new perspective for the design of a high-performance absorber with lighter weight.© 2021This work investigates on the crystal structure, magnetic nature and critical behaviour with the partial replacement of transition (Tr) elements (ie., 10% of Cr, Co, Ni) at the Mn-site of Nd0.67Ba0.33MnO3 (NBMO) synthesised via conventional solid-state-method. NBMO compound is crystallised into an orthorhombic crystal structure and possess a magnetic transition temperature (Tc) at 145 K. Crystal structure of NBMO remains the same with partial substitution of Tr elements but, the Tc is found to be slightly increased with the doping of Cr, while decreases with the doping of Co and Ni. The magnetic isotherms are traced, and critical exponents are studied using modified Arrott plots (MAP) and power law. All the substituted samples show a second-order nature of Tc similar to that of the parent compound. The critical parameters are identified and verified through MAP, critical isotherms, Kouvel-Fisher method and field dependence of entropy change. All the substituted compounds govern the 3D Heisenberg with short-range order.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Electronic, magnetism, elastic properties are studies about TbxDy1-xFe2 (x = 0, 0.25, 0.5, 1), (i.e. four compounds: DyFe2, Tb0.25Dy0.75Fe2, Tb0.5Dy0.5Fe2, TbFe2), which is used the first principle based on density functional theory (DFT). The results have shown that these four compounds have obvious metallicity regarding the calculation of electronics properties. About magnetism, Tb0.25Dy0.75Fe2 is better than other compounds, because its magnetic moment is the largest. Besides, analysis of elastic constants shows that all four compounds have mechanical stability. Further, Tb0.25Dy0.75Fe2 has better ductility than the other three compounds. Based on the excellent magnetism and mechanical properties of Tb0.25Dy0.75Fe2, it is providing candidate materials for the magneto-strictive materials using in the field of magnetic field sensing. Lastly, the concentration of widely used Terfenol-D (Tb0.3Dy0.7Fe2) is near the concentration range of Tb0.25Dy0.75Fe2, so it may be similar properties to Tb0.25Dy0.75Fe2. Therefore, this work is also provided a prediction for the microscopic properties of Terfenol-D (Tb0.3Dy0.7Fe2) materials. And then, it is provided a reference for rare earth magneto-strictive materials, which is currently less studied based on first-principles calculations.© 2021The capacity of a magnetic fluid (MF) seal is decreased by increased MF temperature. A cooling system for MF is limited in a miniature MF seal installed in an implantable rotary pump. MF temperature in an MF seal installed in an implantable rotary pump was studied. The temperature of MF in a rotary pump was measured in vitro. Also, steady-state thermal analyses were conducted for an implantable rotary pump model. The results showed that (1) the decrease in magnetization of an MF due to increased temperature is negligible when the heat transfer coefficient of the seal housing is greater than 500 W/(m2·K) and (2) the increased temperature is mainly due to heat flux from the motor, and the magnitude of temperature increase due to viscous friction in the MF is low. In conclusion, an MF seal can be used in an implantable rotary pump from the standpoint of heat characteristics.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.An effective and complete processing route for the recycling of sintered Nd-Fe-B scrap magnets was proposed. Sintered Nd-Fe-B magnets were subjected to the Hydrogen Decrepitation (HD) process at various temperatures in the range of 50–300 °C, at two different pressures, 50 kPa and 200 kPa, followed by vacuum dehydrogenation in the range of 720–820 °C. The structure refinement efficiency and magnetic properties of the powders obtained were characterized. Low hydrogen pressure (50 kPa) was found to increase the magnetic properties at each temperature for all powder fractions. It was also shown that particle refinement occurs at low (50 °C, 100 °C) temperatures for low (50 kPa) pressure and higher temperatures (200 °C, 300 °C) for high pressure (200 kPa), respectively. High pressure also accelerates the initialization of the HD process at each temperature. No correlation was found between hydrogenation temperature and magnetic properties of the powders, except for the small increase in coercivity increase with growing temperature. The coarse fraction (400–500 µm) was found to have the highest magnetic properties for almost each HD process. The best magnetic properties Hci = 497 kA/m, Br = 1.1 T, and (BH)max = 121 kJ/m3 were obtained for hydrogenation at a temperature of 50 °C, pressure 50 kPa and dehydrogenation at 780 °C.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Based on the ultrasonic guided wave detection technique, the effects of the annealing process on the microstructures, properties, and ultrasonic guided wave transduction performances of (Fe83Ga17)99.9(NbC)0.1 thin sheets with thicknesses ranging from 0.06 mm to 0.15 mm for magnetostrictive guided wave sensors in non-destructive testing were investigated. The results demonstrated that in contrast to the texture formed when annealing under an Ar atmosphere, the {1 0 0} 〈0 0 1〉 texture formed in the recrystallized Fe-Ga thin sheets annealed with a flowing Ar/H2 gas mixture, resulting in a saturation magnetostriction of 145 ppm. This might have been related to the influence of the strain recrystallization rate, stored energy, and surface energy. The proposed magnetostrictive guided waves could be used for inspection using the thin sheets. In particular, the thin sheet annealed at 1200 °C for 2 h exhibited excellent guided wave sensing characteristics. This was mainly attributed to the formation of a cubic texture and the value of (dλ/dH) max corresponded to a lower-bias magnetic field. This demonstrated that a proper annealing treatment improved not only the texture but also the sensitivity for guided wave detection. Therefore, this work demonstrated the prospects of applying (Fe83Ga17)99.9(NbC)0.1 thin sheets for ultrasonic guided wave detection.© 2021 The Author(s)Scanning tunneling microscopy (STM) and density functional theory (DFT) are used to determine the structure of mono- and bilayer iron monoxide (FeO) islands and films grown on Ru(0001). The experimental results provide information on the atomic and Moiré periodicities, the height of mono- and bilayer structures, the mutual shift of their crystalline lattices and the rotation with respect to the underlying single-crystal support. Based on the determined parameters, structural models are proposed. The calculations reveal the preferred stacking configurations of Fe and O layers in both structures, their stability within different high-symmetry regions of the Moiré supercell (top, fcc, hcp), the interlayer spacings and the possible magnetic configurations.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Energy-based models (also called Vector Play models) are a class of phenomenological models of magnetic hysteresis. In this work an original identification method is presented. The main advantage of this method is its speed and its robustness. Conversely to optimization-based methods, which are prone to convergence problems, the new method is based on analytical formulas. The method is tested experimentally with three different materials (a ferrite and two non oriented steels), and provide an accuracy comparable to classical identification methods, with a much lower computational cost.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Oxygen-deficient Europium monoxide EuO1−x shows a metal-to-insulator transition near the Curie temperature (TC). A systematic transport study of EuO1−x thin films as a function of exposure time in air reveals a gradually decreased TC from 140 K to 70 K as the concentration of the oxygen vacancies decreases, which is accompanied by a drastic increase in the resistance. We also find an unusual enhancement of magnetic anisotropy in the transport measurements, which results from the strong spin-orbit coupling at the interface between the film and substrate and possible presence of spin-textures like skyrmions in EuO1−x.© 2021 Elsevier LtdResistor-type ammonia gas sensors with different architectures of porous NiO nanosheets are comprehensively studied and demonstrated for their sensing characteristics. During the synthesis process, the amount of nickel nitrate hexahydrate can vary the morphology of NiO nanostructure. Holes on the NiO nanosheets increase the surface area of the material and enhance the sensing performances of the sensor. Among the different sensors, dispersed distribution has more surface area to react with ammonia gas. Experimentally, the dispersed porous NiO nanosheets ammonia gas sensor exhibits higher sensing response ratio of 87.17% to 15 ppm NH3 gas under 150 °C. Fast response time and high response ratio to low concentration ammonia gas are shown in the dispersed sensor. Based on the advantages of its simple structure and relatively easy fabrication, the material is beneficial to accurate ammonia sensing applications.© 2021We present the band structure of CeIr3 superconductor calculated within the dynamical mean field theory (DMFT). Standard GGA and GGA+U methods fail to reproduce the experimental electronic specific heat coefficient γexpt. due to the underestimated density of states at the Fermi level N(EF) followed by an overestimated strength of electron–phonon coupling (EPC) calculated as a renormalization of γexpt.. The DMFT study shows a strong hybridization of 4f states of Ce with 5d-states of Ir, which leads to the larger N(EF) giving the correct γexpt. with a moderate EPC in agreement with the experimental data.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Processing magnetocaloric materials into magnetic refrigerant particles is an essential issue in developing high-performance magnetic refrigerators. Here, we succeed in stably producing magnetocaloric particles of the promising material HoAl2 by a newly devised method based on electrode induction melting gas atomization process. The particle size range is on the order of submillimeters, which is suitable for practical refrigeration systems. The resulting particles with less contamination have good morphological, magnetic, and magnetocaloric properties: (i) almost spherical shapes with few internal pores, (ii) a sharp ferromagnetic transition around 30 K, and (iii) a large magnetocaloric effect comparable to the bulk counterpart. These features suggest the HoAl2 gas-atomized particles have the potential of use as a magnetic refrigerant. The presented method can be applied not only to HoAl2 but also to other brittle magnetocaloric materials with high melting points, facilitating the production of various magnetic refrigerants needed to develop magnetic refrigerators for hydrogen liquefaction.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The ferromagnetic resonance frequency (fr) determines the maximum operating frequency of magnetic devices, nevertheless, it is very difficult to increase the fr(H=0) above 10 GHz by simply increasing the magnetic anisotropy field HK. In this study, a series of FeCoB/Ru/FeCoB sandwich trilayers with strong antiferromagnetic coupling were prepared by a compositional gradient sputtering method. As a result, the fr(0) increases from 13.69 to 22.68 GHz with the increase of B content, which can be attributed to the strong interlayer exchange coupling. In addition, a dramatic frequency shift over 16 GHz along easy-axis direction can be achieved simply via transition of magnetic configuration using a small magnetic field of the order of 100 Oe. This study provides an effective fabrication method to prepare self-biased soft magnetic films with ultrahigh resonance frequency for today's microwave integrated circuits.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This paper is about a self-biased coplanar circulator. The design approach is based on the use of magnetic composite substrates self-polarized made from ferrimagnetic nanowires. It consists of integrating and orienting cobalt ferrite (CoFe2O4) nanocrystallites in porous alumina membrane using the magneto-electrodeposition technique. XRD, SEM and EDX analysis confirmed the formation of the spinel phase of cobalt ferrite with a good distribution of Co, Fe and O elements in the unit cell of CoFe2O4 nanowires. The performed SQUID-VSM measurements have revealed that the nano-composite electrodeposited and cooled under a magnetic field of 0.6 T has the best magnetic properties, i.e. a large anisotropy field (Ha), moderate coercive field (Hc), and partial squareness ratio (Mr/Ms). This nano-composite has been selected as an interesting candidate for the fabrication of a miniaturized self-biased circulator. The study has started with the implementation of an analytical dimensioning process based on Bosma's theory. Based on interesting HFSS simulation results, a first prototype was fabricated in the clean room and characterized at high frequencies. The measurements of the S parameters have highlighted a circulation phenomenon of 3 dB.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, CIP@SiO2, CIP@SiO2@ZrO2 and CIP@void@ZrO2 microspheres were fabricated as model samples of the core-single-shell, core-double-shell and yolk-shell absorbents to systematically compare the role of different coating structures for microwave absorption properties and offer a comprehensive reference to the rational structural design for microwave absorbents. Microstructures, magnetic properties, electromagnetic parameters and microwave absorption of different absorbents were studied. The electromagnetic absorption performance of the as-prepared multicomponent hierarchical microspheres was superior to the sole CIP, owing to the combination of strong magnetic loss of CIP core and excellent dielectric loss of SiO2 and ZrO2 shell. For core-double-shell CIP@SiO2@ZrO2 microspheres, the minimum RL was −20.69 dB at 17.44 GHz with a thickness of 1.7 mm and the effective absorption bandwidth can reach 6.48 GHz at the coating thickness of 2 mm. It is noted that the initial oxidation temperature of CIP increased by ∼200 ℃ owing to the presence of dense SiO2 intermediate layer. Inspiringly, the minimum RL of yolk-shell CIP@void@ZrO2 microspheres was up to −28.38 dB at the absorber thickness of 2.2 mm and the effective absorption bandwidth reach 7.44 GHz from 10.24 to 17.68 GHz at 2.1 mm thickness. The yolk-shell structure had better absorbing performance than the core-shell structure because the cavity as the intermediate layer improved impedance matching. We believed that this work would provide a valuable reference for structural design and optimization of the high-performance absorbing materials.© 2021 Elsevier LtdWe fabricated an n-ZnO/p-Si/n-Si heterojunction bipolar phototransistor by the low cost RF magnetron sputtering method and characterized its photoresponse to both the 780 nm visible light and the X-ray in this paper. The device structure and the film transmittance were characterized by the SEM, XRD and transmittance spectra. The phototransistor shows high sensitivity, linearity and repeatable response to both the 780 nm visible light and the X-ray illumination indicating the promising potential of the n-ZnO/p-Si/n-Si detector. The sensitivity of the phototransistor to the X-ray is about 280 μC·Gy−1·cm−2 under the bias voltage of 10 V with the X-ray tube voltage of 30 kV. The phototransistor also shows a fast response with a decay time of about 7.75 μs, which corresponds to the lifetime of the sputtered p-Si film. The temperature dependent dark current of the device indicated the activation energy of 0.32 eV, which is probably caused by the deep-level defect in the high resistivity silicon substrate. The photo current of the phototransistor to the 780 nm visible light linearly increases with increasing the bias voltage in the saturation region indicating an Early voltage of about 5.6 V, from which the effective impurity density of the p-Si film was deduced to be ∼1 × 1016 cm−3 revealing the low activation rate of the sputtering method, and the unactivated dopant could act as recombination centers and responsible for the short carrier lifetime of the p-Si film and the fast response of the phototransistor. This paper demonstrated that the n-ZnO/p-Si/n-Si heterojunction bipolar transistor has potential for the development of an X-ray detector.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Novel Fe-La-B-based glass forming alloys with better magnetocaloric response near the ambient temperature were achieved in this work. We firstly prepared the Fe88La7B5 glassy alloy with a Curie temperature (Tc) of about 329 K. However, the formability of the ternary metallic glass is very poor and the magnetic measurement on the Fe88La7B5 glassy ribbon indicates that the ribbon may be not fully amorphous. By adding 2% (at. %) Ce, we successfully fabricated Fe86La7B5Ce2 amorphous ribbon with enhanced glass formability, decreased Tc (∼313 K) and better magnetocaloric effect. The magnetocaloric behaviors of the quaternary glassy ribbon were studied and the (ΔTad) was obtained. The high values of magnetic entropy change and adiabatic temperature rise near 313 K indicate that the Fe86La7B5Ce2 metallic glass can be used as an optimal magnetic refrigerant component working at the hot end of a domestic refrigerator.© 2021The magnetic anisotropy of an isolated substitutional Co impurity in a single ZnO nanowire is studied by performing density-functional supercell calculations with the Hubbard U correction. The variation of the magnetic anisotropy energy with the location of the Co atom in different regions of the nanowire is explored. Contrary to usual expectation, it is found that single Co-doped ZnO nanowire possess an easy plane (as opposed to easy axis) of magnetization, which is neither parallel nor perpendicular to the nanowire axis; the orientation of the easy plane is determined by the local geometry around the dopant. Our results also show that the magnetic anisotropy energy is enhanced by almost an order of magnitude when the Co impurity moves to a surface site from an interior site. This enhancement is elucidated on the basis of local bonding characteristics, because a pronounced variation of the orbital moment of Co with the magnetization direction is observed only when Co is located at the nanowire surface. The complementary analysis of these findings shows that the magnetic anisotropy of a single dopant in a single nonmagnetic semiconductor nanowire can be directionally manipulated and substantially enhanced by controlling the local chemical environment of the dopant in the absence of magnetic coupling. Our findings thus imply that the directional control of magnetic anisotropy needs to be achieved for applications of magnetic ion doped semiconductor nanowires.© 2021 Elsevier LtdThis article presents a generalization of a transregional polylogarithmic model, previously proposed for continuously describing the transfer characteristics of polycrystalline and amorphous Thin Film Transistors (TFTs) at all levels of inversion. The present generalization entails including the necessary drain voltage dependencies to be able to describe also the output characteristics. The model is tested by using it in the design and analysis of a CMOS inverter amplifier consisting of poly-Si n- and p-channel TFTs fabricated at low temperature and pressure. The transistors are biased below threshold so that the CMOS amplifier circuit operates in weak conduction, having in mind energy saving considerations. The validity of the proposed model has been ascertained by comparing model simulations to actual measured data from individual poly-Si TFTs and from the CMOS amplifier circuit. The simulations of the CMOS inverter amplifier are compared to the results obtained using look-up table-type simulations.© 2021 Elsevier LtdTo offer the electrostatic discharge (ESD) protection in high-frequency integrated circuits, a new RC-diode ESD protection design is presented in this work. The protection circuit combines the ESD diodes with the embedded silicon-controlled rectifier (SCR) and the inserting resistors to provide the appropriate performances including ESD-current-handling ability, signal loss, and layout area. Based on the experimental results in CMOS chip, the new design is a proper solution for ESD protection in high-frequency applications.© 2021 Elsevier LtdA random binary code-based unique chip identity is essential for the security of Internet-of-Things devices. Physically Unclonable Function (PUF) exploits intrinsic physical randomness in devices to generate an unbiased random binary code. Earlier, a PUF was demonstrated using a large area (10 µm × 10 µm) HfO2-based OTPM (One-Time Programmable Memory) where perfectly unbiased random bit generation was shown using differential breakdown operation. However, the use of conventional materials (e.g. PECVD SiO2) and scalability across mature nodes (10 μm–0.18 μm) are attractive for the IoT application of PUF. In this paper, we present a highly scalable PECVD SiO2 breakdown based differential OTPM PUF implemented in a 180 nm CMOS foundry. The experimental results on approximately 1700 tested differential OTPM PUF show that the random string generated is unique. i.e. mean Inter-Hamming distance of 50%. The generated string has excellent reproducibility i.e. ideal Intra-Hamming distance of 0% and no bit flip, even at 250 °C for 6 h. Excellent scalability (from area 26 µm × 26 µm to 0.26 µm × 0.26 µm) is observed. The PUF passes a variety of NIST tests successfully.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In the paper “Abhimanyu Kumar and Souvik Ganguli ‘A new Hall-effect enabled voltage amplifier device based on magnetic and thermal properties of materials.’ Journal of Magnetism and Magnetic Materials 514 (2020): 167054.“ it is claimed that the output voltage Vout of a Hall plate can be larger than its input voltage Vin. This clearly contradicts the well-known “no-voltage amplification property” of Hall plates. Within this comment we proof the no-voltage amplification theorem by simple methods. Hence, the main statement of Kumar et al. is proven to be incorrect. In addition, we give a simple proof that the solution of the governed equation has a unique solution with regards to the current flow. To illustrate the current flow and the obtained output voltage numerical examples using the finite element method are given.© 2021(In1-xFex)2O3 monophasic nanoparticles were prepared by a freeze-drying process followed by heat treatment after which they were characterized by magnetization measurements and Mössbauer spectroscopy at temperatures ranging from 300 to 4.2 K. The iron cations were trivalent and substituted for the indium cations in both cationic sites, 24d and 8b, of the oxide matrix, showing an occupancy preference that depends on x. Two different magnetic regimes were observed after varying the temperature of the doped samples, and both correlated with the iron magnetic moments. At room temperature, the moments at the site 24d were partially ordered with ferromagnetic alignment, whereas those at the site 8b showed paramagnetic behavior. After decreasing the temperature, both sublattices become progressively ordered and more robustly below 50 K.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In magnetic materials, the exchange coupling and dipolar interaction can significantly influence the magnetization processes, which was addressed in this paper by studying the system of FePt/FePd film deposited on FINEMET ribbon. In FINEMET/FePt/FePd composite ribbons, Giant magnetoimpedance effect (GMI) increased due to the contribution of the exchange coupling and dipolar interaction to the bias field (Hb) and resulted in an asymmetric characteristic of the GMI curves. Magneto-optical Kerr effect (MOKE) microscopy revealed typical transverse and longitudinal magnetic domain structure in FINEMET ribbon and FePd film respectively. Consequently, the FePd coating layer generated a Hb to the FINEMET ribbon and induced the asymmetry of GMI curves. The results also revealed that the generation of the Hb is mainly due to the exchange coupling and dipolar interaction between FePt, FePd coating layer and FINEMET ribbon. These two interactions can be clearly distinguished by exchange coupling and dipolar interaction models, which provides a valuable tool to study of the impact of the Hb on magnetic materials and could also extend the promise applications of AGMI in MI-based sensor devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The soft magnetic metal films own potential applications for high frequency magnetic devices. The operating frequency and reliability of the devices depend on the saturation magnetization and resonance frequency of metal films. Increasing the application frequency of the magnetic thin film is extremely challenging. Herein, we deposited a series of NiFe films using electron beam evaporation with various inclination angles, and investigated the surface morphology and magnetic properties, respectively. This paper presents the relationship between surface morphology and inclination angle.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Anisotropic magnetoelectric (ME) effects are investigated in a planar multiferroic heterostructure consisting of a piezoelectric lead zirconate-titanate substrate and a grating of ferromagnetic Ni-strips electrodeposited on its surface. The heterostructure is placed in a tangential dc magnetic field H and excited by an alternating magnetic field h at the frequency of bending acoustic resonance. It is shown that the magnitudes of both the linear and nonlinear ME effects depend on the orientation of the h and H fields with respect to the axis of Ni-strips and the distance between the strips. Strong anisotropy of ME effects arises due to demagnetization in a single Ni-strip and dipole-dipole interaction between the adjacent strips. The calculation technique is proposed that qualitatively well describes the anisotropy of linear and nonlinear ME effects in the heterostructure. The anisotropic ME effect can be used to create magnetic field sensors sensitive to the field orientation.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We present an investigation to improve the polynomial part of an analytical approximation of inverse Brillouin functions, recently proposed in the literature. For the analytical approximation, we employ a sextic polynomial model. To determine the best fit coefficients of the model, we apply a simple statistical analysis. We obtained the same accuracy as the only case presented in the literature, but with three orders of magnitude fewer points involved in the statistical analysis, which translates into a faster convergence of the coefficients. We extend the investigation to the most interesting cases for physical applications. The method can be applied to any other desired inverse Brillouin functions or polynomial approximations of special functions.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.For the development of rare-earth free permanent magnets with better performance to cost ratio, V and B dopings were employed to enhance the hard magnetic properties of Zr-Co-V-B alloys. The effect of V and B microalloying additions on the magnetic properties, phase stability and microstructure of the metastable Co5Zr phase have been investigated with experimental measurements together with first principles based on the DFT (Density Functional Theory) calculations. This study also investigates the effects of annealing at different temperatures on the intrinsic and extrinsic magnetic properties of Co82Zr12V6-xBx melt-spun ribbons. Rapidly solidified Co82Zr12V6-xBx (x = 1, 2, 3) alloy ribbons were produced by melt-spinning. For as-spun Co82Zr12V6-xBx (x = 1, 2, 3) ribbons, the coercivity Hc decreases from 2.34 kOe to 0.008 kOe with an increasing × value from 1 to 3. The amorphous alloy ribbons were annealed in a vacuum furnace at a series of temperatures of 600 °C, 650 °C, 700 °C and 750 °C each for 30 min. The XRD analysis showed the presence of two soft magnetic phases (fcc-Co and Co23Zr6), accompanied with a hard phase Co5Zr in ribbons thus leading to the desired hard/soft structure and the amount of both (hard and soft) phases increased with the annealing temperature. Coercivity was found to increase upon annealing treatment. The phase stabilities of the Co82Zr12V6-xBx ribbons were calculated from the total energy by the DFT calculations in this work. The calculated magnetic anisotropy energies have been compared to that of experimental coercivity values. Annealed sample Co82Zr12V5B1 showed the maximum coercivity value of 3.58 kOe due to the formation of a high volume fraction of hard magnetic phase (Co5Zr) and evenly distributed finer grains throughout the matrix. However, annealing under the same conditions resulted in lower coercivity of about 0.088 kOe and 1.61 kOe for Co82Zr12V3B3 and Co82Zr12V4B2 samples, respectively. Although sample Co82Zr12V4B2 exhibited higher remanence (42.80 emu/g) and maximum magnetization value with the applied field of 17 kOe (i.e. M17 = 77.70 emu/g) compared to Co82Zr12V3B3 sample.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The structural and magnetic properties in the Ba0.9La0.1Fe12-xAlxO19 hexaferrite compound were studied as a function of Al3+ concentration (x = 0.0 to 1.3). The samples were obtained by solid-state reaction synthesis and sintered by the conventional ceramic method. The Rietveld refinement method analysis showed the predominance of barium hexaferrite phase with hexagonal structure characterized by P63/mmc space group. The secondary phase of hematite (α-Fe2O3), with rhombohedral system and R-3c space group, was found. For the principal phase, the lattice parameters a, c, and the cell volume (V) reached a minimum value in the concentration x = 0.7 of Al3+ ion. Variations in the average bond length and distortion index of the oxygen polyhedra were observed at the Ba(2d) site and at the Fe (2b, 4fIV, 4fVI, and 12 k) sites. The Raman spectra showed all bands related to Fe[sbnd]O bonds at different crystallographic sites. The saturation magnetization reached the minimum value for the composition x = 0.7. The coercive field increased until reaching the maximum value at x = 1.0 of Al3+ concentration. The magneto-crystalline anisotropy field decreased from x = 0.1 to 0.7 and increased at higher concentrations. At room temperatures the total magnetic moment decreases from μ = 10.74 to 4.33 μB for Al3+ concentration range of 0.1 ≤ x ≤ 0.7 and oscillates with μ = 8.18 and 9.44 μB at compositions of x = 1.0 and 1.3, respectively. The present study is important to understand the impact of Al and La addition on the structural and magnetic properties of barium hexaferrite.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The critical behavior of NaZn13-type LaFe11.7-xCoxSi1.3C0.15 (x = 0.7, 0.8, and 0.9) alloys is investigated in this study. For LaFe11.7-xCoxSi1.3C0.15 (x = 0.7, 0.8, and 0.9) alloys, the values of the maximum magnetic entropy change, Δ|SM|max, are proportional to the magnetic field, H2/3. The reliable critical exponents, β, γ and δ are calculated. The value of γ for LaFe11.7-xCoxSi1.3C0.15 obtained by using the modified Arrott plot method is 1.013, 1.023, and 0.980 for x = 0.7, 0.8, and 0.9, respectively. With an increase in the Co content, the LaFe11.7-xCoxSi1.3C0.15 (x = 0.7, 0.8, 0.9) alloys become far away from the first-order phase transition and the magnetic interaction changes from short-range to long-range below the Curie temperature.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Present work proposes new insights in the field of multiferroics and its properties. The substitution of SmFeO3 in PbTiO3 (Pb1-xSmxTi1-xFexO3, x = 0.21, 0.22, 0.23, 0.24 and 0.25) over a range of composition has been synthesized and explored for multiferroicity. The properties such as ferroelectric, magnetic as well as coupling between these two have been investigated at room temperature. An in-depth study is carried out to detect the magneto-electric coupling in all the samples through magneto-dielectric, magnetization after electric poling and magneto-pe. The magneto- pe measurement gives the indication of multiferroic nature of all the samples. The maximum value of coupling coefficient (γ) and magneto-dielectric response (MDR) of about 10.3 g2/emu2 and 13.09 at 1.5 T respectively for sample × = 0.24 has been achieved by magneto-dielectric properties. Moreover, a comparative higher shift (∼0.061 emu/g) in magnetization has been observed after electric poling.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The MnGa/Co2MnSi is a common electrode in Magnetic Tunnel Junctions (MTJ). We study the MnGa/Co2MnSi interfaces using spin-polarized Density Functional Theory. We have focused on the interface stability and the effect of the interface arrangements -at the atomic scale- on its electronic and magnetic properties. Depending on how the atomic species interact at the interface, the MnGa/Co2MnSi electrode can show either antiferromagnetic or ferromagnetic behavior, modulating the spin transfer through the system. Antiferromagnetic ordering appears due to Mn-Mn interlayer interactions across the MnSi-Mn interface and is thermodynamically stable for Co-poor and Mn-rich growth conditions. Mn atoms have magnetic moments of −2.97 μB and 2.31 μB. On the other hand, a ferromagnetic behavior could be engineered under Co-rich and Mn-poor conditions, as demonstrated by the interface formation energy analysis. Such magnetic ordering emerges at the Co-Ga interface since direct Mn-Mn interlayer interactions disappear; Mn atoms have magnetic moments of ∼ 3.00 μB and ∼ 2.8 μB for the Co2MnSi and MnGa films, respectively. Our findings lay the foundations to guide experimental efforts in designing electrodes that could potentially generate efficient tunneling behavior in perpendicular Magnetic Tunnel Junctions, which are the heart of novel MRAMs.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Each unit cell on the Lieb lattice contains three atoms, and its energy spectrum has a three-band structure, with a flat band touching two dispersive bands at a single point. A Dzyaloshiskii-Moriya term does not affect the flat band. Still, it opens the gap between the flat and upper and lower dispersive bands generating a nontrivial intrinsic Berry phase that leads to topological features of spin transport. A nonzero Berry curvature leads to a spin current perpendicular to an applied magnetic field or temperature gradient. The lattice is of great interest because several materials have their atoms arranged on the Lieb lattice. We calculate the transverse spin Hall conductivity, the spin Nernst coefficient, the dynamical longitudinal spin conductivity, and the Drude weight.© 2021 The Author(s)Magnetostrictive energy harvesting has drawn attention in recent years for its high energy conversion efficiency and environmental durability. Magnetostrictive harvesters are mainly composed of giant magnetostrictive material, a magnetic circuit, and an electric circuit, which involves complex mechanical-electromagnetic coupled problems. Therefore, in many studies, the analysis of such device was implemented by finite element method. However, numerical calculation generally requires a great deal of time and does not provide adequate physical understanding of the effect of the design parameters on the harvester characteristics. In many previous studies, magnetostrictive harvesters have been operated under a small-signal vibration imposed over a constant prestress and magnetic bias. In such operating conditions, linearized small-signal models can be used to derive important analytical expressions for the harvester characteristics and their dependency on the design parameters. This paper presents the linearized modeling of a magnetostrictive energy harvester using linearized constitutive equations. The energy loss due to eddy currents is also considered for high-frequency application. The influence of parameter variation on the output power is investigated from the algebraically obtained output power, and the existence of an optimal value in resistance and capacitance of the electric circuit is discussed. These optimal design parameters are also presented in form of an algebraic solution. The obtained output power is finally proven to fit with experimental results when an appropriate permeability and magnetostrictive constant are given.© 2021 The AuthorsWe demonstrate a new structural optimization of cobalt–(barium fluoride) lateral nanogranular films, achieving independently variable direct current (DC) and alternating current (AC) tunneling effects, in the film plane and out of the plane, respectively. Lateral nanogranular films were successfully fabricated via programmable tandem sputtering. Flat-shaped magnetic Co nanogranules were periodically inserted between dielectric barium fluoride layers of different thicknesses. All the lateral nanogranular films were insulating, with electrical resistivities ρ exceeding 1013 μΩ·cm, even with a Co content as high as 30 at.%. A lateral tunneling magnetoresistance (TMR) effect and vertical tunneling magnetodielectric (TMD) effect were found in the same lateral nanogranular film with 30 at.% Co. For a nanogranular film with lateral Co nanoparticles, the sensitivity of both the TMR and TMD ratio were improved at small magnetic fields compared with conventional films with spherical Co nanoparticles, reflecting its small saturation magnetic field. This layer-ordered metal–insulator nanogranular structure has potential applications in AC/DC hybrid elements as a high-sensitivity magnetic sensor.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A nanostructured magnetic composite based on hexagonal ferrite BaFe12O19 (magnetically hard) and cubic ferrite NiFe2O4 (magnetically soft) is synthesized. The hexagonal ferrite precursor is obtained by the Sol-Gel method using citric acid as a coordinating agent. The precursor obtained is heated at different temperatures to get nanoparticles with different sizes. Cubic ferrite is obtained by chemical co-precipitation, method and the nanoparticle growth process is controlled with different heat treatments. The hexagonal and cubic ferrite nanoparticles are mixed providing low energy. Three samples of this kind of composite are obtained with a different ratio of particle size. The composites are a mixture where there are clusters of the minority phase NiFe2O4 distributed in a matrix of the main phase BaFe12O19. Both ferrite phases are composed of nanoparticles with an average size less than 50 nm without tensions in the crystal lattice. These structural parameters were compared between the composites and their precursor ferrites. The relationship between the composite microstructures and their magnetic properties is analyzed. A weak exchange coupling was detected between the component magnetic phases of the composites. Depending on the synthesis conditions, some samples exhibit monodomain or a multidomain regime. The higher BH product appears for composites from ferrites with a nanoparticle size ratio approximately equal to one. The structural characterization is carried out by X-ray diffraction. The homogeneity of the composition in the volume of the nanostructured composites is analyzed with a field emission scanning electron microscope equipped with energy dispersive spectroscopy for the analysis of the element mapping. The magnetic study is carried out through measurements of magnetization as a function of the applied field (M vs. H) at 300 K.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A remarkable feature of some high anisotropy intermetallic compounds based on R-T systems, where R stands for a rare earth atom and T is a 3d transition metal element, is a prominent difference of saturation magnetization along easy and hard magnetization axes: MEA and MHA. This anisotropy of saturation magnetization needs to be considered when magnetization curves are evaluated to derive the magnetic anisotropy constants. We investigated the angular dependence of saturation magnetization to verify experimentally the assumption of Ms(θ)=MEAcos2θ+MHAsin2θ using a single crystal of Y2Co7, which has an uniaxial magnetic anisotropy and saturation magnetization difference of 7.9% at 300 K. Our proposed verification approach is universal and would be relevant for any intermetallic compound with a prominent anisotropy of saturation magnetization.© 2021 Elsevier LtdFabrication, electrical characterizations and numerical simulations are performed on radio-frequency sputtered amorphous SiZnSnO thin film transistors (TFTs). Experimental transfer curves are compared with numerically simulated results to extract the nature of sub-band gap density of states (DOS) of the amorphous channel materials. Defect states arising due to disorder induced localization of electronic wave functions is considered in the numerical simulation process. The extracted DOS for conduction band tail is found to be roughly two order of magnitude lower than that of the a-Si:H. Moreover, disorder asymmetry is also observed between conduction and valence band tail states. In addition to band tails, Gaussian shallow donor-like states and deep level acceptor-like traps are also taken into consideration. The influence of these defect states on the electrical performance of SiZnSnO TFTs has been investigated in detail. Such studies are useful for fundamental understanding of device physics and further improvement of amorphous SiZnSnO based TFT performance and stability.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This article deals with the modelling of iron losses due to the magnetic ageing of electrical steels used in energy conversion devices. This phenomenon is the consequence of irreversible mechanisms in the material which can be triggered by the operating temperature of electrical devices. At first, an experimental study is carried out at 180° C in order to assess the effect of isothermal ageing on electromagnetic properties of a magnetic steel sample. The results show that, during the thermal ageing, the hysteresis losses and the coercive field increase. These experimental observations, mainly caused by the formation of precipitates at the material microstructural scale, are then discussed. Considering the link between the effect of magnetic ageing on macroscopic magnetic properties (effect) and the microscopic precipitation (cause), the Johnson – Mehl – Avrami – Kolmogorov (JMAK) law describing the kinetics of precipitation was applied to model the time evolution of magnetic ageing. Once this approach was validated, it is proposed to integrate the JMAK law in the Steinmetz iron loss model.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work we measure the bilinear and biquadratic interlayer exchange coupling, J1 and J2, for several different synthetic antiferromagnetic structures containing FeCoB both before and after annealing at 350°C, with Ru spacer layers ranging in thicknesses from 0.4 to 1 nm. We show that when FeCoB is on top of the Ru spacer layer, in a Co/Ru/FeCoB trilayer structure, it is able to maintain antiferromagnetic coupling after annealing at 350°C, for Ru spacer layer thicknesses of 1 nm or less. This is in contrast to coupling in FeCoB/Ru/FeCoB trilayer structures that becomes strongly ferromagnetically coupled after annealing above 300°C. This difference is thought to be caused by boron diffusion into the spacer layer, which in turn enhances the diffusion of magnetic atoms into the spacer layer. We also show that coupling in a FeCoB/Co/Ru/FeCo/FeCoB structure remains AFC after annealing at 350°C, for Ru spacer layer thicknesses of 0.8 nm or less. This is thought to be caused by the Co and FeCo layers acting as diffusion barriers and reducing the diffusion of boron into the Ru spacer layer during the annealing process. We also show that, in a Co/Ru/Co trilayer structure, J1 can be increased in magnitude by replacing the top Co layer with FeCo, for spacer layer thicknesses of 0.5 nm or less. After these samples have been annealed at 350°C, the replacement of the top Co layer with FeCo was found to result in a two fold increase in the magnitude of J1, for Ru spacer layer thicknesses of 0.5 nm or less.© 2021 Elsevier LtdWe perform the characterization and modeling of a floating-gate device realized with a commercial 350-nm CMOS technology at cryogenic temperature. The programmability of the device offers a solution in the realization of a precise and flexible cryogenic system for qubits control in large-scale quantum computers. The device stores onto a floating-gate node a non-volatile charge, which can be bidirectionally modified by Fowler-Nordheim tunneling and impact-ionized hot-electron injection. These two injection mechanisms are characterized and modelled in compact equations both at 300 K and 15 K. At cryogenic temperature, we show a fine-tuning of the stored charge compatible with the operation of a precise analog memory. Moreover, we developed accurate simulation models of the proposed floating-gate device that set the stage for designing a programmable analog circuit with better performances and accuracy at a few Kelvin. This work offers a solution in the design of configurable analog electronics to be employed for accurately read out the qubit state at deep-cryogenic temperature.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetorheological plastomers (MRPs) are smart fluids whose rheological properties make them suitable for suspension systems, structural engineering, electrical transmission lines, medical applications, and agricultural engineering. In this paper, an integrated model of computational fluid mechanics (CFD) and finite element analysis (FEA) is used to investigate the dynamic characteristics and the controllable damping force of shear-mode MRP dampers. An MRP with 60% weight ratio of soft-magnetic carbonyl iron powder (CIP) to the prepared plastic polyurethane matrix (MRP60) is used in the analysis. First. the magnetic field-dependent shear stress of MRP60 is calculated based on the relationship between the shear stress and the magnetic strength. Next, the shear stress and the strain rate are used in the CFD analysis to determine the flow and pressure fields as well as the variation of the damping force with the piston displacement, the piston velocity and the time for different sinusoidal motion frequencies and input currents. The results indicate that MRP dampers have the capacity to be used in semi-active applications.© 2021An analytical physics-based model for 2DEG density estimation in the GaN HEMT transistor is presented. The suggested model can predict the sheet electron concentration within the transistor channel over the whole voltage operation range. Compared to the existing models, the new model is closed-form analytical that has no discontinuity, which is highly important for the current model convergence. The model satisfies the charge conservation law and present smooth translation from quantization and Fermi statistics to the classical Boltzmann statistics in the flatten band condition. The model is in excellent agreement with the numerical data, 2D TCAD simulation at flatten band conditions and compatible with the SPICE program. The results' analysis confirms the model stability at different temperatures.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.FeNi films with the stripe domain (SD) pattern are prepared by electrodeposition and sputtering methods. The magnetic domain, static magnetic parameters, and quality factor, as well as dynamic properties of the two films, are respectively performed. The results show the magnetizations of the film were dependent on the direction of SD, and the rotation of the SD is lagging behind the magnetization reversal. The microwave properties of the SD emerge dynamic hysteresis before the saturation magnetic field. These microwave properties are selectively excited with acoustic mode, optical mode, and spin-wave mode. The frequency and intensity of different resonance modes of stripe domain are determined by the local magnetization. The magnetization variations and the rotation of SD of different modes are further illuminated by the micromagnetic simulation. The magnetic anisotropy and the resonance intensity of permeability of different modes were finally described by the modified resonance equations.© 2021 The AuthorsWe prove the existence of uniaxial magnetic anisotropy (UMA) directly related to thickness gradients in a material system comprised of planar assemblies of Co nanoclusters (diameter∼2.5 nm), grown by pulsed laser deposition (PLD) on bare glass substrates. PLD provides a widespread coating that takes place with a decreasing thickness along the radial directions of a glass plate faced perpendicular to the ablation jet, yielding a wedge-like shape of the film thickness profile. Reflection and transmission magneto-optical effects enabled us to study magnetization vector as a function of the film thickness and location, revealing in-plane magnetization with a well-defined UMA along the in-plane direction parallel to the thickness gradient only in high-gradient films. The dependence of anisotropy energy on film thickness has been analyzed within a phenomenological model, accounting for the surface and bulk contributions to the effective magnetic anisotropy energy (MAE). According to that, below a threshold thickness, the volume contribution is low and Nèel-like interface contribution to MAE is negligible, as well as the null magneto-crystalline contributions of such a disorder cluster system, leaving only potential surface terms left. MAE is thus tentatively explained with the extra cluster terraces related to high-gradient thickness. Additionally, the magnetization along the in-plane hard axis or thickness gradient direction (TGD) includes a minor out-of-plane component noticed as a Faraday rotation in transmission geometry. We speculate it may arise from geometrical frustration of moments occurred in the hard axis magnetization of the network of interconnected assemblies.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We report on some thermal phenomena related to the transport of magnons in insulating ferromagnetic systems. The influence of the magnon–phonon dissipation in the magnon thermal conductivity and in the spin Seebeck effect is investigated through the Boltzmann's theory. The spin Peltier effect is also discussed, where the intensity of the effect as a function of the magnetic layer thickness is highlighted. For both effects, our results are compared with some recent reported experimental data for the magnetic insulator yttrium iron garnet (YIG), and the bilayer YIG/Pt. A good agreement between our calculations and experimental data was observed.© 2021 Elsevier LtdWe present analytical models for calculating surface potential for both undoped (intrinsic) and doped (extrinsic) long channel symmetric double-gate MOSFETs. Starting with Poisson's equation, we derive the implicit surface potential equation(s) for the symmetric double-gate MOSFET in the accumulation and depletion/inversion regions of operation. This results in a continuous surface potential curve throughout all operating regions of the device. By introducing a defect potential to surface potential equations for the symmetric double-gate MOSFET, the models add the effects of oxide-trapped charge and interface traps (both uniform and non-uniform distributions) that can build up in the gate dielectric of the device. A drain current model is presented for both the undoped and doped cases of the SDG MOSFET. The accuracy of the surface potential analytical models and drain current models are validated by comparing to numerical results from two dimensional TCAD simulations.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Solid solutions (SS) based on Sr2MnSbO6 and SrLaMnSbO6 with mixed oxidation states of Mn have been prepared by solid state synthesis under standard conditions. The structural and magnetic properties of Sr2-xLaxMnSbO6 and Sr1.5La0.5Mn1+ySb1-yO6 have been studied using X-ray diffraction data and magnetic susceptibility χ and magnetization σ measurements at 2–400 K. The samples of the first group crystallize in the monoclinic space group P21/n, their unit cell volume increases with × due to the formation of mixed Mn3+/Mn2+ valence. The change of the Weiss constant Θ sign from positive to negative with variation of ×, as well as the divergence between FC and ZFC dependences χ(T) below 40 K and spin-glass behavior indicate that the dominant exchange interactions between Mn3+ and Mn2+ cations in Sr2-xLaxMnSbO6 are of antiferromagnetic nature. The samples of the second group (at y = 0.25 and 0.50) were characterized as non-uniform, containing apparently two phases with a mixed Mn3+/Mn4+ state. The composition of the phases was established approximately by studying their structural and magnetic characteristics. The composition and crystal structure of the main phases are similar to those of the monoclinic samples described above. The secondary phases are identified as rhombohedral (space group R3¯c) with ferromagnetic properties with TC of 304.2 K (y = 0.25) and 365 K (y = 0.50).© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The RKKY interaction is an important theoretical model for indirect exchange interaction in magnetic multilayer. The expression for RKKY range function in three dimension and lower has been derived in the 1950s. However, the expression for one dimension is still studied in recent years, due to its strong singularity. By using an adiabatic limit of retarded Green's function form that directly related to RKKY interaction in one dimension, we decompose the singularity and recover the range function. Furthermore, we show in adiabatic limit, RKKY interaction also induces one-dimensional spin pumping and distance-dependent magnetic damping.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We present a comprehensive model for a description of magnetization processes in rare-earth tetraborides (RET). The model is based on the coexistence of two subsystems, and namely, the spin subsystem described by the XXZ Heisenberg model and the electronic subsystem described by the generalized Hubbard model on the Shastry–Sutherland lattice. Moreover, both subsystems are coupled locally by the anisotropic double-exchange interaction, which besides the usual Jz term of the Ising type takes into account also the Jxy term representing the spin-flip processes. The model is solved numerically using the exact Lanczos method on the cluster of L=12 sites and the truncated Lanczos method on the cluster of L=36 sites. The special attention is paid on a description of individual and combined effects of the double-exchange interaction Jxy and the Heisenberg Jxy′ interaction on the stabilization of magnetization plateaus with fractional magnetization. We have found that the Jxy and Jxy′ interaction terms exhibit fully opposite effects on the stability of the main 1/2 and 1/3 plateau phases. While the Jxy interaction destroys the 1/2 plateau and stabilizes the 1/3 plateau, the Jxy′ interaction stabilizes the 1/2 plateau and destroys the 1/3 plateau. For Jxy>0 and Jxy′>0 only small combined effects of Jxy and Jxy′ on the stability of the 1/3 and 1/2 plateaus are found in the weak coupling limit (Jxy/Jz≤0.5 and Jxy′/Jz′≤0.5), but in the opposite limit the significant effects of these terms on the suppression of the 1/3 plateau and the stabilization of 1/2 plateau are observed.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Insight on the structural, electronic, magnetic and thermoelectric properties of Ba2MReO6 (M = In, Gd) compounds has been taken into the examination under density functional theory approach. Formation energy (ΔHf) calculation resulted in −53.60 eV (Ba2InReO6) and −58.09 eV (Ba2GdReO6) which specify that the given compounds are thermodynamically stable. Tolerance factors (τ) of about a unity (0.9) for both materials clarify their cubic stability while high values of cohesive energies have explored strong bonds between the constituent atoms. Structural optimizations support the ferromagnetic stability of both materials with the lattice constants values of 8.20 Å (Ba2InReO6) and 8.37 Å (Ba2GdReO6). The spin-based density of states calculations described the half metallicity in both the compounds, where, in spin down state, the semiconducting nature with direct band gap of 2.94 eV and 2.74 eV for Ba2InReO6 and Ba2GdReO6 respectively was evaluated from band structure calculation. Total magnetic moments equal to 2.00 μB (Ba2InReO6) and 9.00 μB (Ba2GdReO6) pose strong ferromagnetism in them. The calculated thermoelectric coefficients support the high electrical and low electronic thermal conductivities and suggest the efficient functioning of the studied compounds at wide range of temperatures (200 K-800 K). Also, high values of Seebeck coefficient (S) and figure of merit (ZT) pretenses their applications for thermoelectric conversions. The overall properties via these first principle calculations opens the possibilities of Ba2MReO6 for their future experimental perceptions with exciting applications in spintronics and green power generation.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this study, the structural stability, optoelectronic, and magnetic characteristics of lead-free halide double perovskites Cs2KXCl6: X = Co and Ni were revealed and understood utilizing a rigorous and systematic investigation employing the density functional theory adopted in WIEN2k simulation software. The given double perovskites are stable in cubic structure having Fm-3 m symmetry, this stability was confirmed by optimized structural, satisfying criteria of mechanical stability and tolerance factor. The half-metallic ferromagnetic feature of materials is caused by unpaired electrons in the crystal field splitted d-orbitals of Co and Ni. The total magnetic moments of these double perovskites were computed, and the calculated results were 4μB for Cs2KCoCl6 and 1μB for Cs2KNiCl6, with the transition metal atoms contributing the most. The fact that these double perovskites exhibit 100% spin polarization at the Fermi level suggests that they might be used in spintronics.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Fluids can change their physical properties when they are exposed to magnetic fields. Magnetorheological (MR) fluids are classified as smart materials because their viscoelastic properties can increase by the application of the magnetic field. Accordingly, they are used in different engineering applications such as flow control and vibration damping. In this study, three different types of MR fluids flow in circular pipes with diameters of 10 and 15 mm and length of 300 mm were experimentally investigated with and without applying the magnetic field. An electromagnetic device was designed and manufactured in order to create a magnetic field induction for experiments. Throughout the experiments, the range of magnetic field induction value was B = 0–0.15 T, increased to 0.01 T. Based on the results obtained by the experimental study, it can be asserted that applying the magnetic field prompted an increase in the viscosity of MR fluids, leading to decreasing flow velocity. At B = 0.15 T, which is the highest value of the magnetic field, the flow velocity values dropped by 95%. Subsequently, the artificial neural networks algorithms are used in accordance with the obtained results to develop a correlation that clarifies the effect of the magnetic field on the flow velocity. The results show that the experimental and ANN models perform very similarly, and the ANN algorithm yields better results as a tool to predict the MR fluid flow behavior.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic skyrmions are promising features of spintronic devices including race-track memory and nano-oscillators. Skyrmion shape can act as an additional degree of freedom along with other properties including topological charge, polarity and helicity etc. Skyrmion excitation associated with shape deformation is significant for microwave devices. By means of micromagnetic simulation study, we report skyrmion excitation within nanodiscs by dynamically modulated perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA). At higher resonance frequencies, skyrmion shows shape deformation into regular polygons including elliptic, trigon, tetragon, up to decagon, characterized as n = 2, 3, 4 …, 10, respectively. We build a phase diagram showing that regular polygon shape deformation occurs within a PMA amplitude window with minimum and maximum limits depending on resonance frequency and disc radius. Further analysis reveals that with increase in disc radius, modes with higher n appear, however, skyrmion is distorted into irregular shape, with no specific polygon-like pattern, even for smaller PMA. With a semi-quantitative analysis, we relate n for different modes to resonance frequency, disc size and PMA magnitude. These findings can assist in getting fundamental physics underlying skyrmion deformation and can help in designing energy-efficient microwave generator/detector and nano-oscillator where skyrmion dynamics are very important.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Iron oxide nanoparticles find many applications due to their response when subjected to externally applied magnetic fields. Equilibrium magnetization measurements (commonly known as magnetization curves) are an essential characterization tool to evaluate if particles display hysteresis, and to obtain magnetic properties such as the saturation magnetization. For superparamagnetic particles, one can obtain a magnetic size distribution by fitting the data to a theoretical model, such as the Langevin function, in what is called magnetogranulometric analysis. If one wishes to use the resulting size estimates as a predictor of particle performance in applications, magnetization data must be obtained under conditions that capture the response of the particles with minimal artifacts. In this paper, we used selected iron oxide nanoparticle batches with physical size ranging from 20 to 45 nm to demonstrate the influence of sample preparation methods on the magnetization data obtained. We show that measurements in powder form and in liquid solvents display varying degrees of particle interaction artifacts at low fields, depending strongly on particle size and on the thickness of the surface coating. In addition, measurements in ‘solid’ waxy hydrocarbon matrices are shown to be susceptible to particle rotation artifacts for large particle sizes. Hard crosslinked polymer matrices are shown to restrict particle motion completely, resulting in magnetization data that follows the Langevin function if the measurement is performed above the blocking temperature of the particles. We end with a discussion of how the presence of matrix-dependent measurement artifacts influence the magnetic diameter fits obtained using magnetogranulometry, and how measuring above and below the blocking temperature can affect fit results.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Ferromagnetic L21 phase of Ni2MnAl with high order degree is difficult to synthesize because of low L21/B2 order-disorder transformation temperature. It is found that magnetic field accelerated the transformation from the antiferromagnetic disordered B2 to ordered L21 phase. Magnetization increased by in-magnetic-field annealing at 673 K, which indicated the acceleration of the ordering to L21 phase. Magnetic field effects on the B2/L21 order-disorder transformation were discussed based on magnetic-field-induced change of transformation temperature, enhancement of degree of order at annealing temperature, and reduction of critical radius of L21 nuclei. Growth kinetics of L21 phase were evaluated by Johnson-Mehl-Avrami equation, which indicated that 15-T annealing accelerated the growth of L21 phase 5.7 times faster than zero-field annealing. Our results showed that magnetic field can contribute to shortening the annealing time for synthesis of ferromagnetic L21-Ni2MnAl alloy.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We experimentally study the fast–slow light induced by multiple-path microwave interference in the yttrium iron garnet (YIG)-microstrip cavity system. The destructive interference between two types of paths, the direct path through the traveling wave and the indirect paths through the magnon and the resonator, leads to a nearly blocking of microwave transmission when the magnon mode resonates at a particular frequency. This phenomenon is accompanied by a dramatic evolution to the phase of microwave transmission, which strongly adjusts the group velocity of light. Tuning the magnon mode crossing the particular frequency by controlling the external magnetic field, the polarity of phase evolution will be reversed, which presents as a switch between phase delay (slow-light) and phase advance (fast-light). And we experimentally achieve the broadband fast–slow light by tuning the external damping of the magnon. Furthermore, we predict the broadband fast–slow light in different physical parameters. Our results demonstrate that the destructive interference in the YIG-microstrip cavity system is a way to manipulate fast–slow light, which has a great significance in quantum information processing and storage.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We consider theoretically a wire, modeled by tight binding Hamiltonian, with strong spin–orbit interaction and induced superconducting pairing. Additionally, on-site Coulomb interactions, treated in Hubbard I approximation, generate Hubbard levels, which enter superconducting gap. We demonstrate that quantum interference between local in-gap Hubbard levels of a particular site, and in-gap Hubbard sub-bands, originated from the remaining sites of the wire, leads to the creation of charge-conjugated Fano resonances. Importantly, when the wire is in topological phase, the Majorana zero modes (MZM) are affected by this quantum interference. By introducing an auxiliary Toy Model we show that the MZM resonance is strongly diminished when two-particle tunneling dominates between interfering sub-gap states, whereas it is not altered when single-particle tunneling dominates.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Asymmetric hysteresis loops can be found in exchange-bias systems in which a ferromagnet is exchange-coupled with an antiferromagnet. In purely ferromagnetic samples, such effects can occur due to undetected minor loops or thermal effects. While the exchange bias is long established in hard-disk read/write heads and diverse spintronics applications, minor loops are sometimes used for the calculation of first order reversal curves (FORCs). Reports about their technological relevance, however, are scarce. Here we report on micromagnetic simulations of a nanoparticle with areas of varying height, consisting of tessellations of a defined area, in which the shape anisotropy in narrow higher lines opposes magnetization reversal stronger than in the larger, lower areas between, thus interacting similar to hard/soft magnetic materials although consisting of the same material and thus having identical magneto-crystalline anisotropy. After saturating this nanostructure by a strong magnetic field pulse, distinctly asymmetric, horizontally shifted hysteresis loops can be recognized, especially in the transverse magnetization component. We show the influence of the external magnetic field orientation on this asymmetry.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Fe3O4 nanomaterials have attracted lastest interests due to their excellent properties and potential applications. In this paper, the thermal excitation is investigated by Mössbauer spectra and first principle calculations. Fe3O4 nanoparticles with uniform size, regular shape and good dispersibility are prepared by the solvothermal methods, and Fe3O4@SiO2 composite magnetic particles with layers of mesostructured SiO2 structure are assembled by improved Stöber method. The particle size is 500 nm and the shell thickness of SiO2 layer is 80 nm. Fe3O4@SiO2 composite magnetic particles are then annealed at different temperature of 200 °C, 400 °C and 600 °C. The experimental measurements exhibit that the grain size grows up, and the magnetization is enhanced significantly, with increasing heat treatment temperature. However, Mössbauer spectra show that the relative absorption intensity in B-site fast decreases as increasing heat treatment temperature, from 64% at room temperature to 27% at 600 °C, indicating that large amount of Fe vacancies may form in B-site, and correspondingly, the net magnetic moment due to the difference of amount of Fe in B and A sites would be reduced, which strongly disagrees with the results of magnetization measured by vibrating sample magnetometer. In order to find the mechanism behind magnetization, the first-principle calculations are performed and reveal that the oxygen ions in the SiO2 shell may go into Fe3O4 core, which causes number of Fe2+ ions to decreases and transfer to Fe3+ ions, leading to the increase of magnetic moment. So we classify the difference between the amount of Fe3+ and Fe2+ ions in B-site as γ-Fe2O3. Based on this, Mössbauer spectra analysis presents quantitatively the concentration of various phase and their hyperfine interactions. This work provides a method to analyze the magnetic moment of Fe3O4.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We present magnetocaloric properties of the CeSi1.3Ga0.7 alloy, a representative of the CeSi2−xGax series. Crystallographic studies revealed that the alloy crystallizes in the tetragonal I41/amd α-ThSi2-type structure. Analysis of magnetic susceptibility denoted the magnetic phase transition at TC=10.5 K. Based on the Arrott plot and the analysis of the critical exponents, it was determined that the phase transition is of the second-order type. From magnetization and specific heat results, we calculated following magnetocaloric parameters for a magnetic field change of 5 T: the magnetic entropy change -ΔSM=5.7 J kg−1 K−1, the adiabatic temperature change ΔTad=3.4 K, the relative cooling power value RCP=32.8 J kg−1, and the temperature averaged entropy change TEC(3)=5.3 J kg−1 K−1 and TEC(10)=3.4 J kg−1 K−1. Comparison of the master curves obtained from ΔSM based on the magnetization and specific heat analysis indicates that both methods of obtaining the magnetocaloric parameters give very similar results for this alloy.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties of magnetically frustrated polycrystalline Mn1.5Fe1.5Al Heusler type alloy with a β-Mn structure were systematically studied using dc magnetization, ac susceptibility, magnetic relaxation and magnetic memory effect measurements to understand its magnetic ground state. The Mn1.5Fe1.5Al alloy system exhibits a sharp peak at low temperature around 34.5 K with strong antiferromagnetic correlations (θCW ∼ −639 K) and a high degree of frustration (fp ∼ 18.7) which suggest the presence of competing magnetic interactions. Despite of strong antiferromagnetic correlations, this peak has spin-glass character as confirmed by the observations of bifurcation of the zero-field-cooled and field-cooled magnetization curves below the irreversibility temperature, field dependent shift of the irreversibility temperature, unidirectional exchange bias effect on the field-cooled M-H hysteresis loop, exponential decay of the temperature variation of remanence and coercivity, frequency dependent shift of the spin glass freezing temperature (Tf) as per the dynamic scaling laws given by the critical slowing down model and Vogel-Fulcher law, magnetic relaxation and magnetic memory effect below Tf. The observation of a clear asymmetric response with respect to the temperature cycling in the magnetic relaxation measurements validates the hierarchical model of the spin-glass magnetic relaxation in Mn1.5Fe1.5Al alloy. Since the behaviour exhibited by the Mn1.5Fe1.5Al alloy has perfect similarity with the well-known atomic spin glasses like CuMn, AuFe, therefore, it may be considered as canonical spin-glass system.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this study, an as-cast strip of non-oriented 6.5 wt% Si electrical steel with an equiaxed structure was fabricated by twin-roll strip casting and then treated by hot and warm rolling with different reductions, and annealing. The results showed that the as-cast microstructure was gradually pancaked and then underwent dynamic and static recrystallization as the hot rolling reduction exceeded 52%. The subsequent warm rolling brought about shear bands in part of the deformed grains. The texture evolution in the multiple rolling routes basically conformed to the classical gain-orientation rotating paths. The {0 0 1}∼{1 1 8} 〈1 1 0〉, {2 2 3} 〈1 1 0〉 and {1 1 1} 〈1 1 0〉 texture components were intensified after warm rolling. A decreased hot rolling reduction accompanied by an increased warm rolling reduction raised the number of shear bands in the warm rolled sheets and decreased the annealing grain size. An improper combination of hot and warm rolling reductions tended to make the γ nuclei gain the superiority in number through grain-boundary or shear-band nucleation, leading to the prevalence of the γ annealing texture. By comparison, an alternative rolling regime adopting moderate hot (∼50%) and warm rolling (∼70%) reductions promoted the oriented nucleation of λ, {1 1 4} 〈4 8¯ 1〉 and many other non-γ nuclei in shear bands of the {2 2 3} 〈1 1 0〉 deformed grains which had already acquired a high volume fraction in the warm rolled sheet. Consequently, mixed λ, α* and γ annealing textures were formed, giving rise to enhanced magnetic properties. The combined oriented nucleation and oriented growth mechanism was responsible for the overall evolutions of the annealing textures.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.For prefabricated concrete structures constructed by the wet joining process, appropriate damage indicators need to be adopted to characterize fatigue damage development considering the effects of interface damage. In this study, through the cyclic load testing of 12 prefabricated concrete composite beam specimens with three different cross-section types, comparisons among the traditional damage indicators, such as deflection, stiffness, energy consumption, interface deformation and steel strain, and a new indicator – the piezomagnetic signal – are conducted. All damage indicators, including the piezomagnetic indicator, could characterize fatigue damage development. Furthermore, the piezomagnetic signal indicator could also reflect the impact of interface damage, similar to local indicators such as interface deformation and steel reinforcement strain. However, compared with local indicators, the piezomagnetic signal technique has the advantages of providing long-term monitoring provability and being a non-destructive method.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The purpose of this work is to devise algorithms to reduce the memory consumption of the vector Preisach model in view of its usage in Finite Element analysis. Four algorithms, which all implement a vector Preisach hysteresis model, are presented and critically compared theoretically and by numerical experiments taken on with two materials and three signals. Several strategies are presented to reduce both the memory occupation and the computational cost of several orders of magnitude.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Frequency and magnetic field dependences of the dynamic AC susceptibility of nanocomposites based on opal matrixes with Co and Pd particles have been experimentally investigated in the temperature range from 1.8 to 300 K at several frequencies of alternating magnetic field. Comparative analysis of the magnetic field dependences of the differential DC and dynamic AC susceptibilities has been carried out. The hysteresis loops of the nanocomposite samples were measured, as well as their structure and phase composition were studied. The magnetic field dependences of the differential DC susceptibility have been found to be close to the field dependences of the dynamic AC susceptibility measured at the frequency of 1 Hz but substantially differ from the susceptibility measured at the frequency of 10 Hz and higher. This fact indicates that long relaxation times exceeding ∼ 1 s are characteristic of the substance (Co + Pd). The frequency dependences of the dynamic AC susceptibility were used to calculate the relaxation times with the Cole-Cole formula. The sample with hexagonal Co and metallic Pd has been found to have three relaxation times of about 10-3, 10-2 and 1 s. At that, the field dependences of the differential DC susceptibility differ from the field dependences of the dynamic AC susceptibility measured at the frequencies of 10, 100 Hz and 1 kHz, which, in turn, are close to each other. This means that the eddy current losses are small in comparison with the magnetization reversal losses.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.For the development of levitation bearings and transport systems based on coated conductor (CC) tapes, it is essential to know not only information about the levitation force during vertical displacement, but also the stability of the system under lateral displacements of a superconductor relative to permanent magnets, as well as the effect of temperature on the lateral and vertical forces. In this paper, we present new experimental results of effect of temperature on levitation and lateral forces of CC tape stacks subjected to cyclic lateral displacements relative to the position of the permanent magnet (PMG). For the measurements, we used a 12 mm wide commercially available CC tape manufactured by Sunam. The tape was cut into 12 × 12 mm squares and stacked in stacks of 10, 30, and 50 elements. The measurements were carried out in both zero-field cooling mode (ZFC) and field cooling mode (FC). After the cooling procedure, cyclic lateral movements of the superconductor over the permanent magnet were performed. Measurements of the vertical and lateral components of the force of interaction between the stack of CC tapes and PMG were performed. The measurements were carried out at various superconductor temperatures in the range 33–77.4 K. The experimental results allow us to conclude that both the levitation force and lateral restoring force decrease with increasing temperature. An evident hysteresis of the vertical and horizontal components of the levitation force is noticeable. The hysteresis decreases with an increasing number of elements in the stack and increases with increasing temperature up to 77.4 K.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We consider the spin-1/2 Ising chain model in a transverse field (TF) with added transverse Dzyaloshinskii–Moriya (TDM) interaction in the thermodynamic limit and compute the entanglement and the quantum discord (QD) between the nearest neighbour pair of spins at finite temperature. The critical temperature, where the entanglement disappears, is calculated in the whole range of Hamiltonian parameters. Our exact results reveal that by properly tuning Hamiltonian parameters, observing regrowth of the QD is possible in the mentioned infinite chain system. We also came to this conclusion that the regrowth of thermal QD is related to the mid-lying excited states of the model.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanofibers can be used for data transport and storage, especially related to the emerging field of neuromorphic computing. Domain walls in bent nanofibers can nucleate, e.g., due to rotating local magnetic fields. Their propagation through bent nanofibers, however, depends on the bending direction in correlation to the rotational orientation of the magnetic field, making such nanofibers suitable for semi-deterministic logic operations. Here we report on domain wall nucleation, propagation and annihilation in bent nanowire networks with multiple data inputs and outputs. Our results show the influence of the bending radii on domain wall nucleation and propagation, leading to suggestions for possible realization of multi-level systems for logic operations.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The application of magnetic fluid (MF) in microfluidics such as micropump and microvalve has been a hot topic recent years. Furthermore, the researches and the applications of MF seal are relatively mature and systematic. However, the seal capacity, which significantly influences the performance of micropump and microvalve, has not been studied specifically and overly. This paper focuses on the theoretical and experimental study about the seal capacity of MF seal in capillary tube. Furthermore, the influence of the clearance between the heads of steel poles, the inner diameter of the capillary tube, and the length of MF plug is investigated numerically and experimentally. In the simulation work, the conventional calculation model of magnetic pressure is applied to the occasion under the presence of low magnetic field and the simulation of magnetic field in the capillary tube is also conducted. Subsequently, the experiments are conducted and compared with our theoretical simulation results. In order to improve the prediction of the theory, the influence of viscosity is considered and the optimized theoretical results are compared with conventional theoretical results, which revealed that the viscosity cannot be ignored in the study of MF seal in capillary tube.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, a quantification method for sub-surface crack evaluation based on extreme learning machine (ELM) neural network is proposed to the application of alternating current field measurement (ACFM). According to simulation results of finite element model, the dimensions of cracks can be described by four features of the Bz and Bx curves. An optimized ELM feasible for ACFM detection is trained and validated based on the selected features. Taking the advantage of our proposed sub-surface crack sizing method, the experimental results indicate that the detection and quantification for sub-surface crack is conducted readily. The maximum errors of length and depth predicted by ELM can be limited to 5.65 % and 6.27 %, respectively.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We study the two-sublattice model in the mean field theory by expanding the Gibbs free energy in terms of the magnetizations M1 (Mup) and M2 (Mdown) with the quadratic coupling M12M22 (quadrupolar interactions) for the order–disorder transition in the two mixed-valence iron (II)-iron (III) metal formate frameworks, C2H5NH3FeIIFeIIIHCOO6 and C2H52NH2FeIIFeIIIHCOO6. Expressions derived from the Gibbs free energy for the temperature dependence of the magnetizations M1 and M2, are fitted to the observed data (H=100Oe) from the literature for the two mixed-valence iron (II) – iron (III) system. The inverse susceptibilities (χ1-1 and χ2-1) are predicted as a function of temperature (H=100Oe) from the two-sublattice model. Additionally, the field dependence of the total magnetization (M=M1+M2) is analyzed using the literature data for the compounds studied. We find that the two-sublattice model with the quadrupolar interactions, is satisfactory to describe the order–disorder transition in the two mixed-valence iron (II) – iron (III) metal formate frameworks as studied here. It indicates that the two-sublattice model can also be applied to some other multiferroic mixed materials.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.X-ray diffraction studies on arc melted Ru2Fe(Si1-xGex) (0 ≤ x ≤ 1) alloys did not show the characteristic (1 1 1) and (2 0 0) super-lattice peaks of the stable L21 structure of full Heusler alloys. The alloy with x = 0 exhibited antiferromagnetic behaviour. However, with increase in x, the alloys became ferromagnetic. In order to understand the origin of the novel magnetic behavior of these alloys and its correlation with their crystal structure, ab initio study was carried out using spin-polarized relativistic Korringa-Kohn-Rostoker Green's function method. The study shows that the antiferomagnetism in the alloy with x = 0 is due to the presence of B2 disorder. Due to this, the 2nd nearest neighbour (NN) exchange interaction between the Fe atoms at proper and improper sites, respectively, becomes strongly antiferromagnetic which dominates over the 1st NN ferromagnetic exchange interaction. With increase in x, the alloys become ferromagnetic with an improvement in L21 ordering which in turn makes the 1st NN interaction strongly ferromagnetic. The electronic structure calculations show no half metallic gap in either spin direction for all the alloys. Comparison of experimental and theoretically estimated properties of Ru2Fe(Si1-xGex) alloys provides insight to the variation in the magnetic interaction with the composition and the disorder present in the alloys.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We report ab-initio calculation of the structural, magnetic, elastic, and electronic properties of the PrX (X = P, As and Bi). The structural stability and phase transition of PrX (X = P, As, Bi) compounds in (NaCl-type), (CsCl-type), (Zinc blende-type), WC-Bh (Hexagonal) and L10 (Tetragonal) structures in ferromagnetic state are investigated using the augmented plane wave plus local orbital (APW + lo) method within GGA + U, and mBJ-GGA + U approximations. Careful inspection of electronic properties indicates that most of the compounds exhibit half-metallic behavior. The total magnetic moment of all investigated compounds is obtained to be 2 µB. The mechanical stability test performed on the computed elastic constants Cij demonstrate that investigated compounds are mechanically stable. To elucidate chemical stability, chemical bonds are investigated and found to be mainly characterized by an ionic-covalent mixture. Moreover, elastic anisotropy of all compounds is calculated. Subsequently.© 2021Transforming Growth Factor-β (TGF-β) has been implicated in a variety of cellular functions, including control of cell cycle, cell proliferation, extracellular matrix formation, and even stem cell differentiation. TGF-β is also a contributor for combinatorial cellular responses, including cellular senescence, cellular apoptosis, and tumor progression. As a result, spatial and temporal control of TGF-β delivery has the potential to lead to greater control over cell signaling while minimizing the potential for undesirable off-target effects. We recently reported magnetically triggered release of active TGF-β from TGF-β Latent Complex conjugated to high-specific absorption rate (SAR) magnetic nanoparticles via magnetic hyperthermia; here we redirected our approach to spin vortex discs. Planar, gold-coated Permalloy (Ni80Fe20) microdiscs (∼2.0 µm diameter, 70 nm thick) were fabricated via standard lithography techniques and thin-film deposition. The discs were then bioconjugated with latent TGF-β via gold-thiol conjugation chemistry, and shear stress on the attached latent TGF-β was induced via magnetic actuation of the discs. This magnetic actuation was achieved via application of a spatially uniform dual pulsating magnetic field (∼1 mT) using two perpendicular pairs of Helmholtz coils at a frequency of 20 Hz for 1 h. Preliminary results of the bioconjugated discs shown here indicate a significant increase in the release of active TGF-β compared to the baseline passive release. Further studies will focus on investigating non-invasive remote activation and direction of TGF-β by a magnetic field, as well as investigating the potential of expanding this work to other growth factors that exist in latent and active forms.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We study a frustrated antiferromagnetic Heisenberg model on a triangular lattice with the Dzyaloshinskii–Moriya interaction (DMI) in the presence of an external magnetic field and focus on the effects of the single-ion anisotropy on the overall phase diagram topology and the skyrmion lattice (SkX) phase stability. Phase diagrams in the temperature-field plane for both easy-axis and easy-plane anisotropy of a varying strength are constructed in the regimes of a moderate and strong DMI by parallel tempering Monte Carlo simulations. For the considered range of parameters the phase diagrams featuring up to four ordered phases are identified. The SkX phase is found to be stabilized within some temperature and field window for sufficiently large DMI and not too strong anisotropy. We demonstrate that both types of the anisotropy can have beneficial effects on the SkX phase stabilization. Namely, in the systems with moderate DMI a small easy-plane anisotropy extends the field window of the SkX phase appearance by shifting its lower bound to smaller values and in the systems with larger DMI a small easy-axis anisotropy shifts the entire field range of the SkX phase stabilization towards smaller values. The Metropolis dynamics is employed to probe the persistence of the SkX phase upon quenching the field to zero or small finite values. It is confirmed that low temperatures, small DMI and small easy-plane anisotropy values support the skyrmions persistence, i.e., increase their lifetime.© 2021 Elsevier LtdIn this study, a bipolar resistive switching random access memory cell (ReRAM) by blending PEDOT: PSS into Graphene Oxide (GO) with 1:1 wt% is reported. To compare the switching mechanism, the memory devices based on GO and PEDOT: PSS are distinctly fabricated and characterized too. The spin coated active layers are sandwiched between ITO and Al as the bottom and top electrodes, respectively. The resistive switching mechanism in PEDOT: PSS/GO memory is based on filamentary type. The SET and RESET operation of the PEDOT: PSS/GO memory is relatively symmetric but GO and PEDOT: PSS samples have a significant asymmetric hysteresis curve. The carrier transport mechanism of the bistable behaviour for the fabricated non-volatile ReRAM is described based on space charge limited current (SCLC). In our experiments, the structure ITO/PEDOT:PSS-GO/Al demonstrated good switching behaviour with approximately 100 on/off current ratio, 3.5 V set/reset voltage and, a high retention time of 6000 s. In addition, the crystallinity and surface topography of the deposited thin film was characterized by X-ray diffraction (XRD), atomic force microscopy (AFM), and scanning electron microscopy (SEM). The simple structure and low-cost fabrication offer embedding in data storage and computing application as future electronics and printed electronics.© 2021The grain size prior to cold rolling plays an important role in the microstructural, textural evolution and magnetic properties of non-oriented silicon steel sheets. In this work, we proposed a new way to obtain large grain size before cold rolling and applied it to a 1.0 wt% Si-0.2 wt% Al non-oriented silicon steel, i.e., appropriate low-finishing-temperature hot rolling combined with batch annealing. The grain growth process during batch annealing was investigated using a quasi in-situ electron backscattered diffraction (EBSD) technique. It was demonstrated that significant grain growth took place through a strain-induced boundary migration mechanism. Then a large number of in-grain shear bands were formed in the cold rolled microstructure and could provide nucleation sites for Goss ({1 1 0} 〈0 0 1〉 ) and λ-fiber (〈0 0 1〉//ND) recrystallized grains, thus resulting in a coarse-grained and homogeneous recrystallization microstructure with weakened γ-fiber (〈1 1 1〉//ND) texture, strengthened Goss and λ-fiber texture. Consequently, superior magnetic properties (B50 = 1.763 T, P1.5/50 = 4.30 W/kg) were obtained. For comparison, the conventional processing route without batch annealing was also investigated. A small-grained and inhomogeneous recrystallization microstructure with pronounced γ-fiber texture was produced in the finally annealed sheet, which could significantly deteriorate both the magnetic induction and iron loss. This work provided a new way to enlarge the grains in hot rolled sheets by low temperature batch annealing instead of the conventional high temperature normalization. Thus a new processing route to fabricate low silicon non-oriented electrical steels with high permeability and low iron loss was established.© 2021 The AuthorsMotivated by the experimental evidence of the Nagaoka ferromagnetism in quantum dot systems by Dehollain et al. (2020), we search for possible confirmation of such kind of ferromagnetism by analyzing the spin-resolved transport properties of a quadruple quantum dot system focusing on the linear response regime. In particular, we consider four quantum dots arranged in a two-by-two square lattice, coupled to external ferromagnetic source and drain electrodes. Turning on and off the specific conditions for the Nagaoka ferromagnetism to occur by changing the value of the intra-dot Coulomb interactions, we determine the transport coefficients, including the linear conductance, tunnel magnetoresistance and current spin polarization. We show that a sign change of the current spin polarization may be an indication of a ferromagnetic order of Nagaoka type which develops in the system.© 2021 The AuthorsPrevious studies have accurately determined the effect of transition metal point defects on the properties of bcc iron. The magnetic properties of transition metal monolayers on the iron surfaces have been studied equally intensively. In this work, we investigated the magnetic properties of the 3d, 4d, and 5d transition-metal (TM) atomic monolayers in Fe/TM/Fe sandwiches using the full-potential local-orbital (FPLO) scheme of density functional theory. We prepared models of Fe/TM/Fe structures using the supercell method. We selected the total thickness of our system so that the Fe atomic layers furthest from the TM layer exhibit bulk iron-bcc properties. Along the direction perpendicular to the TM layer, we observe oscillations of spin and charge density. For Pt and W we obtained the largest values of perpendicular magnetocrystalline anisotropy and for Lu and Ir the largest values of in-plane magnetocrystalline anisotropy. All TM layers, except Co and Ni, reduce the total spin magnetic moment in the generated models, which is in good agreement with the Slater-Pauling curve. Density of states calculations showed that for Ag, Pd, Ir, and Au monolayers, a distinct van Hove singularity associated with TM/Fe interface can be observed at the Fermi level.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the chemical vapor transport method was used to grow ferromagnetic Cr5Te6 single crystal. Novel multiple magnetic phase transitions have been discovered by magnetization measurements. The critical behavior from ferromagnetism to paramagnetism transition has been investigated in detail. The magnetic entropy changes are estimated by the Maxwell relation. The critical parameters of β = 0.405, γ = 1.200, δ = 3.96 as well as the Curie point TC≈ 338 K are determined by various theoretical models. The calculated critical parameters are not only intrinsic and self-consistent, but also obey the scaling equation around TC. Further analysis using renormalization theory reveals that the spin interaction for Cr5Te6 is long-range type, and its magnetic interaction cannot be classified into an universal class, the spin exchange interaction distance decays as J(r)≈r−4.79.© 2021 The Author(s)In a public space there are several reports of materials with general stoichiometry CaCoSinO2n+2. Pyroxene CaCoSi2O6 is probably the best-known representative for n = 2 but not much is known about materials with n = 3 and n = 4. In this study, attempts were carried out to synthesize those phantom materials and it was found that they do not exist as a single phase. A quantitative XRD analysis revealed that their chemical composition is correct but the formula should be written as CaCoSi2O6 + (n-2)SiO2. Similar qualitative conclusions were drawn from investigation of magnetic (DC magnetometry) and electronic properties using X-ray Photoelectron Spectroscopy (XPS) and Si K edge X-ray Absorption Spectroscopy (XAS). Additionally, the DFT ab initio calculations were carried out to obtain electronic signature from band structure of CaCoSi2O6. The apparent influence of the excess of SiO2 on magnetic properties of this “series” can be understood in terms of presence and suppression of secondary phases like Ca2CoSi2O7, which form when the starting materials are not homogenized properly. Addition of surplus SiO2 suppresses their formation leaving clear signature from CaCoSi2O6, which also can be synthesized from stoichiometric mixture using proper techniques.© 2021In accordance with the model of matrix magnetization from the filling of granules, a “bundle” of conductor channels of magnetic flux formed along the chains of granules (spheres) and the magnetic parameters of the conditional cores of a chain of spheres with a radius of R = 15 mm (but different in radius r) were studied. The research was developed by measuring magnetic flux sensors in the form of technologically advantageous (for measurements in small volumes) circular contours of different relative radii (r/R = 0.2–0.9) on thin printed circuit boards placed between adjacent spheres in the middle chains. This study presents an array of data on the measurement of the magnetic flux Φ in the cores of a chain of spheres with a radius of R = 15 mm when magnetized in a solenoid by a 4.8 to 54.5 kA/m field. The values of the magnetic induction B in the cores (and their magnetic permeability µ) have been determined. As r/R increases (i.e., as the conditional cores thicken), despite the increase in Ф, B and μ values decrease due to a reduction of the ferromagnetic metal's volume in the core. Using the example of the induction field dependences the qualitative and quantitative similarity of the magnetic properties of the poly-ball medium-filling and the chain of spheres (r/R → 1) is shown. This example confirms the status of the chain of spheres as a physically self-sufficient model element responsible for magnetizing the granular medium matrix.© 2021We present images of spin-wave excitations in a patterned yttrium iron garnet (YIG) thin film obtained by use of near-field microwave microscopy, which can achieve spatial resolution as high as 50 nm. Visualization of magnetic excitations is an enticing prospect for high-speed, high-density magnetic logic and storage applications, which has spurred the development of new magnetic microscopy and imaging techniques in recent years. Here we present a novel approach for local imaging of magnetic modes excited at room temperature with sub-diffraction-limited spatial resolution. This approach is based on a special atomic force microscope with broadband GHz capability for imaging the spatial distribution of dynamic magnetic excitations in patterned magnetic structures. Due to the inherent sub-wavelength, nanometer-scale spatial resolution of near-field scanning probe techniques, this approach has potential for a significant improvement in spatial resolution over optical techniques.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We study the magnetic and gas sensing properties of M1-xZnxFe2O4 where M = Cu, Mg, Ni, and x = 0, 0.35, focussing on the influence of zinc on their application as a soft magnetic material and a sensor as well. Ferrites are synthesized by thermal decomposition of the glyoxylate precursor obtained from the redox reaction between metal nitrate and ethylene glycol. The phase formation and microstructure were investigated using X-ray diffraction and electron microscopic methods. X-ray diffraction analysis confirmed the cation redistribution in the spinel lattice due to zinc doping. The porous structure was studied using nitrogen adsorption-desorption isotherms and confirmed the role of zinc on the surface structure. The magnetic properties of the ferrites under the influence of zinc were measured using a vibration sample magnetometer. The oxidation state of cations and oxygen vacancies in the spinel structure has been examined using X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) which confirmed a strong interplay between the oxidation state of cations, adsorbed oxygen level, and electrical conductivity. The n-type semiconducting property has been correlated to the adsorbed oxygen abundance and its interaction with gas molecules. The study revealed enhanced soft magnetic properties of ferrite due to zinc doping. In addition, this study presents a stable and sensitive material for detecting a low concentration of carbon monoxide gas.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We report a rare magnetoelectric relaxor phenomenon in double perovskite La3Ni2TaO9. To unveil this exotic property, we have systematically examined its physical characteristics via magnetic and electric susceptibilities. DC magnetization shows magnetic anomaly at 25 K (Tg) and becomes irreversible under ZFC and FC protocol. The thermal profile of dielectric constant (ε) and loss (tanδ) exhibit anomaly in the vicinity of magnetic ordering temperatures and the peaks shift towards higher temperatures at higher frequencies. This co-occurrence indicates a strong correlation between magnetic and dielectric properties. To further corroborate, we measured dielectric constant ε(T), in presence of external magnetic fields. It is observed that upon application of magnetic field ε(T) increases and tanδ(T) shows upturn, near Tg, which confirms magneto-electric nature of La3Ni2TaO9. Additionally, it is observed that the DC magnetic susceptibility exhibits an upturn up to Tg along with broad anomaly. Inverse of AC susceptibility is fitted with modified Curie–Weiss law which shows non-linear characteristics. Dielectric and magnetic properties collectively establish that La3Ni2TaO9 belongs to the magnetoelectric relaxor family.© 2021For many magnets with a three-dimensional spin, experimental data of the magnetic ordering temperature, Tc, and of the magnon energy at the zone boundary, EZB (the near-neighbor interaction strength) are compared. It is observed that the lower the spin quantum number is, the lower is Tc in comparison with EZB/kB. This is explained by the fact that the magnetic ordering transition is the ordering transition of a boson field and occurs largely decoupled from the exchange interactions between the spins. Due to a strong interaction with the bosons, the spins order at the same temperature as the boson field. The bosons are essentially magnetic dipole radiation, emitted through stimulated emission by the precessing spins. Surprisingly, in the critical range (and below), the bosons dominate the dynamics of the spins totally, and prevent the local exchange interactions from performing a phase transition into a long-range ordered state. Condition for the ordering transition of the boson field is that the density of the bosons, travelling along those crystallographic directions along which domains will be formed below Tc, is sufficiently high, such that the threshold for the spontaneous onset of stimulated emission is reached. In the ordered state of the boson field, the bosons are in a one-dimensional and coherent state. This is realized in each magnetic domain. Since in magnets with a low spin quantum number the bosons get generated with a low rate, the critical density, necessary for the ordering transition of the boson field is reached at a correspondingly low temperature only.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic source location has wide application prospects in the fields of space exploration, non-destructive testing, security monitoring and target tracking. A constrained Euler location algorithm is applied to the location of a small current-carrying multi-turn ring coil, which is the closed analytic form of the position solution. The error of position solution for the traditional Euler location algorithm is deduced analytically. An experimental device of three-axis fluxgate magnetometer (TAFM) cross-array is constructed. The interference of ambient magnetic field is filtered from the magnetic data by the digital band-pass filter, and the magnetic field of the multi-turn coil is restructured by the least-squares fitting. The Euler and constrained Euler location algorithms are compared with the numerical simulation and the experimental data, and the results show that the constrained Euler location precision of the location algorithm is better than the Euler one. And more, experimental tests verify that the relative error of position solution is less than 10% for the two location algorithms in the given distance range.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Spin waves (SWs) have been proved to be promising candidates for driving skyrmion motion, while the small velocity limits its further applications. Herein, we demonstrated theoretically the regulation of SW-driven skyrmion dynamics on wedge nanotracks. It is found that the edge potential barrier acts as an extra driving force and increases the skyrmion velocity by nearly 60%. By analyzing Thiele equation and velocity fitting function, we determined the optimal inclined angle and gave the quantitative expression of the increased velocity with respect to material and geometric parameters. Our results are useful for understanding the dynamic behaviors of SW-driven skyrmion and may provide guidelines for designing skyrmionic racetrack memory.© 2021 The AuthorsWe develop the theory of the electron transport through quantum dot weakly coupled to ferromagnetic leads with noncollinear magnetization directions, that has been studied in recent experiments. One can observe much richer transport behavior of the canted quantum dot spin valves, as compared to single magnetic tunnel junctions, that relies on the possibility to generate a nonequilibrium accumulated spin on the quantum dot and the presence of the exchange interaction between dot and electrodes, depending on system parameters such as gate and bias voltages, the charging energy, an asymmetry of the tunnel couplings, and the external magnetic field. We demonstrate that one can extract information about spin dynamics on quantum dot from the dc current–voltage characteristic even at the linear response, and detect the exchange field similarly to the FMR (ferromagnetic resonance) experiment. This exchange field can be widely used in nano-spinelectronics, as a local field controlled by the gate or bias voltages also at high temperatures.© 2021The ultrafast magnetization dynamic processes are investigated in a wide time scale range for different laser pump fluences in Ni- and Mn-rich Heusler alloy film of Ni54.3Mn31.9Sn13.8 composition using time-resolved magneto-optical Kerr effect (TR-MOKE) in perpendicular magnetic field geometry. For all fluences used, two distinct types of magnetization dynamics of different time scales: ultrafast up to 2 picoseconds and slower from 2 ps to hundreds of ps, were observed. The description of the two-step de- and remagnetization processes was performed in the frame of modified model developed, based on the microscopic three-temperature model (M3TM). The model is based on the assumption that two magnetic sublattices of the Heusler alloy which are weakly exchange coupled due to Curie temperature proximity are responsible for the fast and slow magnetization dynamics. It is demonstrated excellent agreement of the model prediction with experimental data for all the fluences used. It is shown that the values of model parameters determined — demagnetization rates R and spin-flip probabilities asf for one sublattice are of the order reported for the Ni film. It has been found that R parameter value for the second sublattice related to Mn site is over two orders, and asf is up to one order of magnitude lower than in Ni site. It is shown that strong reduction of the spin-flip probability and electron–phonon coupling, and large magnetic moment in the Mn sublattice as compared to the Ni one is the cause of the observed demagnetization slowing down effect in the Heusler alloy studied.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Spin texture interacting with lattice defects is an important topic in condensed matter physics. This work investigates skyrmions in antiferromagnetic nanodisks and how a random distribution of magnetic impurities affects the skyrmion dynamics induced by spin-polarized alternating currents. We consider two kinds of magnetic impurities: planar ones, in which the spin on the impurity atoms has easy-plane anisotropy, and exchange-type impurities, in which the spin of the impurity atoms has local out-of-plane anisotropy. The antiferromagnetic skyrmion (AFM-skyrmion) will be either deformed or even destroyed when it moves around the inhomogeneous region, depending on the impurity strength and concentration. The AFM skyrmion can have also breathe modes while moving in aleatory trajectories. The presence of a random distribution of exchange-type impurities may also induce a transformation of the skyrmion in bimeron and bimeron in skyrmion while the texture travels into the region with defects.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Reliable detection of antiferromagnetic (AFM) structures remains an open issue in experiments, although these structures such as skyrmions are suggested to play an important role in future spintronic applications. In this work, we theoretically proposed an alternative method to localize the AFM skyrmions along the direction of driving force through tuning magnetic anisotropy barriers by linear lattice defect design. The dependence of the depinning current on the magnitude and width of the defects and temperature is numerically investigated by solving the Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert equation and also derived based on the Thiele's theory. The stable pinning of the skyrmion for certain ranges of the injected current is clearly demonstrated, which suggests an effective way in localizing the skyrmion. Based on the calculated results, we propose a method of precise track-selecting of the AFM skyrmions, which are meaningful for future two- and three- dimensional AFM spintronic device design.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work we explore how a two-stranded magnetic ladder with vanishing net magnetization can be utilized to generate polarized spin current from a completely unpolarized one. Considering three different types (A-, C- and G-type) of antiferromagnetic ladders within a tight-binding framework, we make a comparative study to find the best suitable ladder for spin filtration. Our analysis can be implemented to design efficient spintronic devices with the help of antiferromagnetic materials, circumventing the use of conventional ferromagnetic systems.© 2021 The Author(s)We investigated the influence of microstructural changes on the magnetic properties and the magnetocaloric response of the Gd7-xYxPd3 (2 ≤ x ≤ 6) alloys rapidly quenched by vacuum suction casting (rc-cast samples) and melt-spinning (melt-spun samples) techniques. Quenched-in structural disorder determines magnetic and magnetocaloric properties in both series of alloys. For the rc-cast samples two distinct magnetic transitions are visible. The peak at higher temperatures is related to the ferromagnetic/paramagnetic transition of the crystalline phase. In contrast, the peak observed at low temperatures is believed to be related to the ferro-para transition of the amorphous phase and/or a spin reorientation. The Gd7-xYxPd3 alloys in the form of rapidly cooled cast exhibit the magnetic transition temperatures at 262 K, 242 K, 202 K, 153 K and 9 K, for 2 ≤ x ≤ 6 respectively. Curie temperatures of the melt-spun Gd7-xYxPd3 alloys are much lower compared to the rc-cast samples. The melt-spun Gd5Y2Pd3 orders ferromagnetically below 90 K, while Gd4Y3Pd3, Gd3Y4Pd3, Gd2Y5Pd3 and GdY6Pd3 ribbons undergo the magnetic transformation at 65 K, 40 K, 25 K, and 9 K, respectively. Investigated ribbons exhibit almost doubled magnetic entropy change in comparison to the rc-cast samples. For instance, the -ΔSm value for melt-spun and rc-cast Gd5Y2Pd3 is equal to 6.31 Jkg-1K−1 and 3.64 Jkg-1K−1, respectively. Moreover, due to the large δTFWHM of the magnetic entropy change peak, both the melt-spun and rc-cast samples exhibit large relative cooling power (RCP), reaching 466 Jkg−1 (Δµ0H = 5 T) for the rc-cast Gd5Y2Pd3. RCP values are comparable to those of some potential magnetic refrigerants.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Implementing time-resolved spectroscopy is one of the challenging topics in solid-state physics: indeed, it can be a crucial step to unveil the early time dynamics of fundamental processes in systems such as semiconductors, metals, superconductors and topological materials. Then, it is essential to build theoretical tools in order to understand the experimental results and what actually happens in solid-state systems on a new and finer timescale: the atto-second one. Accordingly, we have developed a theoretical–numerical tool in order to study the time evolution of the electronic populations on the atto-second scale in materials perturbed by a laser pulse. After finding the ab-initio band structure of the material, we compute the maximally-localized Wannier functions and obtain the hopping terms. Then, we study the effect of the laser pulse using the Peierls substitution method and obtain the equation of motion for the electronic populations. Finally, we obtain a dynamical DOS of the system and the corresponding dynamical electronic populations. In this work, as a relevant case study, we report our results for germanium. We identify oscillations in the eigenenergies and in the populations which roughly follow either the field or its square, with some phase shifts with respect to the field.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The charge current generated by the temperature gradient applied to the double planar tunnel junctions with ferromagnetic external electrodes and central layer is investigated in the free-electron model. The situation when the bias voltage is applied to the junction is also considered. It has been shown that the analyzed current may depend on the orientation of magnetic moments in the ferromagnetic external electrodes and the central layer. The influence of the magnetic configuration on the tunnel current can be enhanced due to the resonant tunneling by the resonant states. Especially strong modifications of the current flowing through the junction can be observed as a result of changing the orientation of the magnetic moments in the central layer in junctions where the tunneling by the resonant states located below the bottom for the spin-down electrons in the source electrode is observed. The studied effects are strongly depended on the thickness of the central layer, spin splitting of the electron bands in the external electrodes and in the central layer, and the bias voltage applied to the junctions, but are also sensitive to the average temperature of the junction and the height and width of the barriers, whereas they are less sensitive to the temperature difference between the electrodes.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Measurements of magnetic properties, as well as microscopic and X-ray diffraction investigations, of eutectoid steels with the structure of spheroidized and of coarse lamellar pearlite after cold plastic deformation by tension have been carried out. The steel with the coarse lamellar pearlite was unexpectedly found to have a lower coercivity than the steel with the spheroidized pearlite. With growing elongation, the coercivity of the steels with various pearlite morphologies grows, whereas the remanence and maximal magnetic permeability decrease. At an elongation more than 0.7%, the remanence and maximum magnetic permeability become almost equal. The difference in the coercivity of eutectoid steel with various pearlite morphology raises with elongation growth. The main changes in magnetic properties occur prior to elongations of 2–4%. The magnetoelastic fields Hσ were calculated from the field dependences of the magnetic incremental permeability and the residual compressive stresses, estimated. It is found that the average residual stresses are −222 MPa for steel with the spheroidized pearlite and −349 MPa for steel with the lamellar pearlite. According to the results of X-ray diffraction analysis, the values of residual stresses are −251 MPa and –342 MPa for steels with the spheroidized and lamellar pearlite, respectively.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Morphological, structural and magnetic properties of Co nanowire/IrMn film heterostructures are studied by atomic force microscopy, non-coplanar X-ray diffraction and magnetization measurements, the latter performed with magnetic field parallel and perpendicular to the nanowire length direction and using remnant (as-grown) and field-cooling protocols. Two magnetic Co phases are established, namely as magnetically-hard hcp phase and soft fcc one (the amount of the latter increasing with the nanowires’ thickness). The magnetization hysteresis loops of these heterostructures present exchange bias, with field shift initially increasing up to a certain Co thickness, followed by a gradual decrease, an effect correlated with changes in the interface energy and shape of the nanowires. The experimental hysteresis loops are successfully reproduced using a modified polycrystalline model for exchange bias, taking into consideration dipolar interactions among the nanowires. Our results are shown that the competitions between anisotropies and dipolar interactions play important roles in the coherent magnetization reversal processes observed.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We have investigated the influence of heat treatment and Sr-doping on the structural and magnetic properties of the LaCr0.5Mn0.5O3 compound produced by the modified combustion method using urea as fuel. It was shown that the undoped sample can be produced with heat treatment at a temperature as low as 300 °C. However, the addition of 10% Sr makes it difficult to be obtained at low temperatures, and hence, the desired phase was reached with a heat treatment above 800 °C. Moreover, the Sr-doping induced a structural phase transition from orthorhombic to rhombohedral, which is attributed to an increase of the ionic radius on the perovskite A-site. The observed deviation of the Curie-Weiss (C-W) law adjusted above the magnetic ordering temperature of the LaCr0.5Mn0.5O3 sample was attributed to the presence of Griffiths-like phase (GP) with Griffiths temperature at TG = 280 K, nevertheless, this deviation was suppressed with the Sr-doping. Finally, Sr-doping induces an increase of Cr4+ and Mn4+ valence states, enabling the existence of more double-exchange interactions, which is responsible for the increase of the magnetization and magnetic ordering temperature.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The temperature dependence of magnetic susceptibility, χ(T), of the (Cr84Re16)100−xVx alloy system is reported in this contribution. Anomalies are observed at the Néel temperature (TN), associated with the onset of the antiferromagnetic (AF) spin-density-wave (SDW) state, with these anomalies becoming more pronounced as x increases. The TN values determined from χ(T) measurements are in close agreement with that obtained from the measurement of temperature dependence of electrical resistivity, ρ(T). Prominent broad deep minima are observed in χ(T) upon cooling below 100 K which are followed by low temperature peaks in x = 10.4, 10.9 and 12.4 samples. A second anomaly, not associated with TN, is observed at a temperature TO < TN for alloys with x = 0, 1.3, 2.4, 4.4, 5.7 and 6.9. This anomaly at TO has a trend that resembles that at TN suggesting that it too is associated with an AF phase. TO observed in the x = 0 alloy has value of 309 ± 2 K which is very close to 308 K, the transition temperature of AF Cr2O3. However, as the value of TO obtained from χ(T) decreases with an increase in x, it is an indication that the oxide is most likely a V-doped oxide of Cr, (Cr100−δVδ)2O3. The plots of x dependence of TN obtained from ρ(T) and χ(T) measurements were fitted with a power law of the form TN = a(xc – x)b yielding a = 135 ± 24 K, b = 0.59 ± 0.01, a critical exponent, and xc = 10.47 ± 0.03, the critical concentration at which antiferromagnetism (AFM) disappears. It is therefore evident that the low temperature peaks for samples with x = 10.9 and x = 12.4 are associated with the (Cr100−δVδ)2O3 oxide whereas that of the x = 10.4 sample corresponds to TN of the sample. Curie-Weiss (CW) behaviour was tested by plotting χ−1 as a function of T and fitting the CW equation to the experimental data above TN. A positive gradient of the fit confirms CW behaviour which was observed in the x = 5.7, 10.4, 10.9 and 12.4 alloys suggesting the existence of local moments at T > TN.© 2021 Elsevier LtdA new analytical surface-potential-based drain current model is presented for the organic thin-film transistors (TFTs) when carriers are confined in two dimensions. Following the carrier multiple trapping and release (MTR) conduction theory, i.e., the assumption that the trapped carrier concentration is much higher than the free carrier concentration, the model is developed. The presented model can account for the linear regime and saturation regime by a single formulation. The calculated results of the presented model are verified by the available experimental drain current considering the temperature characteristics. Comparing with the previous model using the variable range hopping and percolation (VRH) conduction theory, although the presented model and the previous model are similar in mathematics, the presented model is more efficient to estimate the density of trap states for the organic TFTs.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The structural, electronical, elastical, Debye temperatures and magnetic calculations of the FeWGa half-Heusler compounds were calculated for Type I, Type II and Type III phases by using WIEN2k. The ferromagnetic state of Type II phase is energetically more stable than types. The band gaps were obtained only in Type II phase when GGA and TB_mBJ methods were used. The total magnetic moments were calculated as 1.005, 0.876, and 2.852 μB/f.u. for Type I, Type II and Type III, respectively. However, when TB_mBJ method was used, the total magnetic moment of Type II phase was obtained as 1.00 μB/f.u., which was compatible with Slater-Pauling rule. According to the elastically calculations, Type II and Type III phases are stable, anisotropic and ductile, while Type I phase is unstable against deformation. Then the Debye temperatures were obtained as 200.83 K, 396.11 K, and 320.34 K for Type I, Type II and Type III, respectively. The FeWGa compound has 541.29 K and 396.11 K Curie and Debye temperatures, respectively. Therefore, it is an ideal compound that can be used in spintronic applications.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Recent research and assessments have shown that the reluctance actuator is a promising candidate to drive the next generation precision motion system of the lithography machine in the semiconductor industry. This paper proposes an multi-objective optimization algorithm for an optimal design of E-core reluctance actuator considering the requirements of the precision motion system. The objectives of optimization include maximizing the output magnetic force, minimizing the mass and the time constant of the actuator, and driving the actuator stiffness value to zero. First, the characteristics of the reluctance actuator are expressed in terms of the design variables of the reluctance actuator. After that, the optimization algorithm using the Grid search method and Pareto optimal approach is proposed to obtain the optimal design of the reluctance actuator. Finally, the optimal design of the reluctance actuator is implemented in a precision motion system example. The simulation results are obtained using Finite Element Analysis in COMSOL to check the saturation of magnetic flux in the reluctance actuator. The dynamic response of reluctance actuator motion system is obtained in the time domain for different inputs to verify the optimal design of the reluctance actuator.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Spin gapless semiconducting (SGS) behaviour of polycrystalline CoFeMnSi (CFMS) Heusler alloy thin films was investigated through structural, magnetic, magnetotransport and electron-transport characterization. In this study, we have tailored the structural ordering in CFMS thin films (∼60 nm) grown at different substrate temperatures (TS) in 150 °C to 550 °C range on Si(1 0 0) substrates using pulsed DC magnetron sputtering. All the grown films were polycrystalline in nature, showing an enhancement in structural ordering with TS. Among all the samples, the film grown at 550 °C showed an optimal structure with L21 ordering. The magnetic measurements revealed that saturation magnetization (Ms) of the sample decreased with the an increment in measurement temperature with a value ∼ 3.42 μB/f.u. at 5 K to 3.11 μB/f.u. at 300 K. The Curie temperature (TC) of the sample was estimated to be 778 ± 13 K. The longitudinal resistivity (ρXX) measurements clearly exhibited a negative temperature coefficient of resistivity, indicating the non-metallic behaviour of these CFMS films. The fitting of resistivity curve dig out contribution of electron–phonon scattering and defect scattering to resistivity. Fitting also suggest that holes are the majority charge carriers in optimized CFMS thin film which was further confirmed through positive slope of anomalous Hall resistivity curve. The temperature-dependent anomalous Hall effect (AHE) measurements have also been carried out to identify the different scattering mechanisms responsible for AHE. The results suggested that both the intrinsic as well as extrinsic factors contribute to the AHE of CFMS deposited film with non-zero contribution of phonon-related skew scattering. The carrier concentration (n) and mobility (μ) were found to be nearly temperature-independent, revealing typical SGS characteristics. At room temperature, the n and μ values were found to be 3.91 ± 0.04 × 1021 cm−3 and 88.83 ± 1.58 cm2/Vs, respectively. The value of anomalous Hall conductivity at 5 K is found to be 53.79 S/cm.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.An extensive growth in the application of ferromagnetic materials require a firm theoretical understanding of the material behavior to accomplish accurate model prediction. The aim of this review article is to capture the evolutionary journey of the nonlinear magnetoelastic constitutive laws, spanning since the mid-twentieth century. This review discusses the prominent proposed constitutive models based either on physical or phenomenological considerations, by classifying them into two categories, the anhysteretic and the hysteretic, which further incorporates the effect of magnetic field, stress, temperature, and plastic deformation on the ferromagnetic material behavior. The respective advantages and limitations offered by the various classes of proposed approaches in the form of Jiles–Atherton model, Armstrong model, Zheng–Liu model, Preisach model, Stoner–Wohlfarth model, multiscale model, Play model, Plasticity based model, Continuum based model have been summarized. Finally, a holistic outlook is presented portraying the state of the art and avenues for improvement that future research might hold regarding the refinement of the available nonlinear magnetoelastic constitutive laws.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The structural and magnetic properties of undoped and Ni-doped aluminate glass microspheres with gehlenite (Ca2Al2SiO7) composition and of their polycrystalline analogues were studied. The concentration of Ni was 0.0, 0.5 and 3.0 mol. %. Glass microspheres were prepared by combination of solid-state reaction and flame synthesis. The detailed examination of morphology of the glass microspheres of all prepared composition by scanning electron microscopy (SEM) revealed no features indicating presence of crystalline phases. X-ray powder diffraction (XRD) confirmed amorphous character of prepared Ni-doped gehlenite glass microspheres. In samples crystallized at 1273 K for 10 h, XRD revealed the presence of gehlenite as the main crystalline phase. Raman spectroscopy of crystallized samples also confirmed the presence of gehlenite. Raman spectra of as-prepared glass microspheres differed significantly from the spectra of their crystallized counterparts. These indicate the role of aluminum as a network-forming element. Magnetic properties of the Ni-doped gehlenite microspheres and of their polycrystalline analogues were measured by SQUID magnetometer. Properties of the measured samples showed a more complex magnetic behaviour. Diamagnetic, paramagnetic and ferromagnetic components can be observed depending on whether Ni-doping is used or not, as well as depending on temperature and applied magnetic field values, both for glass microspheres and crystalline samples.© 2021 The Author(s)Spin pumping across interfaces between metallic SrVO3, where V is a 3d1 ion, epitaxial thin films and ferromagnetic Ni80Fe20 is reported. Data shows an efficient spin pumping with a spin mixing conductance value (g↑↓= 11.8 × 1018 m−2) similar to that reported in metallic Vanadium but significantly larger than that measured in isoelectronic (3d1) VO2, which displays a Mott transition. Data are rationalized in terms of the relevance of density of states at the Fermi level and the relative strength of electron–electron correlations and electron-lattice coupling as toggles to tune spin-mixing conductance across interfaces.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The influence of Fe addition on thermal stability, crystallography, and magnetic properties of τ-Mn51Al47C2 was investigated. Alloys with composition Mn51-xFexAl47C2 (x = 0, 0.5, 1, 2, and 4) were synthesized by mechanical alloying method. High purity of τ-Mn(Fe)AlC up to 98% could be obtained after 10 h of milling, then annealed at 1050 °C for 1 h, and followed by an aging process at appropriate temperatures from 515 to 540 °C for 50 min. It was found that the thermal stability of both ε and τ phases was enhanced by the addition of Fe up to 4 at.% into MnAlC alloy through a shifting of ε-to-τ transformation temperature to high temperature region and a reduction in c/a ratio of Fe doped τ-MnAlC compared to iron free τ-MnAlC. While the magnetization and Curie temperature of Fe doped τ-MnAlC showed a reduction compared to iron free τ-Mn51Al47C2, coercivity seems not to be significantly affected. Ab initio calculation showed a lower magnetic moment of Fe (μFe = 1.77 μB) compared to Mn (μMn_average = 2.36 μB) in τ-Mn(Fe)AlC when Fe substituted Mn position at 1a site.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.General relations for nonequilibrium spin transport at a magnetic junction between a normal metal and a ferromagnetic insulator are derived from the quantum fluctuation theorem. They include the extended Onsager relations between the spin conductance and the spin-current noise that hold for nonequilibrium states driven by an external current. These relations are valid for a general setup of spin Hall magnetoresistance (SMR) when the main contribution is due to the interfacial spin conductance. Unidirectional spin Hall magnetoresistance (UMR) in insulating ferromagnetic junctions can be understood in a similar way. Therefore, our work can provide a comprehensive viewpoint for understanding of SMR and UMR in insulating ferromagnetic junctions. Our result also predicts relations for higher-order coefficients with respect to the external current in terms of higher-order cumulants in a unified framework.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We consider the effects of the magnetic field on the frustrated phase states of the dilute Ising chain, especially, the behavior of the magnetic entropy change and the isentropic dependence of the temperature on the magnetic field, which are the key parameters of the magnetocaloric effect. The found temperature dependences of entropy demonstrate the nonequivalence of frustrated phases in the antiferromagnetic and ferromagnetic cases. In the antiferromagnetic case, the nonzero magnetic field at certain parameters causes a charge ordering for nonmagnetic impurities at a half-filling, while in the ferromagnetic case, the magnetic field reduces the frustration of the ground state only partially. It is also shown, that impurities radically change the magnetic Grüneisen parameter in comparison with the case of a pure Ising chain.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We report on the growth of single-crystal ErFeMnO4 and its magnetization, resistivity, and dielectric dispersion behaviors for varying temperature and electric field. A clear bifurcation between the in-plane and out-of-plane M(T) curves is observed due to a paramagnetic-ferrimagnetic transition with a transition temperature of ∼301 K, which is higher than for other RFe2O4 or substituted compounds. Over a similar temperature range, sudden changes in both the relative permittivity and resistivity were also observed, indicating a strong connection between the magnetization, resistivity and dielectric properties. It can be concluded that the electron transfer between the Fe-site ions plays an important role in these behaviors. Finally, a large relative tunability of 75.9% for relative permittivity εr and a net polarization P of about ∼408.7 μC/m2 were attained for a DC biased electric field E = 25 kV/m at 390 K, which are promising for the application of tunable ferroelectric devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetoelectric (ME) based energy harvester has been attracting lots of interests due to its high output energy density at resonant frequency. However, the narrow bandwidth of the resonant frequency limits it for practical applications considering the wide frequency range of environmental energy source. This paper presents a hybrid multimodal energy harvester based on Metglas/PMN-PT ME composites. Specifically, the harvester uses 8 layers of Metglas to form a cantilever beam, and three PMN-PT plates are attached to the cantilever beam separately in order to work at different modes. The multimodal behaviors of energy harvester are demonstrated theoretically and experimentally. Such advanced energy harvester holds the promising for the wide frequency environmental energy utilization.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The compounds with the general chemical formula RCrTiO5 (R = rare-earth ions) has an orthorhombic crystal structure having Pbam space group. However, there are limited work carried out on this group of materials, primarily in bulk to explore their structural and magnetic properties. The exploration of structural and magnetic properties of RCrTiO5 compounds in the nano dimension has not been reported to date. This report focuses on the synthesis of DyCrTiO5 nanoparticles using a simple, time saving and cost-effective sol–gel technique to investigate the role of size on structural as well as magnetic properties. The synthesized sample is calcined at 800 °C for three hours. The crystal structure is confirmed from the Le-Bail profile fitting of the x-ray diffraction (XRD) pattern. The DyCrTiO5 nanoparticles are crystallized in an orthorhombic structure with lattice parameters, a, b, c of 7.321 ± 0.001, 8.644 ± 0.002 and 5.840 ± 0.001 Å, respectively. The average particle size is found to be 53 ± 3 nm from transmission electron microscopy (TEM). From the temperature-dependent magnetization measurement, the obtained Néel temperature (TN) is 147 ± 2 K. In contrast to the bulk form, DyCrTiO5 nanoparticles do not show spin reorientation (SR) which is observed below 37 K or the magnetic compensation because of the dominating contribution of Dy3+ moment. In addition, the irreversibility in magnetization is suppressed when measured as a function of temperature in the heating and cooling cycle of the measurement with increasing the probing magnetic field. This indicates a feature similar to kinetic arrest. In isothermal magnetization measurements, exchange bias effect is observed because of interaction between the uncompensated spins on the surface of the nanoparticles.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Here we present the frequency-selective spin-wave propagation in the magnonic waveguide consisting of two layers with different magnetization saturation. We show that the multimode spin-wave propagation can be performed inside the bilayer structure within two separate frequency range. At the same time this process is accompanied by strong nonreciprocity in spin-wave behavior with the relation to direction of the spin-wave propagation and bias magnetic field. Using the microwave spectroscopy we demonstrate the coexistence of two frequency range in the two samples of pure/modified yttrium iron garnet bilayers with the different orientation of layers with the respect of the substrate. Using the numerical model based on the magnetostatic dispersion relation for spin waves in the bilayer the nonreciprocal behavior of spin-waves was elucidated and its properties for the confined magnonic bilayer stripe was obtained. In particular, it was shown that the narrowing of the stripe leads to the pronounced variation of the nonreciprocity effect for the separate modes in the spin-wave spectra. The experimental data are in good agreement with the predicted by the proposed theoretical model. The proposed concept of bilayer spin-wave waveguide can underlie the fabrication of the magnonic interconnection bus with the support of multiple frequency band operational regimes.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Valleytronics is proposed to explore a new approach for information storage using valley degrees of freedom. In this work, the electronic structure, spin-valley splitting and magnetic anisotropy (MA) of two-dimensional (2D) 2H-VS2/h-VN magnetic van der Waals (vdW) heterostructure are investigated systematically by first-principles calculations. The results show that the considerable spin splitting of 364.7 meV and 543.7 meV are observed at the K and K' valleys, respectively, generating an intrinsic valley splitting of 68.9 meV in the valence band for the 2H-VS2/h-VN heterostructure, which corresponds to an effective Zeeman magnetic field of 774 T based on the k·p model. The valley splitting of 2H-VS2 is well preserved in the heterostructure and can be further adjusted by altering stacking patterns, in-plane strain and interfacial distance due to the interfacial orbital hybridization. Compared with the pristine 2H-VS2 monolayer, the 2H-VS2 of heterostructure still exhibits the in-plane MA, which mainly originates from the positive contribution of the matrix element difference between the V dxy and dx2-y2 orbitals. With the increase of strain from −2% to 3%, the orientation of easy magnetization axis is transformed from in-plane to out of plane. These results suggest that the 2H-VS2/h-VN heterostructure is a potential candidate in further valleytronics and spintronics.© 2021 The AuthorThe paper reports a computational study of the quantum entanglement in V12 cluster molecular magnet. The low-temperature properties of the system are modelled with anisotropic quantum Heisenberg model on a tetramer of spins S=1/2 in the external magnetic field. The two-spin entanglement is quantified using the concurrence, whereas the fidelity serves as a measure of four-spin entanglement. The analytic and numerical results are derived and discussed, emphasizing the importance of real-space and spin-space interaction anisotropy and the role of quantum level crossings in the entanglement description in V12.© 2021 The AuthorMaterials based on Gd with magnetic frustration may have high magnetocaloric application potential. GdCu4Mn crystallizes in hexagonal CaCu5-type structure with space group P6/mmm (no. 191, Pearson symbol: hP6). Lattice parameters for the polycrystalline sample are equal to a = 5.114(3) Å and c = 4.151(4) Å. Due to structural disorder, namely random distribution of Cu and Mn atoms on 2c and 3g positions, a spin-glass-like behavior is observed in this material at low temperatures. In addition to the standard measurements of DC magnetization and AC magnetic susceptibility, the spin-glass state was confirmed by the memory effect and relaxation behavior. The absence of clear anomalies in the temperature dependencies of specific heat and electrical resistance suggests the lack of long-range magnetic order. For a change in magnetic field from 0 to 5 T, maximum values of the isothermal magnetic entropy change (ΔSm), temperature averaged entropy change (TEC(5)), relative cooling power (RCP), and adiabatic temperature change (ΔTad) at ∼50 K are equal to −1.3(1) J/(kg K), 1.2(1) J/(kg K), 125(1) J/kg, and 0.5(1) K, respectively.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Ground state properties of Ni-excess Co2Ni1+xZ1−x (Z= Al, Ga, In, Sn) full Heusler alloys are investigated by abinitio calculations. We consider the effect of different structural motives and chemical disorder on structural stability and magnetic characteristics of these alloys. Co-Ni-(In, Sn) are found to be unstable with respect to decomposition into pure bulk elements. Co2Ni(Al, Ga) are stable, however, introducing the Ni excess destabilizes these alloys making off-stoichiometric Co2Ni1+xAl1−x and Co2Ni1+xGa1−x unstable at x>0.5 and x>0.25, respectively. Saturation magnetization Ms of Co2Ni(Al, Ga) is of the same order like other Co2Ni-based Heusler alloys. Our study showed that an effective way to increase Ms is the introducing of chemical disorder. For stable compounds in which a tetragonal structure with alternating planes of Co and Ni exists, we calculate the magnetocrystalline anisotropy energy (MAE) given large values about −2 MJ/m3 with in-plane favorable spin configuration. The deviation from stoichiometry reduces the MAE by a factor of two.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Specific heat, magnetic susceptibility and magnetization of Cu(en)2SO4 single crystal were investigated in the field applied along the b-axis. The analysis of the susceptibility within the Curie-Weiss law indicates the antiferromagnetic nature of the exchange coupling between Cu(II) ions with zJ/kB = −6.4 K. Considering the structure of this material, the formation of magnetic dimers can be expected. Very good description of susceptibility data was achieved using the Heisenberg antiferromagnetic dimer model with intra-dimer coupling J/kB = −5.52 K, effective inter-dimer coupling J'/kB = −0.3 K and gb = 2.12. The energy gap in the spin excitation spectrum was estimated Δ/kB ≈ 11 K and corresponding critical field Bcb ≈ 7.8 T required for closing the gap. The dimerized nature of magnetic interactions was also confirmed by specific heat and isothermal magnetization data which manifest qualitatively the same behavior as the aforementioned dimer model. The possibility of further low-temperature experiments in the closed gap regime is discussed to obtain more detailed concept of magnetic interactions in this interesting compound.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We report on the structure and magnetic properties of Mn based ferromagnetic layers on the semiconductor SixGe1-x-ySny with Sn content up to y = 0.15 in comparison with layers on Ge and Si0.75Ge0.25. The ferromagnetic layers grow by interdiffusion between an evaporated Mn layer and molecular-beam-epitaxy grown semiconductor layers. This approach enables the preparation of Mn based layers, e.g., as a ferromagnetic contact material for SixGe1-x-ySny using a self-aligned interdiffusion process, opening up the opportunity for large-scale manufacturing. The samples show a clear phase separation into Si-rich and Ge-rich Mn compounds. All samples are ferromagnetic and exhibit a decrease in saturation magnetization and an increase in coercive field with increasing Si content x. The Curie temperature shows no decisive trend with increasing Si content with values around room temperature. Based on the composition, structure and magnetic properties, we propose a two-layer model to correlate the structure and composition with the observed magnetic properties. We show that the changes in magnetic behavior can be explained solely by considering the Si content of the SixGe1-x-ySny substrates with the Sn being largely passive.© 2021The exchange bias field (Hex) and tunneling magnetoresistance (TMR) ratio play an important role for the applications of magnetic tunnel junction (MTJ) in spintronic devices. Here the structure, magnetic properties, and TMR ratio are systematically investigated for the IrMn-based MTJ (IrMn/CoFe/Ru/CoFe/CoFeB/MgO/CoFeB) with seed layers of Ta, Ta/Ru, NiFeCr and Ta/NiFe. The MTJs with seed layers of Ta/Ru and Ta/NiFe present high Hex values, and the MTJ with seed layer of Ta/Ru shows the highest TMR ratio. We found that the Hex is positively correlated with the (1 1 1) texture quality of the IrMn layer while the interdiffusion at the interfaces of CoFeB/MgO/CoFeB has significant impact on the TMR ratio. These results highlight the crucial role of seed layers on the Hex and TMR ratio, and suggest that the Ta/Ru seed layer is beneficial to developing MTJ-based spintronic devices such as magnetic field sensor towards high sensitivity and high stability.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We investigated the ferromagnetic resonance of inverse spinel Mn2TiO4, and found the distortion of oxygen-octahedron caused by ordered occupancy of magnetic ions can effectively reduce magnetic damping of magnetic insulator materials. High-quality cubic and tetragonal Mn2TiO4 single crystals with disordered and ordered occupancy of Mn2+ and Ti4+ at B sites were grown in pure Argon and the mixture of Hydrogen and Argon, respectively. Cubic and tetragonal Mn2TiO4 exhibit the same magnetic behaviors, but the ferromagnetic resonance linewidth of tetragonal Mn2TiO4 is much smaller than that of cubic Mn2TiO4. Moreover, the weaker spin–orbit coupling is, the smaller g-factor and then the narrower ferromagnetic resonance linewidth are in Mn2TiO4 systems, suggesting the decrease of spin damping in tetragonal Mn2TiO4 originates from the diminution of orbital magnetic moment after distortion of oxygen-octahedron.© 2021Magnetic dynamics of iron oxyhydroxide akaganéite nanoparticles, functional building blocks of the newest generation iron deficiency drug Ferinject, has been studied. While magnetism of the involved nanoparticles relies in general on bulk properties of akaganéite, the low temperature magnetic dynamics of Ferinject differs a lot from large number of other iron-oxides-based intravenous drugs in pharmaceutical practice. Clear separation of the high-temperature (Curie) and the low-temperature (spin-freezing) regimes has been identified. Instead of standard single superparamagnetic blocking temperature we show that the spin freezing relies on the two dominant and superimposed relaxations, characterizing the temperature ranges 50–100 K and 4.2–10 K, respectively. Complex magnetic dynamics is interpreted to rely on presence of the two assemblies of nanoparticles differing significantly in their average sizes. Bimodal distribution of particle sizes has been confirmed using atomic force microscopy. The knowledge of the drug's physicochemical characteristics has been thus significantly improved.© 2021 The AuthorsThe paper refers to micromagnetic simulations of magnetization processes of fractal-like core–shell nanoparticles. The objects were generated using the 3D diffusion limited aggregation (DLA) algorithm for obtaining fractals with two kinds of magnetic phases – magnetically soft core and magnetically hard shell. The simulations were carried out using the cluster Monte Carlo algorithm designed for spin continuous and multiphase magnetic systems. The presented research includes different degrees of branch development, different strengths of the exchange coupling between the phases, as well as different soft phase contents. As was shown, the influence of microstructure on the coercivity mechanism is a complex phenomenon. The core–shell coupling and the magnetic properties of the entire system can be controlled by fractal development. The spring-exchange mechanism and high surface development of the fractals makes it possible to obtain a value of the |BH|max parameter higher than 300 kJ/m3. For K = 5 × 10−5 eV and K = 5 × 10−4 eV, it requires about 30% and 7% contribution of the hard magnetic phase, respectively.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The major limitation of present cancer chemotherapeutic agents is the poor selectivity of anti-cancer drug and the resultant toxicity. To circumvent this limitation intense research is currently focused on development of controlled and targeted drug delivery systems. Drug delivery systems are based on nanoscale and micro-scaledrug delivery processes with potential advantage of enhanced accuracy of tumor targeting. Among the nanoparticulate drug delivery systems magnetic iron oxide nanoparticles (MIONs) demonstrate efficacy in terms of tissue targeting and biocompatibility. The polymer coating could be optimized for required rate of release of the drug. The magnetic iron nanoparticles could be directed to a target tissue through application of an external magnetic field. Consequent to the site-specific delivery of the drug, the therapeutic efficacy of the chemotherapeutic agent can be evaluated in terms of clinical outcomes. This study reports synthetic preparation of magnetic poly-(D, L-lactide-co-glycolic acid) (PLGA) microspheres loaded with an anticancer drug 5-Fluorouracil (5-FLU). The nanoparticlulate drug loaded microspheres were synthesized and stabilized as water-in-oil-in-water (W1-O-W2) ternary emulsion system via solvent evaporation. The nanoparticulate system was characterized by X-ray diffraction analysis, Fourier Transform Infrared spectroscopy and electron microscopy. The magnetic nanoparticulate system also exhibited pH-dependent release of 5-fluorouracil.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we study the t-J model using a two-pole approximation within the composite operator method. We choose a basis of two composite operators – the constrained electrons and their spin-fluctuation dressing – and approximate their currents in order to compute the corresponding Green's functions. We exploit the algebraic constraints obeyed by the basis operators to close a set of self-consistent equations that is numerically solved. This allows to determine the physical parameters of the system such as the spin–spin correlation function and the kinetic energy. Our results are compared to those of an exact numerical method on a finite system to assess their reliability. Indeed, a very good agreement is achieved through a far less numerically demanding and a more versatile procedure. We show that by increasing the hole doping, anti-ferromagnetic correlations are replaced by ferromagnetic ones. The behavior on changing temperature and exchange integral is also studied and reported.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Spin polarized transport through a quantum dot coupled to ferromagnetic electrodes with noncollinear magnetizations is discussed in terms of nonequilibrium Green functions formalism in the finite-U slave boson mean field approximation. The difference of orientations of the magnetizations of electrodes opens off-diagonal spin–orbital transmission and apart from spin currents of longitudinal polarization also spin-flip currents appear. We also study equilibrium pure spin current at zero bias and discuss its dependence on magnetization orientation, spin–orbit coupling strength and gate voltage. Impact of these factors on tunneling magnetoresistance (TMR) is also undertaken. In general spin–orbit coupling weakens TMR, but it can change its sign.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We investigated the magnetic properties of the Ru-doped MnNiGe system. The temperature dependence of magnetization, M(T), of Mn0.8Ru0.2NiGe shows a step-like anomaly at around Tt= 173 K (heating process) with a hysteresis of 9 K between the cooling and heating processes. The Mn0.8Ru0.2NiGe compound exhibits a first-order martensite structural change coupled with the ferromagnetic (FM) transition, as seen in the MnNiGe–CoNiGe system. Tt increases linearly with increasing the magnetic field B. The T dependence of the isothermal magnetic entropy change, ΔSM(T), peaks at around Tt, with values of −4.7, −15.1, −24.4, and −32.1 J kg−1 K−1 for ΔB=1, 3, 5, and 7 T, respectively. The three refrigerant capacities estimated from the ΔSM(T) curve show a linear dependence on ΔB. The calculated density of states, DOS, of Mn0.75Ru0.25NiGe in the paramagnetic-hexagonal austenite phase shows a peak at the Fermi energy, EF, and the Mn 3d orbitals contribute significantly to this peak. On the other hand, the DOS at the EF for the compound in the ferromagnetic-orthorhombic martensite phase is smaller than that of the compound in the austenite phase. As the total energy of the electron system, Ee, decreases with the structural change, the phase transition of this system at Tt is driven by the band-Jahn–Teller effect, where the Mn 3d orbitals play the main role.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We developed a method of observing SEM images with a clear magnetic contrast without anisotropy using a scanning electron microscope (SEM). Directional-selective detection of secondary electrons (SEs) is needed to obtain SEM images with a clear magnetic contrast using a type-I method that utilizes changes in the number of detected signals due to a deflection of SEs by the stray magnetic fields of specimens. By combining beam deceleration and specimen tilting (hereinafter “tilting deceleration”), we achieved a directional-selective detection condition for SEs that is preferable for the type-I method. We found that the tilting deceleration method has high sensitivity for fine magnetic domain structures and can visualize submicron-sized magnetic domain structures in a vertically magnetized region of Nd2Fe14B specimens. Furthermore, we synthesized two SEM images with different directional information to reduce the anisotropy of magnetic contrast obtained by the asymmetric detector configuration. As a result, we obtained SEM images with isotropic magnetic contrast, which is similar to that of an SEM image acquired by a spin-SEM equipped with a Mott-type spin-polarization detector.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We present a powerful method to detect the magnetic domain wall (DW), based on the intrinsic characteristic of anomalous Hall effect (AHE), by employing magneto-transport measurement on a device of double Hall cross geometry. We demonstrate that DW propagation manifests its behavior in the distinctive AHE hysteresis and longitudinal magnetoresistance (MR). As DW propagates along the Hall channel, the AHE hysteresis varies considerably depending on the voltage-pickup position while MR displays abnormal asymmetric peaks. Utilizing this direct correlation, we formulate simple models for AHE switching path and MR peak so that they can be efficiently used to characterize DW behavior. It is revealed that at the nucleation stage, the DW velocity grows exponentially with respect to the field. Additionally, the effects of magnetic pinning sites are taken into account and shed light on. The proposed method could be potentially employed for the detection of DW behavior in nanoscale devices.© 2021 The AuthorsWe present the magnetic, specific heat, electrical resistivity, and thermoelectric power measurements for the intermetallic compound CeSi1.2Ga0.8. This composition belongs to the series CeSi2-xGax, which exhibits diverse magnetic orderings and different crystallographic structures depending on the substitution level x. It has been previously suggested that for 0.0 < x < 1.3 the compounds crystallize in the α-ThSi2 type structure and for 0.7 < x < 1.3 they order ferromagnetically below 14 K. Our complementary studies for x = 0.8 reveal that it is a complex system due to the Kondo scattering competing with the RKKY interactions. The transition from the paramagnetic to the ferromagnetic state takes place at TC = 12.5(1) K. Moreover, the Seebeck coefficient and electrical resistivity show not only an anomaly related to the magnetic transition, but also a broad maximum at ∼90 K related to the crystal field effect. The case of x = 0.8 is of special interest as it is at the crossing of the characteristic temperatures, i.e. Tord (magnetic ordering temperature) ∼ TK (Kondo temperature) ∼10 K. Additionally, ab initio electronic structure calculations were performed allowing us to determine phase stability, (revealing two stable phases - α-GdSi2-type and α-ThSi2-type structures) as well as spin and orbital moment decomposition on Ce-states for both considered structures.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Comparisons of magnetic behavior of pristine single crystal-MoS2 (MoS2-SC), nanoparticle-MoS2 (MoS2-NP) and two-dimensional (2D) bi-layer-MoS2 thin film were investigated by the M−H hysteresis loops measured at 300 K, using the superconducting quantum interface device-type magnetometer. Results clearly shows that the room temperature ferromagnetism in 2D bi-layer-MoS2 with saturation of magnetization ∼ 10 × 10-4 emu/g, whereas pristine MoS2-SC / MoS2-NP shows diamagnetism/paramagnetic behaviour. The X-ray photoelectron and Raman spectroscopy results confirms the observed ferro-magnetization in 2D bi-layer-MoS2 is related to the presence of edge spins on the edges of layers, S-vacancies (defects at the grain boundaries region) and higher density of states. This 2D bi-layer-MoS2 may find applications in nanodevices and spintronics by controlling the edge structures.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Applying Monte Carlo simulation, the critical and compensation behaviors of a graphyne bilayer are explored in this study. The effects of the crystal field and exchange coupling on the magnetic behaviors and the phase diagrams are presented in detail. The results show that the critical temperature increases as the crystal field decreases or the exchange coupling increases. In addition, the double compensation points can also be found in this system. Furthermore, we give the hysteresis loops under different parameters, and the multi-loop hysteresis behaviors are observed.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We study the magnetoresistive properties of a spin valve based on a double quantum dot attached to ferromagnetic leads with noncollinear alignment of magnetic moments. It is assumed that each dot is strongly coupled to its own ferromagnetic electrode, while the hopping between the dots is relatively weak. The calculations are performed by using the perturbation theory in the coupling between the dots, while the local density of states of a quantum dot attached to a given external lead is determined with the aid of the numerical renormalization group method. We demonstrate that the examined device can exhibit considerable positive or inverse tunnel magnetoresistance. It can be also a source of highly spin-polarized current. Importantly, the spin-resolved transport properties can be controlled by gate and bias voltages and depend on the angle between the magnetizations of the ferromagnets.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Through a versatile and quite economical technique of DC electro-deposition, Sm2Co17 nanowires (NWs) have been fabricated into the nanochannels of anodic aluminum oxide (AAO) templates by using non-aqueous electrolyte. The average diameter and length of NWs are 80 nm and 3 µm respectively. The structural and magnetic properties of NWs have been investigated before and after magnetic field (MF) annealing with magnetic field strength of 1 T applied parallel to the NWs axis at temperature of 300 °C. SEM and TEM have been employed to observe the morphology of NWs after partial and full etching respectively. Deposition of SmCo alloy has been confirmed through EDX analysis whereas XRD peaks shows hexagonal closed packed (hcp-P63/mmc) as the dominant phase with (2 0 3) preferred orientation. After MF annealing the crystallinity got improved as manifested by the increase in peak sharpness. Furthermore, after the said field assisted heat treatment the magnetic parameters including coercivity (Hc) from 91 to 527 Oe for θ = 0°, from 101 to 151 Oe for θ = 90° and squareness (SQ) from 0.040 to 0.16 for θ = 0°, from 0.037 to 0.032 for θ = 90° have been observed through VSM. A switching of magnetization reversal mechanism from curling to coherent rotation has been observed after MF annealing due to the stronger inter-wire coupling which leads to parallel alignment of magnetic moments of adjacent NWs. Temperature dependent study has been carried out employing PPMS manifesting gradual increase in Hc from 67 to 440 Oe, Ms from 5.4 × 10−3 to 6.1 × 10−3 emu and SQ from 0.19 to 0.25 with the decrease in temperature up to 5 K.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The Landau–Lifshitz equation governing magnetization dynamics is written in terms of the amplitudes of normal modes associated with the micromagnetic system's appropriate ground state. This results in a system of nonlinear ordinary differential equations (ODEs), the right-hand side of which can be expressed as the sum of a linear term and nonlinear terms with increasing order of nonlinearity (quadratic, cubic, etc.). The application of the method to nanostructured magnetic systems demonstrates that the accurate description of magnetization dynamics requires a limited number of normal modes, which results in a considerable improvement in computational speed. The proposed method can be used to obtain a reduced-order dynamical description of magnetic nanostructures which allows to adjust the accuracy between low-dimensional models, such as macrospin, and micromagnetic models with full spatial discretization. This new paradigm for micromagnetic simulations is tested for three problems relevant to the areas of spintronics and magnonics: directional spin–wave coupling in magnonic waveguides, high power ferromagnetic resonance in a magnetic nanodot, and injection-locking in spin-torque nano-oscillators. The case studies considered demonstrate the validity of the proposed approach to systematically obtain an intermediate order dynamical model based on normal modes for the analysis of magnetic nanosystems. The time-consuming calculation of the normal modes has to be done only one time for the system. These modes can be used to optimize and predict the system response for all possible time-varying external excitations (magnetic fields, spin currents). This is of utmost importance for applications where fast and accurate system simulations are required, such as in electronic circuits including magnetic devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The authors report the thickness dependent structural and magnetic properties of Mn5Ge3 thin films with different Mn layer thicknesses in the range from 5 nm to 30 nm deposited on Pb(Mg1/3Nb2/3)0.7Ti0.3O3 (PMN-PT) substrates using solid phase epitaxy. Gradual decrease of the surface roughness due to the formation of larger grains, as well as the decrease of the coercivity and squareness ratio on increasing of Mn layer thickness has been observed. It has been revealed that the slightly greater value of the saturation magnetization than the corresponding one observed early for thin films and bulk samples is associated with the presence of structural defects. The ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) spectra have been obtained to be isotropic for the films with 5 nm thickness, whereas those registered from the films with the thicknesses of 10 nm and above demonstrated in-plane magnetic anisotropy, which have been interpreted as to be resulted from magnetocrystalline anisotropy as well as the stress-induced magnetic anisotropy. These results are suggested to create a major interest in the development of magnetoelectric heterostructured devices based on strain coupling that are compatible with CMOS technology.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Spinel ferrites have remained popular over the years due to their exceptional electrical and magnetic properties. The sol–gel method was used to synthesize the Cu1-xBaxFe2O4 (x = 0.00, 0.20, 0.40, 0.60, 0.80, 1.0). The cubic spinel phase was visible in all samples using X-ray diffraction. The addition of barium ions increased lattice constant values from 8.38 Å to 8.50 Å while lowering porosity and density. By including barium ions in the reaction mixture, resulted an increase in the activation energy and DC resistivity. The increase in temperature from 300 to 650 K is given to all prepared samples, and then they behaved like semiconductor because their resistivity decreased with the increase in temperature. When barium ions were introduced, magnetization decreased, and coercivity increased. All these properties suggested that these samples might be suitable for high-frequency applications.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic and magnetocaloric effect of nanocrystalline Pr0.65(Ca0.7Sr0.3)0.35MnO3 compound have been investigated. In addition to the charge ordering and antiferromagnetic ground state, several fascinating physical properties were appear depending upon the controllable phase separation scenario. The different proportions of the magnetic phases appeared at the low temperature is directly related with the history of applied magnetic field and temperature. Moreover, the nucleation (arrested magnetic phase) and devitrification nature of magnetic phase were addressed considering different widths of the supercooling and kinetic arrest bands. Additionally, nanocrystalline compound exhibits the large inverse magnetocaloric effect at low temperature. The inverse magnetocaloric effect arises possibly due to the arrested antiferromagnetic phase of this compound.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Among the graphyne family, δ-Graphyne is a new typical representative for instance. In this article, we have studied the spin-splitting phenomena in the band structures and transport properties of zigzag δ-graphyne nanoribbron (ZδGYNR) with edge fluorination. Our results show that the spin-splitting can be observed obviously in the ZδGYNRs with unilateral or bilateral edge fluorinations. Moreover, some distinct physical effects, such as spin-filtering, rectification and negative differential resistance, can be found in the proposed device models. Particularly, the efficiency of spin-filtering can approach to 100% in the antiparallel spin-configuration of the bilateral fluorination model, which would be capable of leading to promising applications in spintronics and nanodevices.© 2021Single-crystal exchange biased multilayer thin-films consisting of an Fe layer on single-crystal chemically ordered L12-IrMn3 and disordered γ-IrMn3 were investigated using circularly and linearly polarised soft X-ray reflectivity to determine the interfacial magnetic structure between Fe and IrMn3. In ordered L12-IrMn3, we found that the Mn uncompensated moments at the interface are strongly pinned and only Fe rotational moments are observed. In disordered γ-IrMn3 the uncompensated moments are partially pinned, where the Mn moments are rotatable but the rotations are restricted. These findings are a crucial development in exchange bias theory to understand the force that drives the magnetic reversal process in ordered and disordered IrMn3.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Exact analytical diagonalization is used to study the bipartite entanglement of the antiferromagnetic mixed spin-(1/2, S) Heisenberg dimer (MSHD) with the help of negativity. Under the assumption of uniaxial single-ion anisotropy affecting higher spin-S (S>1/2) entities only, the ground-state degeneracy 2S is partially lifted and the ground state is two-fold degenerate with the total magnetization per dimer ±(S−1/2). It is shown that the largest quantum entanglement is reached for the antiferromagnetic ground state of MSHD with arbitrary half-odd-integer spins S regardless of the exchange and single-ion anisotropies. Contrary to this, the degree of a quantum entanglement in MSHD with an integer spin S exhibits an increasing tendency with an obvious spin-S driven crossing point, when assuming the easy-plane single-ion anisotropy. It is shown that the increasing spin magnitude is a crucial driving mechanism for an enhancement of a threshold temperature above which the thermal entanglement vanishes. The easy-plane single-ion anisotropy together with an enlargement of the spin-S magnitude is other significant driving mechanism for an enhancement of the thermal entanglement in MSHD.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnons are the elementary excitations of the magnetic order that carry spin, momentum, and energy. Here we compare the magnon with the ferron, i.e. the elementary excitation of the electric dipolar order, that transports polarization, momentum, and energy in ferroelectrics.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The improved spatial resolution of the alternating magnetic force microscopy (A-MFM) technique developed in this work is demonstrated using a tip coated with a very thin magnetostrictive Fe-B-based amorphous film. Its magnetization can be periodically reversed using an applied alternating current magnetic field, which leads to alternating mechanical stress at the tip end, thus affecting localized magnetization reversal via an inverse magnetostrictive effect. Spatial resolution improvement is achieved via effective reversible magnetization volume at the sharpened tip end, which promotes a decrease in the total magnetic volume and maintains sufficient sensitivity at a lower coating thickness. A-MFM uses frequency modulation induced by an off-resonant alternating magnetic force between the tip and the sample. Therefore, a magnetic force can be selectively detected near the sample surface, independent of non-magnetic interactions. Due to their smooth surfaces without crystalline grain boundaries, large magnetization, and large magnetostriction compared with those of other magnetic materials, Fe-based amorphous films are suitable for tip coating applications. A 500-kfci perpendicular magnetic recording medium (PMR) was imaged using a 6-nm thick amorphous Fe-B coated tip to produce highly resolved images with minimal detection of the wavelength of the magnetic field of less than 10 nm. Also, 1600-kfci PMR imaging was successfully achieved, with the images showing individual ∼ 15-nm bits.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The utilization of fly ash (FA) and the treatment of electromagnetic pollution have become important contents of current environmental management. A new type of electromagnetic waves absorption material was obtained by using fly ash magnetic beads (FAB), nickel powders (Ni) and polyaniline (PANI) in this study. A novel core–shell PANI@FAB/Ni composite was successfully prepared by interfacial polymerization of PANI on the surfaces of FAB and Ni. The structure, composition, morphology, magnetic property and electromagnetic parameters of composites were investigated in detail. Due to the synergistic effect of several different loss mechanisms, which improved attenuation capacity and impedance matching, the optimal reflection loss of PANI@FAB/Ni at 5.52 GHz was −67.07 dB (thickness of 5.48 mm). Meanwhile, the effective absorption bandwidth of PANI@FAB/Ni is 4.24 GHz with a thin matching thickness of 1.98 mm. This novel electromagnetic waves absorption material made of FAB has potential commercial prospects.© 2021 The AuthorIn bi-component magnonic crystals (MCs) demagnetizing field occurs around interfaces between a matrix and inclusions. As it is already shown this field strongly influences the spin-wave spectrum including the position and the width of band gaps and their response to the change of the external magnetic field. Here, we show its effect on the reversal of the mode order in the spectrum. The reversal of modes means that the modes which are excited mostly in the material with higher saturation magnetization have the lowest frequency than modes excited in the material with low saturation magnetization. We address this effect to the mode-dependent softening of spin waves resulting from the growing influence of the demagnetizing field while the external magnetic field lowers. The effect gives a possibility of the concentration of spin waves (i.e. the spatial distribution of their energy) in one of the constituent materials (the spin wave is excited much stronger in one material than in the other), the matrix or scattering centres, by the external magnetic field. As an example, we study planar bi-component MCs consisting of cobalt inclusions in permalloy matrix, as well as Py inclusions in Co matrix. We show that in both cases lowering external magnetic field drives down in the spectrum these modes which are excited mostly in Co. Moreover, the concentration of such modes in Co is enhanced.© 2021 The Author(s)Spectrum of spin waves (magnons) in the two-dimensional bilayer antiferromagnet based on the VSe 2 is studied theoretically. The vanadium atoms within individual layers are coupled ferromagnetically, while the exchange coupling between V atoms located in different planes is antiferromagnetic. The magnon dispersion relation and its dependence on magnetic anisotropy is analyzed in the regime of weak external magnetic field. The spin-wave spectra are derived within the spin-wave theory of antiferromagnets in terms of the Holstein–Primakoff transformation combined with the Bogolubov diagonalization scheme. The magnon dispersion features are discussed in case of the T-type stacking of the VSe2 bilayer.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Core-shell structures of two core sizes and three different interparticle distances for each core, provided by individual silica shells, were employed as test bench to compare energetic parameters that can be obtained from DC and AC magnetometry analysis. Samples were structurally characterized through X-Ray powder diffraction (XRD), confirming the spinel structure of the cores with different crystallite sizes and different proportions of amorphous silica. Transmission electron microscopy (TEM) revealed the spherical core–shell structures of the samples with core sizes of 8.5 and 12.6 nm and shells thickness that ranges from 2 to 20 nm. Zero field cooling and field cooling (ZFC-FC) routines, saturation magnetization as a function of temperature and AC susceptibility measurements were analyzed to calculate activation energy values and thermal parameters related to anisotropic contributions, attributed to dipolar and surface effects. Both contributions manifest by shifting and broadening the activation energy distribution and causing a slowing down of the spin-relaxation rate on approaching the critical temperature, a complementary approach is employed to analyze them.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A new cobalt nanoparticles (CoNP) with a core–shell structure were obtained in a matrix of a second generation hyperbranched polyester polyol (BH20). The influence of the molar ratio Co2+ to a BH20 on the nature of stabilization centers of cobalt nanoclusters in the polymer morphology magnetic properties anti-protease activity and hemolytic activity of nanoparticles was studied. The obtained nanoparticles are superparamagnetic and have a blocking temperature of 305 K. Inhibition of the activity of the secretory aspartic protease Candida albicans in the presence of nanoparticles is 58–91%. The hemolytic activity of nanoparticles does not exceed 5%. The data obtained determine the presented cobalt nanoparticles in the matrix of the hyperbranched polyester polyol as a promising nanomaterial with low cytotoxicity for use in medicine and pharmacy.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The effects of Bi-doping on the electronic structure, martensitic transformation and magnetic properties of Heusler alloys Ni2MnGa1-xBix and Mn2NiGa1-xBix (x = 0, 0.25, 0.5, 0.75, 1) were investigated theoretically. The substitution of Bi for Ga has a negative effect on the martensitic transformation. The total energy difference ΔEM between the martensite and austenite decreases gradually with the doping of Bi. When x = 0.5, 0.75 and 1.0 in Ni2MnGa1-xBix and x = 1.0 in Mn2NiGa1-xBix, the martensite phase becomes higher in energy comparing with the austenite. Thus the doping of Bi can lower the martensitic transformation temperature TM and finally suppresses it. The possible reasons for this trend are related to the increasing valence electron concentration e/a and cell volume V with Bi-doping. The competition between them may be ascribed further by the electron density, which combines the effect of valence electron concentration and size effect. The electron densities of Ni2MnGa1-xBix and Mn2NiGa1-xBix decrease monotonously with increasing Bi content. This agrees well with the variation of ΔEM or TM. The doping of Bi does not change the magnetic structure of Ni2MnGa1-xBix and Mn2NiGa1-xBix. The former is ferromagnetic and the latter is ferrimagnetic in both martensite and austenite state. These results can help to introduce new component like Bi to Heusler alloys and discover new functional materials in them.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We report the stress-annealing induced distribution of the helical magnetic structure in the magnetic microwires. The longitudinal space distribution of the magnetic anisotropy originated by stress-annealing at variable annealing temperature is the reason of the observed effect. We have found that the helicality of magnetic structure in different points of the microwire could be controlled by the external mechanical torsion stress.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We generated pulses of electromagnetic radiation with a frequency content up to three terahertz (THz) by optical excitation of Co2Fe0.4Mn0.6Si Heusler alloy/heavy metal bilayers (CFMS/HM) using fs-laser pulses. We attribute the generation process to the conversion of a spin current, generated by the illumination with a fs-laser pulse, to a charge current via the inverse spin Hall effect. We compared the THz emission efficiency in CFMS/Pt and CFMS/Ta bilayers due to their high spin–orbit coupling of Pt and Ta. Surprisingly, our data reveal that CFMS/Pt shows substantially larger THz amplitudes compared to CFMS/Ta. Both bilayers exhibit a tunability of the THz amplitude by external magnetic field both at 300 K and 100 K. Ferromagnetic resonance measurements demonstrate that CFMS/Ta has a high effective spin mixing conductance, describing the efficiency of interfacial spin transport. We observe that the efficiency of the THz radiation cannot be solely described by the spin–orbit coupling strength and the spin diffusion length in the HM material plays an important role.© 2021 Elsevier LtdTo explore the potential of semi-insulating (SI) SiC substrate for radiation detector applications, p-i-n diodes with thick depletion layers are fabricated by using a dual-face ion implantation technique on SI 4H-SiC substrate. The Poole-Frenkel (P-F) emission is found responsible for the reverse leakage current transport of the p-i-n diode at elevated temperatures. The derived emission barrier height is likely induced by the residual boron-related shallow-level states, which are located ∼ 0.3 eV above the top of the valence band. Detection tests of α-particles are performed on each side of the p-i-n detector to determine the location of the depleted region, which reveals weak p-type conduction of the SI 4H-SiC substrate after high temperature post-implantation annealing. The energy resolution of the detector operating in photovoltaic mode is ∼ 4.3%, which would degrade at higher biases. The saturated charge collection efficiency (CCE) of ∼ 99% for detection of 5.48 MeV α-particles is obtained as reverse bias exceeds 80 V.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Due to their peculiar property of controlled stiffness and strength under an external magnetic field, magnetorheological (MR) fluids show great potential in developing hybrid robotic grippers that in the future could offer the same versatility as the human hand. This demands for sufficiently strong, compact and switchable magnetic field sources for which permanent magnets are often overshadowed by electromagnets. However, permanent magnets possess higher magnetic flux densities per mass unit, and when assembled in certain ways, they allow to control their joint magnetic field. Within this paper, an extensive parameter study is conducted using grid search for the design of concentric Halbach cylinder assemblies based on finite element simulations. The influence of decisive geometric and material properties on the performance of these magnetic activation mechanisms is studied. These include the magnets’ shapes, sizes and number; the cylinders’ radii and number of pole pairs; and the relative permeabilities of the MR fluid and the grasped object. The performance of a design is measured by a multi-objective function that considers: the mean magnetic flux densities generated in the mechanism's ON and OFF-state, the magnetic field's inhomogeneity (i.e. standard deviation) in the ON-state, and the total magnet area for both cylinders. This work concludes by deriving guidelines for the most optimal design of concentric Halbach cylinders for a cylindrical radial bellow gripper.© 2021 The Author(s)ThCoC2 is a non-BCS, noncentrosymmetric superconductor with Tc≃2.5 K, in which pairing mechanism was suggested to be either spin fluctuations or the electron–phonon coupling. Earlier experimental work revealed that Tc can be greatly enhanced upon Ni doping in ThCo1−xNixC2, up to 12 K for x=0.4. In this work, using the Korringa–Kohn–Rostoker method with the coherent potential approximation (KKR-CPA), the evolution of the electronic structure upon Ni doping was studied and the increase of the density of states at the Fermi level was found. The electron–phonon coupling constant λ was calculated using the rigid muffin tin approximation (RMTA) and the increase in λ(x) was found. This indirectly confirms the electron–phonon coupling scenario as the trend in λ(x) is in qualitative agreement with the experiment when the electron–phonon pairing is assumed.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The microstructure and electro-magnetic properties of FeCoHfN thin films deposited by reactive sputtering under an in-situ magnetic field have been studied as a function of nitrogen partial pressure (R(N2)). As the (R(N2)) increases, the grain size of α-FeCo phase can be effectively reduced, and the structure of the films changes from an amorphous/nanocrystalline dual-phase structure with ultrafine α-FeCo magnetic nanoparticles isolated by a nonmagnetic insulating layer to a single amorphous structure. The structural transformation and the enrichment of HfN layer improve the resistivity and static and dynamic soft magnetic properties of the films. Higher resistivity is expected to reduce eddy current losses at high frequencies. The critical (R(N2)) when the film shows indications of excellent high-frequency magnetic properties is 8%. The deposited FeCoHfN thin films have high saturation magnetization of 14.9–16.2 kGs, great permeability of 222–322 at GHz, and high ferromagnetic resonance frequency up to 3.5 GHz, showing the promise of high-frequency applications.© 2021 The AuthorsBilinear magnetoresistance (BMR) is a new kind of magnetoresistance, that scales linearly with electric and magnetic fields. This magnetoresistance occurs in systems with strong spin–orbit interaction. Additionally, this interaction also leads to quadratic magnetoresistance (QMR). We consider theoretically BMR and QMR in surface states of 3D topological insulators, and propose a new mechanism that leads to these effects. This mechanism is based on scattering on spin–orbit impurities. Accordingly, we assume the minimal model of surface electronic states in a single independent surface of a TI, and calculate both BMR and QMR induced as an interplay of current-induced spin polarization (or equivalently effective spin–orbit field) and spin–orbit scattering on impurities. We present detailed characteristics of both BMR and QMR, and compare our results with those obtained for TIs with spin-momentum locking inhomogeneities and hexagonal warping of the Dirac cones.© 2021 The AuthorsWe report on exchange bias and interfacial antiferromagnetic spin orientation in epitaxial CoO(1 1 1)/Fe(1 1 0) bilayers. Our X-ray magnetic linear dichroism and magneto-optic Kerr effect results show that exchange bias sets on in the zero-field-cooled system and is governed by in-plane magnetic state Fe(1 1 0) sublayer above Néel temperature of CoO. Uniaxial magnetic anisotropy of Fe layer determines the direction of interfacial frozen antiferromagnetic CoO spins within CoO(1 1 1)//Fe(1 1 0) sample plane. Choice of the particular magnetic state of Fe sublayer, when passing Néel temperature of CoO, determines both the axis and direction of interfacial antiferromagnetic spins after the sample is cooled and allows for imprinting their +/- 90° and 0/180° alignment within the sample plane.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the particularities of the spin wave (SW) excitations in corrugated yttrium-iron garnet (YIG) films with a thickness of 0.2 μm and a corrugation period of 20 μm were studied by micromagnetic simulations. Strong influence of the corrugation depth, changing from 0 to 0.5 μm, on SW dispersion, transmission and eigenmode spectrum was shown. Formation of a bandgap resulting from the spin-wave resonances in the sidewalls of the corrugated YIG film was discovered in the SW dispersion and transmission spectrum in addition to the Bragg bandgaps and dipole-exchange resonance.© 2021 The AuthorsMagnetic nanoparticles have several promising biomedical applications. One example is the magnetic nanoparticle-based hyperthermia, where the magnetic nanoparticles absorbed by the tumor cells are subjected to alternating magnetic field to generate local heating. Other applications rely on the effect of static magnetic fields to collect or rearrange cells, which are covered with magnetic nanoparticle containing substrates. In both cases, the effect of clustering largely modifies the magnetic properties of these materials. In the present study, we have examined the commercially available multicomponent material, NanoShuttle™-PL (Greiner Bio-One) particles composed of gold, iron oxide and poly-L-lysine, which are used for the creation of levitated 3D cell cultures. While this material is often used for cell culture studies, there is no available data on its magnetic and structural properties. The aim of the study was to understand the magnetic properties of this composite material based on the characterisation of the size distribution and clustering of the magnetic nanoparticles. We have performed RAMAN, AFM/MFM measurements and SEM/STEM investigation of the composite material. Magnetic properties were investigated with a vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) both in the liquid state and in the surface extracted form.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.One of the most important challenges in Nano-scale spintronics is the production of intrinsic two-dimensional ferromagnetic half-metals with large spin gaps and high Curie temperatures. Here, by using firs-principles calculation we predict two-dimensional transition metal hydrides MnHm (M: V, Cr, Fe, and Co) have different magnetic properties in various space groups. Our results show the magnetic ground state of VH3, FeH3 and CoH3 in space group P/4nmm, Cr2H3, Fe2H3 and Co2H3 in space group of P-3 m1 is ferromagnetic while V2H3 and CrH3 in space group of P-3 m1 and P/4nmm respectively, are antiferromagnetic. In particular Co2H3 monolayer is 100% spin polarized intrinsic ferromagnetic half metal with spin gap of 3.2 eV and Cr2H3 can also change to half-metal by doping a small amount of electric charge with a band gap of 4.2 eV. The delocalized and unpaired d electrons around the Fermi level act as the chief source of magnetism and half metallicity. The Curie temperature, calculated utilizing the mean-field approximation, is 485 and 227 K for Co2H3 and Cr2H3 monolayers respectively so it can be concluded that Co2H3 and Cr2H3 monolayers are promising candidates for spintronic applications.© 2021 The Author(s)Passive techniques, which do not require magnetization of the tested object with a strong external field, are becoming increasingly popular. This article investigates the influence of the Earth's magnetic field on the diagnostic result. A detailed analysis of the steel wire rope test results in a polyurethane cover set in different directions - both geographic and magnetic - was performed. The rope was tested for two cases: in the delivered condition and with damages. The authors analyzed three different magnetic positions for each subject. Researchers analyzed the collected values in terms of the error obtained while indicating which position the results are the most promising. The authors used for the study the optically pumped magnetometer with a laser pumped caesium module.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We propose a dual gravitational theory corresponding to isotropic ferromagnetic systems based on the holographic duality, and establish the holographic dictionary between physical quantities in ferromagnets and the gravitational theory. Utilizing the holographic dictionary, the holographic calculation in the dual gravitational theory is shown to reproduce thermodynamics of ferromagnets including ferromagnetic phase transitions and low-temperature behaviors originating from magnons and conduction electrons. We further derive the equation for magnetization dynamics in ferromagnets from the equations for scalar fields and non-abelian gauge fields on charged black holes in the dual gravitational theory. From these results, the holographic duality is expected to give a new guiding principle to explore new phenomena in spintronics and magnonics based on the gravitational perspective.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The nature of charge transport and magnetization anisotropy was investigated in the ErB12 antiferromagnetic metal with both cooperative Jahn-Teller distortions of the fcc crystal structure and electronic instability (dynamic charge stripes). A butterfly pattern of the H-φ magnetic phase diagram in the (1 1 0) plane was reconstructed, including a large number of different magnetic phases separated from each other by radial and circular boundaries. It is argued that fluctuations of electron density are responsible for the suppression of the indirect Ruderman-Kittel-Kasuya-Yoshida (RKKY) exchange between the nearest neighbored Er3+ ions located along the 〈110〉 directions producing the magnetic phase diversity in ErB12.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We investigated the impact of skin effect on permeability of Permalloy films with different thicknesses. With eliminating multi domain structure by measuring field permeability spectrum, the picture of permeability determined by natural resonance and modulated by skin effect was demonstrated. It is found that both the value of permeability and line shape of the field permeability spectrum depend on thickness significantly due to skin effect. The real part of field permeability spectrum decreases from 974 (0.04 μm) to 14 (4 μm) at 3.2 GHz, and two loss peaks appear in the imaginary part in films thicker than 2 μm, which can't be explained by previous work. We established a skin effect-related model of permeability with which the experimental permeability spectra can be well fitted. The calculated cut-off frequency is significantly reduced by skin effect from 3.5 GHz (0.02 μm) to 0.3 GHz (4 μm), which is dominated by the natural resonance frequency (t ≤ 1.46 μm) and the additional loss peak frequency caused by skin effect (t > 1.46 μm) successively.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Microwaveguides for spin waves based on yttrium iron garnet films and cross-like structures built on such waveguides are experimentally studied. Effects of the waveguides geometry, location of the microantennas for excitation and detection of the spin waves, and geometry of the waveguides junctions on the spin wave excitation and propagation efficiency are discussed.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Metalloid elements significantly affect the microstructure and magnetic properties of Fe-based nanocrystalline alloys. However, adding multiple metalloids would complicate the impact of each metalloid on magnetic properties. Here, we have found that Fe81.3SixByP17-x-yNb1Cu0.7 nanocrystalline alloys exhibit high saturation magnetic flux density (Bs) of 1.73–1.79 T and low coercivity (Hc) of 4–6 A/m. It was found that Si, B and P elements have strong synergistic effects on the thermal stability, magnetic properties, microstructure and crystallization kinetics of the alloys. Keeping the P content and Si/B ratio at a moderate level is the key to obtaining an ultrafine nanocrystalline structure with high Bs and good soft magnetic properties. The underlying mechanism by which the addition of multiple metalloids affects the microstructure and magnetic properties has been revealed.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this study, an easy and eco-friendly way for the synthesis of magnetic nanoparticles was investigated and mainly focused on its use on magnetic particle inspection (MPI) as a fluorescent magnetic particle. For this purpose, iron oxide magnetic nanoparticles (Fe3O4 MNPs) were prepared via rapid and green route using watermelon rinds extract (WRE). The synthesized WRE@Fe3O4 MNPs have been characterized by Scanning electron microscopy (SEM), Energy dispersive spectroscopy (EDS) and Dynamic light scattering (DLS). From the SEM images of the WRE@Fe3O4 MNPs, it has been shown that particle size was ranging from 50 nm to 100 nm. EDS spectrum indeed confirmed the presence of significant amounts of Fe and O. The average particle size was found to be 554.8 nm by DLS method. The magnetic property of WRE@Fe3O4 MNPs was analyzed by Vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). The analysis of synthesized nanoparticles showed an amount of 24.35 emu/g for magnetic saturation. All of the results, the green synthesized WRE@Fe3O4 MNPs demonstrated good potential for identifying cracks in the test block during MPI testing. Thus, the cracks between 1.29 and 1.55 mm in the test block were successfully identified.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we study experimentally by broadband ferromagnetic resonance measurements, the dependence of the spin-wave excitation spectra on the magnetic applied field in CoFeB meander-shaped films. Two different orientations of the external magnetic field were explored, namely parallel or perpendicular to the lattice cores. The interpretation of the field dependence of the frequency and spatial profiles of major spin-wave modes were obtained by micromagnetic simulations. We show that the vertical segments couple the horizontal sections of the structure and support the in-phase and out-of-phase spin-wave precession amplitude for several magnetic modes. The investigated structures could potentially be used for the design of tunable metasurfaces or in magnetic memories based on meandering 3D magnetic films.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Signatures of Ferromagnetism in p-type conducting Cadmium Telluride (CdTe) quantum dots (QDs), synthesized by Single Injection Hydrothermal (SIH) method are reported in this article. The Powder X-ray Diffraction (P-XRD) analysis depicts hexagonal structure for the CdTe QDs. X-ray Photoelectron Spectroscopic (XPS) technique is used to determine the 3d5/2, 3d3/2 orbital states of the Cd as well as Te and also to confirm the Cd-Te bond formation in CdTe QDs. The van der Pauw Hall measurement technique is used to identify the p-type conductivity in the CdTe QDs, which are attributed to the Cd vacancy defects formed during the synthesis of the CdTe QDs. Appearance of hysteresis in the Superconducting Quantum Interference Device (SQUID) measurements made at 300 K and 5 K, confirm the ferromagnetic behavior of the CdTe QDs. The signatures of ferromagnetism are attributed to Cd vacancy defects.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The thickness-dependent strain-relaxation behavior and the associated impacts upon the magnetic, electric properties and magnetoelectric coupling effect for the highly c-axis oriented BiFeO3 (BFO) film films grown on (0 0 1) oriented Si substrate were studied. The result shown that the value of remnant polarization and coercive field were suppressed as the strain relaxes with increasing thickness. The BFO films also presented typical weak ferromagnetic hysteresis loops with a low coercive field and small remnant magnetization, and the saturated magnetization and remnant magnetization decreasing with increasing film thickness. The room temperature dynamic magnetoelectric coupling was approved by the transverse magnetoelectric voltage coefficients, which also decreased with strain relaxation due to the increase of thickness, and the maximum was around 265 mV/cm.Oe when the film thickness is 50 nm.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The effect of magnetic fields on the local structure of the Fe81Ga19 alloy was investigated by X-ray absorption fine spectroscopy (XAFS) technique. The results demonstrate that 0.6 T magnetic fields lead to the increasing of the 3d, 4s and 4p electrons of Fe atoms, but the decreasing of the 4p electrons of Ga atoms. The electron transfer from Ga to Fe with applying magnetic fields is revealed. The magnetic fields increase the Fe–Ga bond length. The role of the Fe–Ga bond in determining the magnetostriction is revealed.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This article provides a brief overview of advanced magnetic X-ray spectro-microscopies that are widely used in characterizing mesoscopic magnetic materials. Common to those techniques are various X-ray magnetic dichroism effects that are used as magnetic contrast mechanism. A particular interest is to use those techniques to image the underlying microscopic spin structures in magnetic materials with high spatial resolution and to ultimately resolve their full 3D mesoscale characteristics with elemental sensitivity, as well as their ultrafast dynamics upon excitations with field and current pulses. Recent research examples using various magnetic X-ray spectro-microscopies are presented to showcase their specific features with a focus on imaging novel topological spin textures, such as vortices, skyrmions and Hopfions, which are considered as potential building blocks towards low power, high-speed and high-density magnetic devices that could transform information technologies and potentially be used in biomedical applications. Future developments with magnetic X-ray spectro-microscopies harness the full coherence of next generation X-ray sources and could open the path towards single shot imaging with spatial and temporal resolutions down to fundamental magnetic length and time scales.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The influence of degree of structural order tuned by annealing on magnetocaloric properties of Gd55Co20Al24.5Si0.5 bulk metallic glass (MG) was investigated. It is uncovered that moderate enhancement of structural order can increase the magnetocaloric effect (MCE), but excessive degree of structural order reduces the MCE. Through tuning the degree of structural order, the maximum magnetic entropy change of the MG annealed at 536 K for 60 min reaches 10.8 ± 0.6 JKg-1K−1 under 5 T, which is the highest value of the Gd-based MGs, indicating the promising prospect of these alloys as magnetic refrigerant candidates. Besides, it's found that the degree of structural order, reflected by the crystallization enthalpy change, and the magnetic entropy change have a good linear correspondence, which sheds new light on the nature of MCE in MGs and is of significance to the design of novel amorphous magnetic refrigerants.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This investigation describes the synthesis, characterization, and in vitro cytotoxic evaluation of luminescent-superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles (SPIONs) functionalized with biomolecules and Eu3+ and Tb3+ complexes. They emerge as strong candidates for a large number of biomedical applications, such as drug delivery for bioapplications in therapy and diagnosis (theranostic). Aiming these applications, magnetite nanoparticles (Fe3O4) functionalized with biocompatible ligands, Chitosan (CS) and Glutathione (GSH) and Eu3+ and Tb3+ β-Diketonates complexes were synthesized by a one-step procedure and characterized by different experimental techniques. Regarding bioapplication, their cytotoxicity using the cell viability assay of the blood mononuclear cell fraction were performed. The results show that the cytotoxicity depends on the concentration, nature of ligands and complexes. The SPIONs are luminescent with emission in the visible region under ultraviolet excitation and stable in nanoscale in aqueous medium. They are good candidates as nano-luminescent carriers in biomedical applications.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the structural, electronic and magnetic properties of transition metal (including Mn, Fe, Co, Ni, Cu, Rh and Pd) adsorbed on SbAs monolayer by using density functional theory. We found that an induced magnetic moment is observed for Mn, Fe, Co and Rh transition metal atoms, while in the case of Cu and Ni it is suppressed by local distortions. Our calculations show that Mn, Fe, Co and Rh can induce total spin magnetic moment of 4.86μB, 3.51μB, 1.99μB and 0.90μB, respectively. The origin of magnetism lays is their d orbital and depends on its filling level. In particular, the total magnetic moment decreases with increasing the number of d electrons. Among the studied transition metals, Mn seems to be the most promising candidate for the introduction of ferromagnetic ordering into SbAs, as it showed a high magnetic moment close to 5μB. Overall, the analysis of the electronic and magnetic properties indicates that transition metal doped SbAs are promising two-dimensional magnetic systems.© 2021The influence of temperature on the inertial structures in magnetic fluid was previously assumed to be based on a single mechanism. In this work, specialized rheological experiments were performed and their results have shown that different structural evolution paths can take place under the function of hydrodynamic and thermal interaction. The widely adopted Mason number was proved to be unsuitable to describe the magnetoviscous effect of magnetic fluids under different temperatures. To give a proper description on the combined effect of magnetic dipolar interaction, hydrodynamic interaction and thermal interaction in magnetic colloidal system, a novel structural number S was proposed and found to be applicable to superimposed the data under various temperatures onto a master curves.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetization curves for Pr2Fe14B single crystals were measured between 300 K and 900 K. The saturation magnetization Ms along the [1 0 0] direction was found to be 3% to 6% smaller than that for the [0 0 1] direction, not only at 300 K but also up to the Curie temperature. Published magnetization curves for Tm2Fe14B single crystals were reexamined, in which Ms along the [0 0 1] direction exceeds that for the [1 0 0] direction. We attributed these differences in Ms to the reduction of the rare-earth (R) moment when forced to be aligned along the hard direction by external fields. Significant anisotropy was observed in the paramagnetic susceptibility χ up to 900 K in the Pr2Fe14B (R = Pr) system. Based on the crystalline electric field parameters for R = Pr and Tm systems obtained by first-principles calculations, we numerically evaluated the magnetization and paramagnetic susceptibility at high temperatures. The differences in Ms and χ obtained from the calculation were in good agreement with the experiments. We found that the reduction rate for the Pr moment at the 4f site is much smaller than that at the 4 g site. This result suggests a crucial decrease in the local magnetic anisotropy at the Pr(4f) site.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, a Maxwell fisheye lens (MFL) for spin waves (SWs) focusing on a ferromagnetic film was presented via micromagnetic simulation. The Maxwell fisheye lens with graded refractive index distribution, achieved with gradient saturation magnetization, is designed to manipulate the wavefront of spin waves. The simulation results show that sub-wavelength focusing can be achieved by means of MFL with appropriate chosen parameters. Furthermore, simulation results also prove that the focusing properties of MFL can be tuned by external magnetic field. The MFL would be promising device for SWs focusing and wavefront manipulation.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Fabricating anisotropic bulk rare-earth (RE)-free magnets with both crystallographic texture and refined grains is a difficult task. In this paper, an anisotropic bulk Mn-Al-(C) RE-free magnet with a (00 l) crystallographic texture was fabricated using the confined deformation under high-stress and large-strain conditions during the phase transformation from hexagonal ε-phase to tetragonal τ-phase. XRD patterns and TEM images of the magnets revealed that the τ-phase with grain sizes of 150–200 nm is the predominant phase and that the magnets exhibit a (00 l) texture perpendicular to the pressure direction. The deformed magnets have an obvious magnetic anisotropy and enhanced remanence perpendicular to the pressure direction due to the texture formation. The effects of deformation temperature (Td) and time (t) on microstructures and magnetic properties of these magnets were investigated, and optimal magnetic properties, with a coercivity of 239 kA/m (3 kOe) and energy product of 14.5 kJ/m3 (1.82 MGOe), were obtained at Td = 550 °C and t = 60 s. Our work is of importance for future development of high-performance anisotropic bulk RE-free magnets.© 2021 The AuthorsDysprosium (Dy) has been studied using neutron diffraction under high pressures and low temperatures at a spallation neutron source by employing a large-volume diamond anvil cell. Companion measurements at different central wavelengths allow the collection over extended reciprocal space with momentum transfer Q covering the range from 0.5 Å−1 to 5.5 Å−1. Upon cooling to 15 K, magnetic ordering was observed in the hexagonal close-packed (hcp), alpha-samarium (α-Sm), and double hexagonal close packed (dhcp) phases of Dy to 22 GPa. We report on previously undetected magnetic superlattice reflections signaling antiferromagnetic transition for both the α-Sm and dhcp phases of Dy. Magnetic structure refinements for the α-Sm phase shows a complex phase comprising two magnetic propagation vectors k = (1/2, 1/2, 1/2) and k = (1/2, 0, 0). Magnetic structure refinements for the dhcp phase yield a single magnetic propagation vector k = (1/2, 0, 1/3) and a possible magnetic space group Pbnma. The refined magnetic structures are provided to the highest pressure of 22 GPa.© 2021The Nd-Fe-B regenerated magnets are prepared by adding low melting point Ho69.3Ni30.7 alloy at the grain boundary, and the microstructure, structure and overall performance of the Nd-Fe-B regenerated magnets are studied. The results show that the addition of Ho69.3Ni30.7 alloy to grain boundary can optimize the distribution of grain boundary phase, accompanied by the formation of clear and continuous grain boundary phase, which weakens the exchange coupling effect between the adjacent main phases. Meanwhile, the coercivity of the regenerated magnet increases with the increase of Ho69.3Ni30.7 alloy content. The optimal coercivity (16.35 kOe) was obtained at 2 wt% Ho69.3Ni30.7 additions, and the coercivity increased by 1.24 kOe (8.2%) compared with the initial magnet (15.11 kOe). In addition, with the addition of Ho69.3Ni30.7 alloy, the curie temperature of Nd-Fe-B regenerated magnet increased from 303.2℃ to 305.6℃. The reflection loss of regenerated magnet reached −26.42 dB when the amount of 2 wt% Ho69.3Ni30.7 was added, which greatly improved the absorbing performance of the regenerated magnet. Finally, the secondary utilization of waste Nd-Fe-B magnets was realized.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Pt/Co/Pt trilayers were deposited on flat and step-terrace Al2O3 substrates to study the influence of surface morphology on the perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) and magnetic domain structure. The total thickness of the Pt/Co/Pt trilayers was minimized to resemble the step-terrace morphology of the substrate, which possessed a terrace width and height in the ranges of approximately 90–165 nm and 1.8–4.2 nm. The flat surface of the Pt/Co/Pt trilayers exhibited many small-dot domains or few large-block domains, whereas the terrace surface exhibited highly aligned stripe domains parallel to the longitudinal direction of the step-terrace Al2O3 substrate. The width of the stripe domains was within a range of approximately 500–700 nm, and the length of the stripe domains exceeded a few hundred micrometers. An anisotropic domain-wall motion in the longitudinal direction of the step-terrace may be used to control the operation of a magnetic device, such as a racetrack memory.© 2021 Elsevier LtdA large area AlGaN/GaN resonant tunneling diode (RTD) grown by metal–organic chemical vapor deposition (MOCVD) is manufactured. The device adopts air-bridge structure suitable for the terahertz (THz) band, and a commercially available high-frequency GaN technology is applied in the process of device fabrication. Negative differential resistance (NDR) characteristics of the device are observed under the bipolar bias voltage at room temperature, which exhibits clear anti-symmetry in the peak-to-valley current ratio (PVCR), peak voltage and peak current density. The work systematically investigates how the built-in electric field introduced by polarization effects modulates the resonant tunneling transport utilizing TCAD tool Silvaco-ATLAS, and analyzes the enhancement of the resonant tunneling under negative bias voltage of the RTD with low-aluminum content AlGaN as barriers. The AlGaN/GaN RTD with conventional double-barrier single (DBS) quantum well (QW) structure shows reproducible NDR characteristics under the bipolar bias voltage at room temperature, which facilitates the design and extensive study of complicated device structures.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Ferromagnetic materials are widely used in industry and risking the hazards of aging and degradation of their mechanical properties. This paper proposed a non-destructive method for the measurement of the yield strength of ferromagnetic materials imprinted by the materials’ microstructure as the microstructure influences the pattern of the inverse magnetostrictive effect of ferromagnetic materials. For experimental verification, yield strengths of ferromagnetic specimens were measured on an electromagnetic ultrasonic transducer (EMAT) detection system. The relationship between electromagnetic acoustic transducer signals and the static magnetic field strength was obtained, from which we extracted the pattern parameters related to the yield strength. The regression model of the pattern parameters versus the yield strength was established and then verified with trial on a specimen processed in the same batch with a maximum prediction accuracy of 12.78%.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Bi-doped Cu alloys are promising materials in the field of Spintronics due to the possibility of having efficient charge to spin conversion via spin Hall effect. To explore this effect, in particular at the nanoscale, it is essential to have a growth method that allows the control of crystal quality, cluster formation and microstructure. In this paper, we demonstrate that electrochemical deposition is a suitable method for the synthesis of these nanomaterials. We report the growth, by template assisted electrodeposition, of high quality, homogeneous nanowires of a diluted alloy of Bi dispersed into a Cu matrix, in which Bi concentration can be easily varied by tuning electrolyte composition. Structural analysis shows that Bi does not cluster but incorporate into the Cu matrix. The short-range order is nevertheless affected by the deposition potential. Cu is basically metallic, and Cu–Cu nearest-neighbor distances are those of bulk Cu, so Bi enters into the Cu structure substitutionally. Using low overpotential, we demonstrate the possibility of growing single crystal nanowires.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A magnetic sensor based on a one-dimensional (1D) photonic crystal was proposed. The transmission characteristics of the 1D photonic crystal magnetic sensor were analyzed using the theory of rigorous coupled wave analysis (RCWA). The variation pattern of magnetic fluid films refractive index with magnetic field and the effect of structural parameters on sensitivity and figure of merit (FOM) were investigated. Based on the wavelength interrogation method, the resonance wavelength is red-shifted with the change of the magnetic field for certain structural parameters. The results show that the structure has a highly linear response within the external magnetic field variation range from 30 Oe to 90 Oe, and its sensitivity and FOM can reach 0.817 nm/Oe and 17.439 Oe−1. Due to the advantages of 1D photonic crystal structure has harp peak, highly linear response, and low transmission loss. The structure has a large potential for applications in complex environments and real-time monitoring.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We report an investigation of the transport of a pure spin current across a thin layer of organic conductor polyaniline (PANI) sandwiched between a film of the ferrimagnetic insulator yttrium iron garnet (YIG) and a thin layer of platinum. The spin current, generated by spin Seebeck effect of the YIG film, is injected through the YIG/PANI interface, crosses the whole PANI layer and is injected into the Pt layer, where it is converted into a charge current by means of the inverse spin Hall effect and electrically detected as a DC voltage. We also present revealing results of experimental detection of the spin-to-charge current interconversion measured directly on the PANI layer in which we were able obtain the spin Hall angle θSH=(1.70±0.06)×10-5 showing that this organic conductor presents a great potential in spintronics devices.© 2021 Elsevier LtdOrganic field effect transistors based on blended polymer insulators were fabricated. The effects of polystyrene (PS), poly (vinyldifluoride) (PVDF) and poly (vinylphenyl) (PVP) blended with poly (methylmethacrylate) (PMMA) on the properties of insulating layers were studied. The PMMA:PS films have spherical grains, the PMMA:PVP films exhibit porous pit morphology, and the PMMA:PVDF films still show plane morphology. The morphology of insulating layers can affect the crystallization of organic semiconductors. Meanwhile, the performance of OFET devices indicates that polymer doping decreases the threshold voltage of devices. When the mass ratio of PMMA:PVDF is 10:5, the threshold voltage of OFET devices is about −14.7 V, which is significant lower than that of pure PMMA devices. This is attributed to the larger capacitance and lower roughness of the insulating layers. Therefore, it is a convenient and effective method to optimize the threshold voltage of OFET devices by applying blended polymer insulating layers.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A study of ferromagnetic resonance in square hollow nanopillars was carried out, with the aim of analyzing the effects of geometry. Nanopillars (NPs) with L = 120 nm length and D = 30 nm external width were studied. By fitting the data for parallel field and using the Primary peak, the anisotropy field was HA = 97.2, 116.4 and 144.5 kA/m for d = 0, 10 and 20 nm, respectively. For perpendicular field, HA = 175, 193 and 251 kA/m for d = 0, 10 and 20 nm, respectively. The variations were attributed to the increase in dipole interactions, as the cavity size increases. A secondary peak was also fitted and HA = 222.5, 220 and 226.9 kA/m were obtained for parallel configuration. Thus, this secondary peak, from regions whose local field varies little with the dimensions of the cavity, were attributed to the effects of parallel edges.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Here we compare two kinds of doping in transition metal oxides by considering defects due to the substitution of the transition metal or rare earth element. The focus is on insulating t2g orbital systems and we present various mechanisms that lead to reorganization of spin–orbital order. Substitutional doping of d4-transition metal by d3 ions generally results in removal of the local orbital degrees of freedom and the exchange on hybrid d4−d3 bonds modifying locally (or globally) spin–orbital order. Different routes of rearrangement of spin–orbital patterns are also found when considering doping by d2 ions. Here we demonstrate that in the regime of strong impurity-host coupling ferro-orbital type ordering is favored. This analysis can find application to ruthenate oxides with Mn or Cr replacing the Ru atoms. In contrast, charged (Sr,Ca) defect replacing R ion in the R1−x(Ca,Sr)xVO3 (R=La,Y) perovskites generates a spin–orbital polaron in the defect cube. We show that t2g orbital rotations are then induced near the charged defect and a doped hole disturbs orbital order. As a result, the collapse of G-type orbital order occurs but C-AF spin order stays robust under increasing doping.© 2021 The Author(s)We present studies of quantum interference in a noise power spectrum in the system of two quantum dots (2QD) in a T-geometry. Performing the spectral decomposition we are able to separate local currents and distinguish between the intra- and inter-level current correlation contributions to the noise power spectrum. In particular, we analysed the large bias regime and show that for a weak coupling of 2QD with the electrodes the noise power spectrum has dips at frequencies characteristic to inter-level excitations. For a strong coupling the electron transport changes its nature and the dynamics of the current correlations is different: there are two coherently coupled relaxators with different relaxation frequencies. These two regimes of current dynamics are separated by a quantum critical point, in which the noise power spectrum shows a specific frequency dependence. In the linear response limit the noise power spectrum is related to the admittance, which shows characteristics different, due to quantum interference, for the weak and strong coupling case.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Two-dimensional ferromagnetic materials are potential candidates that can be integrated with the current nanoelectronic and spintronic device architecture. The latest trends in designing spintronic devices are mainly based on two-dimensional (2D) inorganic compounds. Here, we present a study based on first-principles density functional calculations where we design a 2D ferromagnetic material within the family of metal−organic frameworks. Starting from the inorganic CrI3 compound, we demonstrate that a chromium-based metal−organic compound i.e. Cr(COOH)3 can be stabilized in a ferromagnetic state compared to the other possible anti-ferromagnetic states. The proposed structure of Cr(COOH)3 is found to be thermodynamically stable, but its dynamic stability could not be verified because of complexity into the structure. The lowest energy magnetic configuration of pure Cr(COOH)3 turns out to be antiferromagnetic. However, our calculations suggest that the presence of positively charged Cr-vacancy defects can stabilize the ferromagnetic state over antiferromagnetic orderings. The presence of delocalized holes is found to be responsible for favoring the ferromagnetic ordering.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We present a theoretical description of magnon–phonon interactions in a multilayer structure containing a ferromagnetic thin film. The formalism is applicable to an arbitrary direction of external magnetic field and various types of acoustic waves including Rayleigh and Love surface modes. A particular attention is paid to the spatial profile of the acoustic wave modes and analytical expressions for the effective coupling coefficients are derived taking into account the degree of mode profile overlap between spin waves and acoustic waves. The results are applied to reproduce a strongly anisotropic and non-reciprocal linewidth of acoustic ferromagnetic resonance reported in a recent experiment.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.No magnetic loss during the absorption process is a lack of conductive polymers, while not lightweight is a drawback of magnetic materials to be potential microwave absorbers. A hybrid of magnetic material and conductive polymer is a good resolution for above issues. In this work, composites of BiFe0.8Co0.1Mn0.1O3 (BF) and multi-walled carbon nanotubes (MWCNTs, named as MW) were prepared by a hydrothermal method. Then, the in-situ polymerization method was used to decorate polythiophene on the MW/BF composites. The formation of polythiophene@MW/BF composites and their magnetic, electromagnetic properties were investigated using XRD, XPS, FE-SEM, EDS, and VNA. The composite with MW and polythiophene significantly tuned the microwave dissipation features of the polythiophene@MW/BF composites. In the measurement range of 12.4–18 GHz, the results revealed that the composite with 20 percent of MW (named as P@20 MW/BF) has a minimum reflection loss of −19 dB at frequency f = 13 GHz for a thickness of 2 mm. The maximum effective absorption bandwidth was also found for the P@20 MW/BF composite as 2.6 GHz. Enhancement in microwave absorption performance arises from the balance between magnetic loss and dielectric loss. Overall, the introduction of three-layer polythiophene/MW/BF composites provides potential microwave absorbers for application in the range of 12.4–18 GHz.© 2021The equilibrium magnetization of flat elongated magnetic nanoparticles of different shapes has been determined for a range of the static magnetic fields applied parallel to their long/easy axes. The behaviour of single particles has been compared with that of equidistant chains composed of the same particles. The shapes sharpened at the ends, i.e. elongated diamonds and two-sided swords, switch with minimal inhomogeneities of magnetization and with well rectangular hystereses. This may be useful in designing of binary memory devices. The narrowest hysteresis has been found for hourglass shapes, where the switching is preceded with inhomogeneities of magnetization so the hystereses are rounded. The shapes endowed with broadened heads, such as dumbbells and bones, show vortex-like inhomogeneities, marked with an interesting interplay of helicities, which result in a multi-stage switching with relatively large coercive fields.© 2021Interactions between quasiparticles of different nature, such as magnons and phonons in a magnetic medium, significantly change the spectrum of both types of quasiparticles. In regions where their dispersion curves intersect, forming an avoided crossing, the properties of the two subsystems mix and hybrid states are born, whose characteristics, such as velocity, lifetime and scattering efficiency, are determined by the magnon and phonon portion of their composition. In particular, the influence of the elastic component of quasiparticles allows for the manipulation of the position and even the number of spectral minima of the magnon gas in the wavevector space. Using Brillouin light scattering spectroscopy, we experimentally investigated such a system populated by the parametric pumping of magnons in a film of yttrium iron garnet. We found that the processes of thermalization of exchange and dipole magnons lead to their accumulation in different areas at the bottom of the spin-wave spectrum separated by the magnon–phonon hybridization region. The localization of quasiparticles in the wavevector space eventually leads to their separation in real space.© 2021 The AuthorsTransient electron dynamics and the Fano resonance formation over time in transport through a two quantum dot system in a T-shape geometry (2QD-T) are analyzed for free electrons. Time evolution of the transport characteristics are different for a weak and a strong inter-dot coupling with respect to the dot-electrode coupling. When the dot–dot coupling is weak, we find that transport dynamics is governed by two channel tunneling processes with two different relaxation times and buildup of the Fano resonance is developed much slower, with the longer relaxation time. In the opposite limit, the transmission evolves with a single relaxation time, from the single peak resonance structure into the structure with two asymmetric peaks. One observes large dot-electrode charge oscillations, which can temporarily change direction of transient currents. We find also that the time evolution of entanglement is different in both coupling regimes; in particular rapid Rabi oscillations caused by coherent electron transfer between the 2QD states can be seen for the strong dot–dot coupling.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Er-doped zinc-ferrite nanoparticles ZnFe2−xErxO4 (x = 0, 0.02, 0.06, 0.10) with diluted Er3+-doping concentrations were synthesized by coprecipitation method and subjected to structural, morphological, electrical, and magnetic investigations. Their anti-Trichinella spiralis activity was in-vivo and in-vitro examined. ZnFe1.94Er0.06O4 structure was enriched by lattice-defects compared to other nanoferrites, displaying minimum Fe-O bond-length and hopping-lengths (octahedral and tetrahedral sites). These defects were the key-advantage behind owing of ZnFe1.94Er0.06O4 nanospheres to (i) lowest particle-size (of ∼8 nm), (ii) highest magnetic-moment (∼0.11), and lowest magnetic-anisotropy (∼13.5) and coercivity (∼10.5G) with unattainable saturation-magnetization, and (iii) electrical-insulating nature. As regards, ZnFe1.94Er0.06O4 exhibits superior anti-Trichinella spiralis activity. Orally-administration of ZnFe1.94Er0.06O4 in T. spiralis infected-mice at intestinal and muscle-larvae stages showed near 100% adult-worm mortality and proficient-reduction in larval-count with marked-improvement of histological/physiological features. Anti-Trichinella spiralis activity in-vitro of ZnFe1.94Er0.06O4 showed drastic sloughing and severe destruction of worm-body. With ZnFe1.94Er0.06O4, ending of trichinellosis becomes much closer than ever before.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, ultralight electromagnetic (EM) wave absorbent based on the graphene oxide (GrO) nanocomposite was investigated. This research aims to fabricate an aerogels nanocomposite made of GrO as an aerogel matrix and the absorbent of the electrical part of EM waves, strontium ferrite nanoparticles as an absorbent of the magnetic portion of EM waves, silicon carbide as a dielectric nanoparticle for further EM waves absorption. To prepare the graphene oxide aerogel - strontium ferrite - nano silicon carbide nanocomposite, the hydrothermal - freeze-drying method was used. The effects of strontium ferrite micro-and nanoparticles on the microstructure, phase, magnetic properties, and electromagnetic waves absorption were investigated. Results show that aerogel with nano-sized particles possesses a better EM absorbing performance than the micro-sized particles due to better impedance matching and nanosize effect.© 2021 The AuthorsThe molecular complex containing the bimetallic core Ni6Cr representing the centered ring geometry as well as its frustrated analogue are numerically simulated using the phenomenological and DFT approach. Within the anisotropic Heisenberg model, the magnetic properties observed are quantitatively explained. In the isotropic limit and the spin frustration switched on via antiferromagnetic interactions between the local s=1 spin carriers, the sequence of the ground states determined by the total spin S is obtained in agreement with the fundamental Lieb–Mattis theorem. It is also demonstrated that the temperature dependence of the susceptibility product χT with characteristic minimum and maximum is not only a signature of competition between the ferro- and antiferro-magnetic interaction but also a symptom of the spin frustration phenomenon.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Electronic transport through a hybrid triple quantum dot system is theoretically studied by means of the real-time diagrammatic technique in the lowest order of perturbation theory. The central part of the system is arranged in a triangular geometry, with two quantum dots weakly coupled to metallic electrodes, while the third dot is proximitized by an s-wave superconductor. The focus is put on the transport regimes, where one- and two-electron dark states are formed due to the destructive interference of the electronic wavefunctions. This effect greatly influences the properties of the system, leading to the coherent population trapping and consequently to current blockade, negative differential conductance and enhanced shot-noise. It is shown that the presence of the superconducting pairing correlations in the system can lift the dark state blockade and reduce the shot-noise. Moreover, the current oscillations due to the magnetic flux enclosed by the triangular structure and the effect of superconducting correlations are considered. When the dark state has eigenenergy near the chemical potential of superconducting electrode, the amplitude of oscillations is strongly reduced while the current blockade is lifted. However, when the eigenenergy of the dark state is shifted away from the chemical potential of superconducting lead, the current oscillations remain unaffected.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic hyperthermia destroys malignant cells by absorbing the heat generated by magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) under an external AC magnetic field. One of the most influencing factors for such therapy is to control the heat generation within MNPs, which is highly relevant to applied AC magnetic field and used MNPs during treatment. This paper optimizes the intensity of magnetic field acting on MNPs by considering an optimum power dissipation of MNPs, which is obtained by using Nelder-Mead algorithm for a proposed objective function during the optimization procedure. The aim of the proposed objective function is to minimize the difference between the maximum treatment temperature and its upper safety value as much as possible. The optimization results can be used to investigate the injury degree for the proposed model by Arrhenius thermal damage model, and also to optimize the performance for the magnetic field strength on MNPs by the implicit function due to Rosensweig's theory in this study. Simulation results demonstrate that the power dissipation of MNPs can quickly converge to an optimum value after less iterations during the optimization process, which can also result in an ideal treatment temperature profile and can further obtain the injury degree for different malignant cells, when a temperature-dependent blood perfusion rate is considered for the simulation. The magnetic field or the MNPs can also be optimized before the therapy under this optimal power dissipation for MNPs at this time. In addition, this study also reveals the evolution of treatment temperature due to two blood perfusion rates, namely temperature-dependent and constant models.© 2021Using the flux technique single crystals of (Ni,Cu)2MnBO5 were grown. The crystal structure of this compound belongs to the space group Pbam(55). There are no monoclinic distortions of the crystal structure. The analysis of the structural data shows that the content of copper ions in the crystal is lower than 10 percent. The magnetic ordering into the ferrimagnetic phase occurs at 75 K. The assessment of the exchange interactions shows that changes in the exchange interactions lead to increasing frustrations in the system which could result in a decrease in the temperature of magnetic ordering.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work magnetic properties, magnetoimpedance (MI) and field sensitivity (η) of rapidly solidified (Fe0.7Co0.3)80B19M1 (M = B, Al, Si & Cu) ribbons have been investigated in the frequency range 0.5 – 13 MHz. Present study shows replacement of boron (B) by a nonmagnetic element (Al, Si or Cu) can alter the thermal stability, soft magnetic and magnetoimpedance properties of the (Fe0.7Co0.3)80B20 ribbons. It is found that saturation magnetization reaches the largest value for Cu-containing sample and the smallest value for Al-containing sample. The MI studies show maximum MI ratios 30% at 5 MHz, 23% at 7 MHz, 26% at 3 MHz and 39% at 4 MHz for M = B, Al, Si & Cu respectively. Variation of MI with external magnetic field shows single peak behavior of Al-content ribbon over the entire frequency range, whereas for all other samples single peak converted to double peak at higher frequency, which indicates existence of stronger longitudinal magnetic anisotropy in Al-containing ribbon. The MI variation with magnetization, M and damping constant, α is also validated through numerical simulations using standard electrodynamics models. Present study reveals that the variations of MI response are associated with formation of soft magnetic phase and development of anisotropy with replacement of B by an additional element.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We report our systematic investigation of structural, magnetic, and magnetocaloric properties of double perovskite compounds Ho2FeMnO6, Ho2CoMnO6, and Ho2NiMnO6, which crystallize into monoclinic crystal structure with P21/n space group. The magnetic phase transition temperatures are determined to be 7.5 K for Ho2FeMnO6, 69 K for Ho2CoMnO6, and 71.5 K for Ho2NiMnO6, where Ho2FeMnO6 exhibits an antiferromagnetic to paramagnetic phase transition, while Ho2CoMnO6 and Ho2NiMnO6 exhibits ferromagnetic to paramagnetic phase transitions. The magnetic entropy change (−ΔSM), which are found to be 10.2, 3.4 and 4.7 J/kgK at ΔH = 7 T for Ho2FeMnO6, Ho2CoMnO6, and Ho2NiMnO6 samples, respectively. The magnetic and magnetocaloric characteristics of double perovskite compounds are well explained based on structural and electronic properties. For future applications, our quantitative method provides a guideline for magnetic property engineering of double perovskite systems containing ferromagnetic 3d transition metals.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Thermomagnetic motors are based on the effect of heat on magnetic properties of magnetic or magnetocaloric materials, which undergoes temperature and magnetic field cycles to produce mechanical power. This kind of motor has the potential to be used in the industry to recover low-grade heat, as energy harvesters. In this work, a model has been developed to simulate the time-dependent heat transfer processes in the heat exchanger coupled to the thermomagnetic phenomena. The heat exchanger is composed of prismatic segments of gadolinium magnetocaloric material with a circular channel, establishing an internal flow of working fluid. Gadolinium (Gd), which is usually adopted as reference material for magnetic cooling at room temperature, was considered as the working material because of the availability of properties data, and a mixture of water-glycol (20%) is used as working fluid. This way, the present paper investigated throughout numerical simulations the influences of the demagnetizing effects, magnetocaloric effect (MCE), heat exchanger geometric parameters (segmentation) and total weight of the heat exchanger on the performance of a linear thermomagnetic motor which the operating principle is based on the magnetic and gravitational forces balance (gravity return). Results for magnetic force, cycle period, and produced power are presented as a function of different operating conditions, such as flow rate and cold reservoir temperature, and design constraints. A maximum produced power of 0.3 W was found for a flow rate of 1.5 l/m and 20 working material bodies in the magnetic heat exchanger.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The majority of power transformers are usually energized by sinusoidal excitation. However, there is a growing demand for using PWM excitation on power electronics devices for energy savings. As awareness of the environment also increases, the importance of noise and vibration issues becomes more significant. Increasing non-linear loads over time affect the ageing and lifetime of transformers. Such cases also cause to change the nominal values ​​of transformers. It is important that mechanical parameters such as vibration and noise can be accurately measured and examined so that all necessary functions can be entirely performed as other electromagnetic performances. For this reason, it is necessary to analyse the vibration movements of transformers and determine their characteristics, especially locally under changing operating conditions. Magnetostrictive is known as the main source of vibration and noiseof the transformer core. This paper presents localized magnetostriction of transformer core measured by strain gauges under sine and PWM voltage excitations. For validation of the study in this paper, a no-load strain measurement was performed experimentally on a real 20kVA three-phase three-limb T-joint transformer assembled in a laboratory. Localized magnetostriction in the rolling and transverse directions of the lamination under sinusoidal and PWM voltage excitations was carried out. The results of the experiment were compared with each other in terms of the location of the sensors. The Finite Element Analysis (FEA) was used to simulate the magnetic behavior of the transformer based on time-dependent analysis of magnetic field density, force, e.t. distributions under no-load conditions, respectively. In conclusion, evaluating the localized magnetostriction characteristic, especially under PWM voltage excitation, is essential for interlamination electromagnetic and electromechanical behaviors.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Strained CoFe2O4 nanoparticles were dispersed in a SiO2 matrix prepared by the co-precipitation method. Rietveld refinement is performed to estimate structural parameters and distribution of cations at tetrahedral and octahedral sites respectively. W-H-ISM and W-H-ASM models were applied to evaluate lattice strain, crystallite size and lattice deformation stress. The decrease in coercivity and saturation magnetization observed with increased temperature and SiO2 content. Reduction in magnetization is attributed to the increased number of disordered surface spins with enhanced strain and reduced effective and surface anisotropy. The blocking temperature (TB)is evaluated as 347.9 K for CF, 349.2 K for 5%SiCF, 352.1 K for 10%SiCF and 353.4 K for 15%SiCF nanoparticles respectively. The Higher value of μSP(μB) is observed for CF nanoparticles at 350 K, represented in temperature and magnetic field dependent superparamagnetic moment (μSP(μB)) curves. A new dependency observed between variations of μSP(μB) with strain values as enhanced μSP(μB)is observed with increasing strain values for the higher concentration of SiO2. An enhancement in the saturation magnetic field (HHT) with increasing temperature confirms the necessity of a higher magnetic field for reaching saturation values. A new relation is examined for variation of Ms and μSP(μB) with strain values from 5 K to 350 K.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.During the last years, a great attention has been devoted to the discovery of materials that can be used for magnetocaloric applications such as intermetallics and oxides. In this context, the multiferroic TbMnO3 appears as promising magnetocaloric material that can be used for magnetic refrigeration at low temperatures. This multiferroic presents complex electronic and magnetic structures. In this paper, different approaches are used with the aim to get more insight on the driving mechanisms behind the electronic, magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of the TbMnO3 manganite. In this way, a physical model is proposed to describe the magnetic interaction inside this material. Using the density functional theory, the electronic structure, density of states, have been evaluated. The magnetic phase stability and exchange couplings in TbMnO3 have been also investigated in order to understand and to clarify the obscured different magnetic interaction in this compound. Magnetocaloric and magnetic properties have been studied using Monte Carlo Simulation (MCS) within the Ising model. The transition temperatures, the isothermal magnetic entropy change, the adiabatic temperature change and the relative cooling power (RCP) were calculated. The highest obtained isothermal entropy change is found to be −17.8 J/Kg.K for H = 8 T. The RCP maximum value is found to be 507.06 J/Kg and the adiabatic temperature change reaches a maximum value close to 22.5 K in the field change of H = 8 T.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The polar magnetic oxide, HoFeWO6, is synthesized, and its crystal structure, magnetic structure, and thermodynamic properties are investigated. HoFeWO6 forms the polar crystal structure (space group Pna21 (#33)) due to the cation ordering of W6+ and Fe3+. An antiferromagnetic transition at TN = 17 K is accompanied by a significant change in magnetic entropy with a value of ≈ 5 J kg−1 K−1 in a 70 kOe applied field. Temperature dependent neutron diffraction and magnetization data indicate that the Fe sublattice orders in a strongly non-collinear and non-coplanar arrangement below TN. The Fe ordering initially leads to induced ordering of the Ho spins such that the Ho spins also show behavior of long-range ordering that is evident from the neutron diffraction measurements. Below T ≈ 4 K, the Ho spins order independently and pull the Fe spins toward the direction of Ho spins. A comparison with the magnetic structures and corresponding ferroelectric properties of other members of RMWO6 (R = Y, Sm-Tm, M = Cr, Fe, V) family indicate that the spontaneous polarization is due to the magnetic structure specific to the Fe sublattice through magnetoelectric coupling whereas the polarization is independent of the Ho sublattice.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Mg-Co-Zn nanoferrites of composition MgxCo0.5Zn0.5Fe2−xO4 (x = 0.25, 0.5, 0.75 and 1.0) were successfully synthesized by using a citrate precursor method. After synthesis, the samples were examined using different techniques for structural, morphological, electrical and dielectric characterizations. All the samples were found to have single phase spinel cubic structure with Fd-3m space group in the X-ray diffraction spectroscopy (XRD) investigation. The value of average crystallite size ranged from 37 to 47 nm with the increase in Mg ion concentration from x = 0.25 to 1.0. The hopping lengths at tetrahedral and octahedral sites showed an increasing behaviour with increasing magnesium ion concentration. The presence of tensile strain in the samples was confirmed by W-H plots. The dielectric behaviour of the prepared nanoferrites was recorded at room temperature in the frequency range 10 kHz–10 MHz. The real part and imaginary part of the dielectric constant were found to be in the range 3.80–7.93 and 0.0036–0.644 at 1 MHz frequency and the value of loss tangent was 0.00095–0.081 at 1 MHz for the magnesium doped Co-Zn nanoferrites. The value of loss tangent decreased very sharply to remarkably low values at 10 MHz frequency. The dc resistivity value was found very low in the range 3.2 × 108 Ω-cm to 4.0 × 109 Ω-cm for different concentrations of Mg2+ ions in the samples. Due to such low losses at high frequency region and high value of dc resistivity, these materials can be considered as potential candidate for high frequency applications.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Exact calculations are used to study the influence of a further-neighbour spin–spin interaction on a rotating magnetoelectric effect (RME) in a coupled spin–electron model (SEM) on a doubly-decorated square lattice. The special attention is focused on a ground-state analysis and a thermal behaviour at a half-filled case. It was found that the competition between the spin–spin interaction, electron hopping and electric field gives rise to novel spatially (an)isotropic magnetic states, whose frontiers are influenced by a spatial orientation of an applied electric field. It is shown that the thermal stability of spontaneous long-range order can be enhanced by RME, which may result in an enhancement of the critical temperature. The further-neighbour interaction may cause striking thermally-driven reentrant phase transitions.© 2021Growth and magnetic characterization of Fe film on ion-sculpted Ag(0 0 1) substrate have been studied in-situ using reflection high energy electron diffraction and magneto-optical Kerr effect. Fe film is found to grow epitaxially on the Ag surface and exhibits epitaxial island formation up to ∼ 1 nm film thickness. Ion beam sculpting of the substrate surface, prior to the deposition of the Fe film, induces an uniaxial magnetic anisotropy in Fe film, which couples with the cubic four-fold anisotropy of bcc-Fe, lead to the multiple-step jump in magnetic hysteresis loops. Magnetic switching and its correlation with the domain dynamics of the film, as studied by the Kerr microscopy technique, revealed a striking difference in domain structure depending upon the direction of the applied magnetic field with respect to crystallographic direction. It is found that the magnetization reversal takes place via a “single-step jump” mechanism through sweeping of 180° domain walls, whereas the combination of coherent rotation and the sweeping of 90° domain walls is responsible for a “double step jump” magnetization reversal.© 2021The suitability of recycling some industrial wastes (zinc sludge, mill scale, and pellet fine) into valuable zinc ferrite ceramics via solid-state reaction has been investigated. Various properties of zinc ferrites prepared from pure oxides (as reference material) were compared with those prepared from mixtures containing or composed of wastes. The prepared ferrites were characterized using X-ray diffraction (XRD), Fourier-transform infrared characterized (FTIR), Field emission scanning electron microscopy (FESEM), Archimedes method, Vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM), and broadband dielectric spectroscopy (BDS). The results revealed that the highest density (5.05 gm/cm3), highest magnetization (4.8 emu/g), highest dielectric constant, and lowest resistivity (in the studies frequency range) were obtained for ferrite synthesized from pure oxides. However, ferrites synthesized from mixtures containing one waste exhibit physical and magnetic properties similar to those obtained for ferrites synthesized from pure oxides. The occurrences of cation redistribution for all synthesized ferrites confirmed by Rietveld analysis play a key role in the resulting properties. The properties of all synthesized ferrites from physical, chemical, magnetic, and electrical perspectives enable them to be a promising candidate in different electronic applications.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.[CuII(enpnen)]2[MoIV(CN)8]⋅7H2O (enpnen = N,N′ - bis(2- aminoethyl)- 1,3 - propane-diamine) molecular cluster compound (1) was subject to a series of irradiations with the light of 405 nm. On irradiation isothermal magnetization at 1.8 and 5 K in the field range 0–70 kOe as well as magnetic susceptibility in the temperature range of 2–300 K were subsequently detected. Both types of magnetic signals were next analyzed assuming that the irradiation triggers two independent processes: the metal to metal charge transfer (MMCT) leading to a state with the Arrhenius-type relaxation and the spin crossover (SC) transition ending in a state whose relaxation displays a threshold behavior. The first mechanism leads to an electron from the spinless Mo(IV) configuration being transferred to one of the Cu(II) ions transforming the trimer into the state Cu(II)-N-C-Mo(V)-C-N-Cu(I), with spin 1/2 on the Mo(V) ion and the spinless Cu(I) ion. The other mechanism gives rise to an excited paramagnetic Mo(IV)∗ linked to two paramagnetic Cu(II) centers with a possible superexchange interaction. The spin of the excited Mo(IV)∗ species is equal to 1 and associated to a disruption of the 5s-electronic pair. A reasonable result of simultaneous fitting the full series of susceptibility and magnetization data to the model taking into account both mechanisms corroborates their presence.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the electronic and spintronic properties of the five various stacking orders of bilayer MoSeTe, bilayer WSeTe, and MoSeTe/WSeTe van der Waals heterostructure under vertical strain is investigated using the first-principles calculations. It is observed that bilayer WSeTe is the most stable material and AA and AB stack patterns are the most stable configurations. The bandgap of the structures tends to decrease by increasing compressive strain and transition from semiconductor to metal occurs under specific compressive strain. In considered Janus TMD compounds, obvious out-of-plane asymmetry endows intrinsic electric potential difference and induces Rashba type spin-splitting at the Γ-point of valance band. Moreover, vertical strain can considerably improve the Rashba coefficient values in the different stacking patterns. Finally, our results could lead to a full understanding of the electronic and spintronic features of the WSeTe/MoSeTe, bilayer MoSeTe, and bilayer WSeTe compounds for application in spintronic devices.© 2021Current studies have shown that using magnetic field change around the ferromagnetic material to characterize the fatigue damage is very effective, but researches on using metal magnetic memory (MMM) technique to detect fatigue damage are mostly limited to the material level. There are few studies on the mechanism of the magnetic signal change or numerical simulations at the member level. In this paper, cyclic loading tests were carried out on 8 prefabricated concrete composite beam specimens using wet connection technology. The relationship between the variation in the magnetic field of the steel reinforcement and the interface peeling damage of the specimens were investigated. Based on the magnetic flux density, the interface deformation, and the longitudinal bar strain, the mechanism of the magnetic signal change in different stages as well as interface peeling's effect on the magnetic flux density were revealed. The feasibility of using the MMM field to characterize the fatigue damage of the composite spcimens was thus verified. Meanwhile, based on the modified J-A-S model, the model for magnetization change of prefabricated reinforced concrete components was established. By comparing the experimental and the simulation results, it is verified that the proposed model could effectively describe the magnetization change trend of the composite spcimens during the fatigue process.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The ceramic technique has been utilized to fabricate Sr0.95Y0.05Fe12-xZrxO19 (x = 0–2) samples. Structural and Raman-scattering analyses have revealed that the samples with x = 0 and 0.5 possess the M−type hexagonal-ferrite phase, while the others have the additional Zr-related phase. All samples exhibit the hard-magnetic behavior and the magnetic parameters tend to decrease with increasing Zr-doping content. The study on the electric polarization has indicated that the sample with x = 0 shows the coexistence of paraelectric and weak ferroelectric behaviors, while the other samples (x = 0.5–2) show conductive behaviour with nearly circular loops. The changes in the magnetic and electrical properties mainly related to the co-presence of Fe2+ and Fe3+ ions, as evidenced from analyzing X-ray absorption data.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The hysteresis modeling of ferromagnetic materials in electrical equipment is one of the basic theoretical studies in the field of electrical engineering. Long training time and poor accuracy are the main challenges of the traditional hysteresis models. In this paper, a Hybrid Intelligent Hysteresis Model (HIHM) is proposed by combining the hysteresis operator space theory and Deep Belief Networks-Deep Neural Network (DBN-DNN) algorithm. The Preisach Fusion Operator (PFO) is constructed by fusing multiple traditional Preisach operators with coefficients satisfying the Gaussian distribution. And multiple PFOs are used to construct an operator space to create the high-dimensional operator data. By the operator space, the nonlinear hysteresis relationship in the hysteresis data is transformed into a nonlinear mapping between the operator data and the output of the model. The DBN-DNN model is used to characterize this nonlinear mapping. The structure of the HIHM is determined by taking the output of the operator space as the input of the DBN model. The generation of first-order turn curve proves that the model has certain practicality. In addition, the validity and generalization of this model is verified through the simulation with experimental data of non-orientation (NO) silicon steel B35A210 at quasi-static frequency.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We studied the propagation of elastic waves in a two-dimensional (2D) magnetorheological elastomers phononic crystals (MREs-PnCs) plate with a double-sided stubbed that can be tunable by an external magnetic field. The dispersion relations and the transmission properties of the perfect MREs-PnCs and defect MREs-PnCs are numerically calculated by the using finite element method under different magnetic fields. Good agreement was also observed in the experiment results. The results shown that with the increase of the applied magnetic field, the complete band gap of the MREs-PnCs plate gradually widens and moves to the high-order frequency region. In addition, with the introduction of defect modes, defect bands appear in the dispersion relation, and the elastic waves with specific frequencies are located at the point or line defects. This work makes up for the insufficiency of experimental research in related fields and provides a good design basis for MRE-PnCs structures in the future.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Deposition of alloy films with a well-controlled concentration gradient obtained by co-sputtering from two magnetron sources is studied experimentally and compared with numerical calculations. This method was used together with a linearly moving shutter to fabricate sperimagnetic Co-Tb alloy films with mutually orthogonal concentration and thickness gradients. Using magnetooptical measurements it was demonstrated that, for thicknesses below 10 nm, the compensation concentration (ccomp) shifts towards higher Tb content as the thickness of the Co-Tb film is reduced. Results for Co-Tb alloy films are compared with those for (Tb/Co)RN multilayers with various repetition numbers (RN). For both sample types, the ccomp decreases in a similar way with increasing total film thickness. Thus, the decrease of ccomp with increasing total thickness (either of alloy films or of multilayers) can be considered a universal behavior.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of Ho1-xDyxAl2 compounds with x=0,0.05,0.10,0.15,0.25 and 0.50, modelled using a Hamiltonian that includes the exchange interactions between Ho-Dy, Ho-Ho and Dy-Dy ions in addition to the crystalline electric field and the Zeeman effects, have been compared with those determined experimentally. In order to reproduce experimentally observed global ferromagnetic ordering temperatures and spin reorientation transition temperatures as xDy varies, the exchange interactions between Ho-Dy and Ho-Ho were set as free parameters and adjusted to match the experimental results. We demonstrate that heat capacity of polycrystalline materials in non-zero magnetic fields can be satisfactory reproduced by using the average of multiple magnetic field directions with respect to the crystallographic coordinate system, while reasonably good agreement between experimentally determined and theoretically predicted magnetocaloric effects can be achieved considering an average of only three field directions.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Inducing and manipulating the magnetism in ZnO monolayer is crucial for both fundamental study and practical applications. Herein, the effects of Co adatoms and charge injection on the electronic and magnetic properties of ZnO monolayer are studied by the first-principles calculations. The results reveal that the most stable configuration for Co1/ZnO monolayer is the one that Co is located on the top of O atom. As the numbers of Co atoms increase, the arrangement of Co atoms on the monolayer may change from linear to plane structure, and finally convert to tetrahedral structure. Furthermore, Con/ZnO monolayers (n = 1, 2, 3, 4) have superior electron behavior in comparison with pristine ZnO monolayer. With an increase in the Co cluster size, the work functions of Con/ZnO monolayers are decreased gradually. The characteristics of Con/ZnO monolayers change from semiconducting to semi-metallic state, but remain magnetic behavior. Moreover, the total magnetic moments of Con/ZnO monolayers are increased from 3.548 µB to 6.521 µB with increasing the Co content. Besides, the changes of Co-3d states are responsible for the tunable the magnetic moment in Co1/ZnO monolayer by the charge injection. These results are helpful to improve the understandings of electronic and magnetic behavior of Con/ZnO monolayers and broaden the valuable potential for the design of spintronic nano-devices.© 2021We propose novel spin-valve-like van der Waals heterostructures, in where one nonmagnetic buckled honeycomb monolayer intercalates two insulating ferromagnets. By switching the relative orientation of magnetic moments in two ferromagnets from antiparallel to parallel arrangement, semiconductor-to-metal transition yields owing to a strong magnetic proximity effect. Based on first-principles calculations, we have tested the feasibility of this model. Twelve heterostructures are investigated and seven in them show the desired semiconductor-to-metal transition. Especially, the CrI3/Ge/CrI3 heterostructure exhibits the biggest opening gap on the value of 0.31 eV among all heterostructures. Using a simple tight-binding model and the perturbation theory, we have revealed that such magnetic-order-dependent semiconductor-to-metal transition originates from the spin splitting induced by the strong magnetic proximity effect. We find an appreciable strength of magnetic proximity is crucial for achieving the semiconductor-to-metal transition, via closing the bandgap only for the parallel arrangement but remaining the antiparallel arrangement to be semiconductive. The presented heterostructures enable reversible and nonvolatile control of semiconductor-to-metal transition and are of giant potential in low-consumption and nonvolatile logic and memory devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, hydrocarbon based ferrofluids of cobalt substituted magnetite (Fe3O4) having the composition CoxFe3-xO4 (0.0≤x≤ 0.3 in steps of 0.1) were prepared using co-precipitation method, with oleic acid as the surfactant. The structural, microstructural and magnetic studies were carried out using X-ray diffraction (XRD), Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR), Field emission scanning electron microscope (FESEM), Vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) and Electron spin resonance spectroscopy (ESR). It is aimed to investigate the role of incorporation of high anisotropy cobalt on the structural and magnetic properties of the basic system. The X-ray diffraction pattern and Rietveld refinement confirm the inverse spinel structure of magnetite with space group Fd-3 m. Residual lattice strain was estimated using Williamson-Hall plot. FESEM depicts the presence of spherical nanoparticles with average size 15 nm to 16 nm. Saturation magnetization values recorded using VSM was found to decrease with Co2+ substitution with negligible remanence and coercivity confirming the superparamagnetic behaviour of the ferrofluids. The peak-to-peak line width (ΔHpp), g-factor and the resonant magnetic field (Hr) were calculated from ESR measurement. The spin resonance characteristics reveal an increase in the ΔHpp and g-value and a decrease in Hr with increase of Co2+ content. Spin-lattice and spin–spin relaxation time were calculated and analysed to interpret the relaxation mechanism taking place in the ferrofluids. Based on the results of these characterizations and their analysis the investigated ferrofluids may find suitability as potential materials for hyperthermia application and radar absorbing materials respectively.© 2021Low-temperature phase manganese bismuth (LTP-MnBi) was synthesized by low-temperature liquid phase sintering in ultrahigh vacuum at 275, 325 and 375 °C. The magnetic and structural properties of the sintered MnBi powders with two sets of different particle size ranges (<20 μm and 20–53 μm) were studied. It was found that the smaller particles exhibit twice the coercivity (Hc), with approximately 15% lower saturation magnetization, compared to the larger ones. Powder LTP-MnBi with a maximum Hc of 4.98 kOe could be produced at sintering temperature of 325 °C. The elemental depth profile in the MnBi layers at the inside-surface of the cracks in Mn powder particles were measured by using scanning electron microscopy combined with energy dispersive X-ray spectroscopy. MnBi is seeded at cracks through which liquid Bi flows during sintering and grows via diffusion. Variation of the liquid Bi flow rate in cracks results in a distribution of effective diffusion lengths. The diffusion coefficient was estimated from the maximum diffusion length to be 3.47 × 10-14, 7.68 × 10-14 and 15.30 × 10-14 cm2/s at 275, 325 and 375 °C, respectively. The coefficient follows a well-known Arrhenius equation with the pre-exponential factor of 5.33 × 10-10 cm2/s and activation energy of 0.45 eV.© 2021Magnetic anisotropy of Permalloy (Py) antidot square lattice was investigated by torquemetry method using Rotation Magneto-Optic Kerr Effect (ROTMOKE). We find that there exists a field-dependent 4-fold magnetic anisotropy with the easy magnetization axis along the [11] axis of the antidot square lattice. In addition, there also exists an artifact of a uniaxial magnetic anisotropy in ROTMOKE result. We show that both results are due to the period wiggling of the magnetization in space which was confirmed by magnetic imaging using magnetic transmission soft x-ray microscopy (MTXM). Micromagnetic simulation from MuMax3 supports the wiggling structure of the magnetization, as well as reproduces ROTMOKE result. A simplified model was developed based on the periodic wiggling of the magnetization and successfully explored the physical origin of the field-dependent 4-fold anisotropy and the artifact of the uniaxial anisotropy.© 2021Diluted magnetic semiconductor (DMSs) multiferroics offer intriguing possibilities and potential for spintronic applications due to the incorporation of magnetic ions in semiconducting lattice. Ferroelectric α-GeTe based multiferroics doped with a magnetic element provide an appropriate playground to explore entanglement of magnetic order and spin–orbit coupling in one system. In this work, we present systematic studies of ferroelectric GeTe based Ge1-x-y(SnxMny)Te crystals grown in the range 0.182 ≤ x ≤ 0.184 and 0.027 ≤ y ≤ 0.061, focused over their magnetic, magnetotransport and ferroelectric properties. Here we report Ge1-x-y(SnxMny)Te multiferroic and the studies of dominant magnetic exchange interactions. The ferroelectric phase transition was examined as a function of the chemical composition of Sn and Mn concentration. The different magnetometric methods revealed that Ge1-x-y(Sn0.183Mn0.047)Te crystal exhibits a spin-glass like magnetic ordering at a freezing temperature (TF) of about 5.3 K. Similar to the χAC(T) cusp, the spin-glass like crystal displays an anomaly in coercivity near its freezing temperature. The carrier concentration as function of temperature demonstrated anomalous Hall effect (AHE), consistent with the low temperature magnetically ordered state in the studied crystals.© 2021Using SQUID magnetometry and ferromagnetic resonance we show that the intrinsic ferromagnetism in graphene oxide (GO) is related to the zigzag edges created by breaking GO layers in the process of exfoliation. The 1D magnetic order existing below 2 K is destroyed by spin fluctuations enhanced by spin-flip transitions of the magnetic moments of protons from hydroxyl groups. Dipole-dipole interactions between short ordered segments at zigzag edges result in superferromagnetism below 65 – 75 K and superparamagnetism at higher temperatures. The strong ferromagnetism is observed for GO flakes in vacuum while the weak residual ferromagnetism of GO paper is due to magnetic moments surviving in the closed pores.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In order to study the magnetic properties and giant magnetoimpedance (GMI) effect of FINEMET/IGZO composite ribbons. A series of ZnGaInO4 film (IGZO) with different thickness (t) were deposited by RF magnetron sputtering from targets of nominally identical compositions onto Fe-based nanocrystalline ribbon. The results of hysteresis loops show that the FINEMET/IGZO composite ribbons has good soft magnetic properties, and the GMI ratio of the composite ribbons are enhanced. The GMI ratio of FINEMET/IGZO composite ribbons increases at first and then decreases with the increase of IGZO layer thickness (0 ∼ 200 nm). This result was attributed to the relative contribution of electromagnetic interaction and stress interaction between IGZO coating layer and FINEMET ribbon. These results provide a method for improving the GMI effect in composite ribbons, optimizing the GMI effect of semiconductor materials and exploring new GMI magnetic sensors compatible with semiconductor electronics.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Laminar heterostructures composed by materials with different ferroic properties have been proposed for the control of magnetism with an applied voltage. We present here a study of the structural and magnetic properties of chemically disordered FePt ferromagnetic films of different thicknesses that have been sputter-deposited on ferroelectric PMN-PT (011) single crystals. By means of static and dynamic magnetic measurements we have found that it is possible to switch the magnetization easy axis by 90° if an electric field is applied in a direction perpendicular to the film plane. Using ferromagnetic resonance techniques we have estimated the strain induced magnetoelectric coupling of the FePt/PMN-PT heterostructure, obtaining ME=477(15) Oe m/MV for FePt thicknesses greater than 26 nm, which corresponds to an average magnetoelastic constant B=−13.2(1.1) MJ/m3. The associated saturation magnetostriction was estimated in λs∼90 ppm. Films thinner than 26 nm present corresponding values that are smaller by approximately 20%. A possible explanation for this difference is the well known transition from planar to stripe-like magnetic domains that occurs in FePt around this film thickness. However, this thickness dependence of ME is relatively smaller than that found in other ferromagnets such as Fe or FeGa, which makes FePt a potential candidate for thin film applications in magnetoelectronic devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Some errors exist in the above paper.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Ferromagnetic materials are widely used for magnetic cores in electromagnetic devices such as inductors, transformers, generators, and motors. In a magnetic core, as the magnetic field varies with time, core loss is generated due to magnetic hysteresis and eddy currents. For performance analysis and design optimization of electromagnetic devices, it is essential to model the dynamic magnetization processes and associated core losses accurately. This paper proposes a hybrid model of dynamic magnetic hysteresis, which incorporates the effects of both hysteresis and eddy currents, by combining the dynamic Jiles-Atherton and Preisach models based on backpropagation neural networks. This model can accurately reproduce the dynamic hysteresis loops and core losses under different excitations. The numerical simulations are verified by experimental measurements.© 2021 The Author(s)This article reviews information on arrays of cylindrical magnetic nanowires grown electrochemically inside ordered nanoporous alumina membranes, summarizing some of the most relevant aspects about the advanced synthesis of nanowires and their overall static and microwave magnetic properties. The electrochemical details for the preparation of templates with well-defined hexagonal ordering are addressed focusing on the different anodization methods including mild, hard, pulsed or anodization of aluminum rods. A section follows on the growth of metallic nanowires, either as single element (i.e., Fe, Ni, Co), alloys (i.e., CoFe, CoNi, FeNi) or modulated in composition (i.e., Ferromagnetic/Metal). The static magnetic properties as anisotropy, coercivity and magnetostatic interactions are overviewed with particular emphasis on the influence of magnetocrystalline anisotropy and on the temperature dependence of those properties. The last section is devoted to the ferromagnetic resonance of nanowire arrays of different composition. The dependence of microwave absorption on the orientation of applied field is also a useful tool to determine the magnetic anisotropy parameters and the significance of magnetostatic interactions. The magnetization easy axis can be switched from the nanowire direction to the plane of the membrane as the nanowire filling factor increases or at a compensation temperature, in both cases it derives from the energetic balance of anisotropy and magnetostatic interactions among nanowires. A final subsection is devoted to the spin waves resonance spectra, and the perspectives of applications making use of microwave properties. We expect the article can be useful for researchers interested on the topic and provide a wide overview on the matter to those starting a new research line.© 2021Excellent soft magnetic properties of Co-based metallic glasses (MGs) can be achieved by appropriate annealing treatments. In this study, the Co66Fe6Si13B15 MG was annealed by direct current (DC) with densities ranging from 67 to 333 A/mm2 for varied periods of time. The magnetic properties of both the as-prepared and annealed samples were compared, which were further correlated with microstructure evolution. When the current density is lower than 167 A/mm2, the magnetization increases from 43 emu/g for the as-prepared state to over 60 emu/g for the annealed samples, and the coercivity sharply declined due to the stress release and structural relaxation caused by current annealing. Increasing current density leads to the formation of nanocrystalline particles of the size smaller than 5 nm, and the magnetic properties of the composite material further improve, which could be interpreted in terms of the random anisotropy model. The best soft magnetic performance with Ms of 72 emu/g and Hc of 4 Oe was obtained in the sample after annealed with a current density of 217 A/mm2 for 60 s. Larger grains result in the deterioration of magnetic properties once the current density exceeds 233 A/mm2. The results also imply that high-density but short-time current annealing can realize more efficient and precise treatment with respect to industrial application.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We investigate a spin-wave (SW) self-focusing in a ferromagnetic FePd thin film with a perpendicular magnetic anisotropy by using micro-magnetic simulation. In a one-dimensional structure, a point-excitation of forward volume magnetostatic waves leads the SW propagation in the form of a wave packet. When SWs are excited over a wide area with a uniform amplitude distribution, the SW propagation occurs by taking not only a diverging component but also a focusing-like component. Interestingly, we can increase the focusing effect by reflecting the diverging waves at the magnetic phase boundary, such as domain walls. This SW focusing appears also in a two-dimensional system, and, furthermore, magnetic droplets can be easily formed at the focal points when the focused SW intensity exceeds an appropriate threshold. Based on these results, we can propose the flat-top excitation of the magnetostatic waves as an efficient way to generate the SW self-focusing and also to create magnetic droplets in a multi-domain state of perpendicularly magnetized systems.© 2021 The AuthorsStudies of the dynamical response of thin-film composites of magnetic nanoparticles embedded in dielectric matrices to the oscillatory magnetic field of the microwave-frequency range are performed using numerical simulations. Four soft-magnetic systems; (Co)0.42(MgF2)0.58, (Fe65Co35)0.57(SiO2)0.43, (Fe65Co35)0.75(Al2O3)0.25, (Fe65Co35)0.6(Al2O3)0.4, typical of a class of ”high-frequency ferromagnetic nanocomposites” are simulated. The necessary micromagnetic parameters are extracted from data within the model of random magnetic anisotropy (RMA). Those materials are candidates for use in micro-converters of power (inductors and transformers) due to their high saturation magnetization, high resistivity, and absence of intra-grain magnetic domains. Thus, they are able to create a high magnetic flux at low power losses. The simulations allow for an inspection into details of the spatial distribution of the oscillating magnetization. We predict noticeable differences in the ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) in different composites which are related to the shape of the static hysteresis. Operating ranges of the driving-field amplitude are related to the hysteresis width. Next to FMR, we analyze the magnetic response via the oscillatory motion of domain walls in a longitudinal field. Besides the response to the alternating field of a constant direction, we study the magnetization dynamics driven by in-the-plane-rotating field. Such a field can drive the magnetization rotations which are a strong-response (nonlinear) mode potentially useful for efficient power conversion.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The spin–glass behavior in the ferromagnetic phase of Tm2Cu2In was investigated by dc–, ac–magnetization, and non-equilibrium dynamics characterizations. An argon arc–melted polycrystalline sample of the compound of Tm2Cu2In was found to adopt the Mo2FeB2–type tetragonal structure (space group P4/mbm). The temperature variation of dc–magnetization exhibits a ferromagnetic behavior with Curie temperature TC = 32.5 K. The zero field cooled (ZFC) and field cooled (FC) magnetic curves show the thermomagnetic irreversible behavior below TC. The field dependence of irreversible temperature follows the Almeida–Thouless line. The frequency and ac–driven field dependent anomalies in ac–susceptibility results indicate the existence of a spin–glass state in Tm2Cu2In. The time dependence of magnetization further supports the spin–glass behavior observed in Tm2Cu2In. The frequency dependence of the freezing temperature in the real part of ac–susceptibility has been analyzed on the basis of a power–law divergence and Vogel–Fulcher law. The obtained results reveal that Tm2Cu2In belongs to the ferromagnetic canonical spin–glass class of compounds.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Here we propose a method of the excitation of perpendicular standing spin waves (PSSWs) of different orders in an optomagnonic microcavity by ultrashort laser pulses. The microcavity is formed by a magnetic dielectric film surrounded by dielectric non-magnetic Bragg mirrors. Optical cavity modes in the magnetic layer provide concentration and strongly non-uniform distribution of the optical power over the layer thickness and therefore induce the effective field of the inverse Faraday effect also spatially non-uniform. It results in excitation of PSSWs. PSSWs whose wavevector is closest to the wavevector characterizing distribution of the inverse Faraday effect field are excited most efficiently. Consequently, a key advantage of this approach is a selectivity of the PSSW excitation which allows to launch PSSWs of required orders only. All-optical operation of the optomagnonic cavities opens new possibilities for their applications for quantum technologies.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this study, the effect of injection speed on the capture efficiency (CE) of nanoparticles under the influence of a magnetic field produced by a current-carrying wire is investigated. Three scenarios have been considered for the geometry of stenosis: (1) symmetrical stenosis, (2) upper wall stenosis, and (3) lower wall stenosis. The non-Newtonian behavior of blood has been modeled using the Carreau model. The effect of different parameters, including magnetic field, drag force, particle diameter, injection speed, blood velocity, and the shape of stenosis on the CE of nanoparticles, is investigated. Considering the injection speed along with non-Newtonian model in a vessel with stenosis is not addressed yet, and are investigated in the present study. The results show that blood velocity and particle diameter have a significant effect on the CE of nanoparticles. Besides, it was revealed that there is a threshold for current intensity (I = 0.009A). At the threshold, CE of nanoparticles is maximum (27.5%), and further increase in current intensity resulting in a dramatic reduction in CE. In all scenarios, as the injection speed increases, the CE of nanoparticles decreased. For example, for scenario 3, as the injection speed increased from 75 mm/s to 200 mm/s, the CE of nanoparticles reduced from 25% to 7.5%, respectively. Besides, for same injection speed, for example 75 mm/s, the CE of scenarios 1, 2, and 3 are 3%, 22.5%, and 25%, respectively. The upper wall stenosis is desired scenario in which the maximum carrier particles are captured at tumor site.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The effect of nanocrystallite size on crystal structure and magnetic properties of off-stoichiometric Ni1.8Mn1.2Sn Heusler alloy has been investigated. XRD (X-Ray Diffraction) and HRTEM (High-Resolution Transmission Electron Microscopy) analysis revealed the presence of both the full Heusler (Ni2MnSn) L21 and inverse Heusler (Mn2NiSn) XA crystal symmetries. Hence, the sample can be treated as a natural composite of both phases. However, the magnetic analysis reveals that the magnetization does not follow a linear relationship with the volume fraction of the individual phases. Rather, the antiferromagnetic coupling between the two phases may be responsible for lowering the net magnetization. On the other hand, magnetization value further decreases for ball-milled sample (nanocrystallite size). Critical magnetic behavior analysis reveals that the magnetic ordering in bulk sample follows mean field theory, and for nanocrystalline sample, the magnetic ordering is a short-range type.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Oxide coated nanocomposite NiO@FeNiMo with core–shell structure were fabricated by plasma arc-discharging and oxidative heat treatment method. By optimizing the impedance matching, the absorbing properties of the oxide coated core–shell NiO@FeNiMo were improved significantly. By varying the coating thickness from 1.0 ∼ 5.0 mm, the reflectivity of less than −10 dB, in the frequency range of 4–17 GHz, was obtained in NiO@FeNiMo nanocomposites oxidized at 473 and 498 K. The minimum reflectivity of −54.0 dB at 12.8 GHz (d = 1.47 mm) was achieved by oxidizing the sample at 473 K. The oxide coated core–shell NiO@FeNiMo absorber reported in this paper have the potential be a powerful candidate for microwave absorbing materials for its excellent absorption, simple preparation process, and high stability in complex environments.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.An extended magnetic-stress coupling model based on energy conservation law was established for ferromagnetic materials in low-intensity magnetic fields to develop the metal magnetic memory (MMM) technique, and its application was quantitatively analyzed using the finite element method. Firstly, the verification of the proposed model was given by comparing the influences of stress on relative permeability and residual magnetic field (RMF) signals with experimental data and other theoretical model. Then, the effect of the defect type, size, load magnitude, and lift-off value on the RMF signals was respectively discussed, and their sensitivities on the total characteristic parameter of RMF gradients were compared. In addition, the combined influence of the lift-off value and the defect depth was analyzed. The results indicate that the proposed magneto-stress coupling model is feasible to predict the stress state and structure damage using the MMM technique.© 2021The effect of the native defects on the spin polarization and the antiferromagnetic state of Co3O4 was investigated using the first-principles calculations. The results reveal that the AFM ground state of Co3O4 is changed to a ferromagnetic state by introducing one OCo antisite defect at the A/B site, while O vacancy can induce the highest spin polarization and most stable AFM state. The interactions between two O vacancies with different distances are all AFM interactions and the strength of AFM interaction is strongest at the distance of 2.85 Å. The theoretical investigation suggests an effective route to improve the spin polarization and stability of AFM state by defect engineering, promoting the applications of Co3O4 in antiferromagnetic spintronics.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A series of samarium doped cobalt ferrites with the nominal compositions of CoSmxFe2−xO4 (where x = 0, 0.02, 0.04, and 0.06 at.%) was synthesized using sol–gel auto-combustion method. The crystal structure, morphology and magnetic properties of the nanoparticles have been investigated. The XRD data analyzed by the MAUD program confirmed the successful substitution of Fe3+ by Sm3+cations in the unit cell of the cobalt ferrite lattice. The formation of nanosized spinel ferrites was confirmed by FESEM and FTIR analysis. The values of saturation magnetization (MS) decreased from 76 emu/g to 63 emu/g by increasing the Sm content from x = 0 to x = 0.06 at room temperature, whereas at 10 K, the decreasing tendency of MS was much weaker. The reduction of temperature from 300 to 10 K caused a remarkable growth of both the saturation magnetization and coercive field (HC). The coercivity of the sample with x = 0.06 at 10 K is strongly higher than the one at the room temperature. The influence of samarium ions and temperature-dependent magnetic response of CoFe2O4 nanoparticles was studied and their effect was discussed in terms of the geometrical proportions and magnetic anisotropy evolutions. The Sm doped cobalt ferrite is a suitable candidate for moderate permanent magnets and high density information storage, especially when in use at low temperatures.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Due to 100% spin polarization, half-metallic systems play a great role in the development of nanoscale spintronic devices. We conduct extensive calculations within spin-polarized density functional theory to design a newtpye two-dimensional Cr2O3 monolayer. The monolayer demonstrates robust stability as verified by formation energy, phonon spectrum, elastic constants, and molecular dynamics simulation. Each Cr2O3 unit cell gives rise to a total magnetic moment of 6.0 μB, mainly resulting from Cr sites due to the cooperation between crystal-field effect and Hund's exchange. The monolayer is identified as a half-metallic ferromagnet with Curie temperature up to 460 K and 100% spin polarization. The super-exchange mechanism and direct exchange interaction are responsible for the ferromagnetic coupling. Moreover, the system shows large magnetic anisotropy with the easy axis in the basal plane. The excellent stability, half-metallicity, high Curie temperature, and magnetic anisotropy endow the monolayer with great potential in spintronic devices. This work provides a new pathway for designing ferromagnetic material with half-metallicity and high Curie temperature.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Ferromagnet/superconductor heterostructures allow for the combination of unique physical phenomena offered by the both fields of magnetism and superconductivity. It was shown recently that spin waves can be efficiently scattered in such structures by a lattice of static or moving magnetic flux quanta (Abrikosov vortices), resulting in bandgaps in the spin-wave spectra. Here, we realize a nonreciprocal motion of a vortex lattice in nanoengineered symmetric and asymmetric pinning landscapes and investigate the non-reciprocal scattering of magnons on fluxons. We demonstrate that the magnon bandgap frequencies can be tuned by the application of a low-dissipative transport current and by its polarity reversal. Furthermore, we exploit the rectifying (vortex diode or ratchet) effect by the application of a 100MHz-frequency ac current to deliberately realize bandgap up- or downshifts during one ac halfwave while keeping the bandgap frequency constant during the other ac halfwave. The investigated phenomena allow for the realization of energy-efficient hybrid magnonic devices, such as microwave filters with an ultra-high bandgap tunability of 10GHz/mA and a fast modulation of the transmission characteristics on the 10ns time scale.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The reversal of domain walls (DWs) drift direction in (1 1 0) iron garnet plate with shape anisotropy with an increase of the amplitude of an alternating harmonic magnetic field was established experimentally. The harmonic magnetic field H = H0sin(2πft) (f = 3–1000 Hz, H0 up to 2.2⋅104 A/m) was applied perpendicular to the plane of the sample. The DW drift velocities and intensities of nucleation centers of magnetic dislocations (MDs) were measured. It is proposed that the reason for the reversal of direction of the DW drift is a change of direction of the gradient of demagnetizing fields in the sample with an increase of the external field amplitude. The change in configuration of an internal magnetic field is indicated by the experimentally established change in the activity of MD nucleation centers with the increase of the external field amplitude. A model is proposed in which direction and speed of DW drift are determined by magnetic field gradient in the sample.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We use the time-dependent Gutzwiller approximation for the single-band Hubbard model to analyze the non-equilibrium dynamics for stripe ground states. In particular, we are interested in the interplay between spin and charge dynamics which is analyzed by quenching the system either in the charge or spin sector. This allows us to investigate the coupled relaxation dynamics as a function of the supplied energy. Further insight is provided by mapping the Gutzwiller dynamics onto a time-dependent Landau approach which lacks the double occupancy contribution to the time-evolution but allows to tune the coupling between spin- and charge degrees of freedom.© 2021The presence of unexpected metal fragments is of major concern to some manufacturing lines, such as foodstuff and pharmaceutical products. Conventional coil metal detectors only have capability of detecting, which cannot localize metal pieces precisely. This paper presents an advanced metal detection system based on tunneling magnetoresistance (TMR) sensors array. To achieve the function of metal localization, the system is designed to contain 16 TMR sensors. Meanwhile, considering the electromagnetic interference (EMI) from manufacturing environment, the system is also integrated with matched filtering technique, which can eliminate EMI greatly. Experimental results demonstrate that such novel metal detection system can sense the metal particle with 1-mm diameter as the belt running in regular speed. Moreover, it can localize the metal particle with the spatial resolution of 3 cm.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the heavy ions irradiation effect on the spin transfer torque film stacks with perpendicular magnetic anisotropy. Samples are exposed to 175 MeV Cl ion and 235 MeV Ge ion at the fluence of 1x105 ions/cm2 and 1x106 ions/cm2. Measurements of magnetization vs. magnetic field are performed on the film stacks before and after irradiation. The results exhibit that magnetic properties of free layer (CoFeB) in the spin transfer torque film keeps unchanged while magnetic properties of the synthetic antiferromagnet layer (Co/Pt) and the ferromagnetic exchange coupling between reference layer (CoFeB) and synthetic antiferromagnet layer through W layer have changed significantly when the fluence of the two kinds of ions reach 1x106 ions/cm2. We analysis the irradiation damage of the film stacks by SRIM simulation and give a reasonable explanation for this phenomenon. Thus, our work demonstrates that perpendicular spin transfer torque MRAM technology itself, the memory element construction, is subject to damage from heavy ions irradiation.© 2021In this work, the electronic properties of the buckled III–V monolayers are compared with and without spin–orbit coupling, and the effects of spin–orbit coupling (SOC) on the electrical properties are investigated. The effective mass, deformation potential, and mobility for both states are studied, and the amount of spin correction is obtained where SOC correction is great for heavy compounds. In addition, the SOC causes the band splitting in the valence band and the spin splitting in both conduction and valence bands. The correlation of the band and spin splitting with different power of atomic numbers has been investigated. We find that the band splitting has a high correlation with the atomic number of group-V elements, while the spin splitting with the sum of the atomic number of the two elements shows a high correlation.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (DMI) is at the heart of many modern developments in the research field of spintronics. DMI is known to generate noncollinear magnetic textures, and can take two forms in antiferromagnets: homogeneous or inter-sublattice, leading to small, canted moments and inhomogeneous or intra-sublattice, leading to formation of chiral structures. In this work, we first determine the strength of the effective field created by the DMI, using SQUID based magnetometry and transport measurements, in thin films of the antiferromagnetic iron oxide hematite, α-Fe2O3. We demonstrate that DMI additionally introduces reconfigurability in the long distance magnon transport in these films under different orientations of a magnetic field. This arises as a hysteresis centred around the easy-axis direction for an external field rotated in opposing directions whose width decreases with increasing magnetic field as the Zeeman energy competes with the effective field created by the DMI.© 2021 The Author(s)The effect of hydrostatic pressure on magnetic entropy change in a magnetic field, ΔSm, in Fe7Se8 single crystals is determined. The application of hydrostatic pressure shifts the spin–reorientation transition temperature, TSRT, to lower temperatures, similar to the action of a magnetic field applied perpendicularly to the c-axis. The magnetization of Fe7Se8 in a field parallel to the c-axis monotonically decreases under increasing pressure. ΔSm and the refrigeration capacity of investigated crystals strongly depend on TSRT and thus on hydrostatic pressure. Experimental results are described in the frame of a one-ion model of magnetic anisotropy.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The paper presents the soft magnetic composites consisting of iron particles with smoothed surfaces, coated by the two-layer insulation of SiO2 and Ni-Zn/Cu-Zn soft ferrite nano-sized grains with different content, which were prepared by the combination of wet (Stöber method) & dry (mechanofusion) particle coating process, followed by the high-pressure compaction. The total, differential and complex permeability were analysed and the energy losses were separated into DC, classical and excess losses as a function of frequency and into high and low induction losses as a function of magnetic induction. The thorough analysis of the magnetic properties as well as of the structure and electrical properties revealed the optimum ferrite content and proved the multipurpose effect of the insulation, serving as: (1) the insulator for iron particles minimizing eddy currents in composite, (2) the interparticle air gaps filler reducing inner demagnetizing fields, and (3) the magnetically active component for the magnetic flux continuity in composite material. There was a visible improvement of magnetic permeability and energy loss reduction in sample with 10 % of incorporated ferrite, i.e., the low ferrite content improved the magnetic behavior by effective coupling of Fe particles.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Some of the synthesis methods and physical properties of iron oxide-based magnetic nanoparticles such as Fe3-xO4 and CoxFe3-xO4 are reviewed because of their interest in health, environmental applications, and ultra-high density magnetic recording. Unlike high crystalline quality nanoparticles larger than a few nanometers that show bulk-like magnetic and electronic properties, nanostructures with increasing structural defects yield a progressive worsening of their general performance due to frozen magnetic disorder and local breaking of their crystalline symmetry. Thus, it is shown that single-crystal, monophasic nanoparticles do not exhibit significant surface or finite-size effects, such as spin canting, reduced saturation magnetization, high closure magnetic fields, hysteresis loop shift, or dead magnetic layer, features which are mostly associated with crystallographic-defective systems. Besides, the key role of the nanoparticle coating, surface anisotropy, and inter-particle interactions are discussed. Finally, the results of some single particle techniques -magnetic force microscopy, X-ray photoemission electron microscopy, and electron magnetic chiral dichroism- that allow studying individual nanoparticles down to sub-nanometer resolution with element, valence, and magnetic selectivity, are presented. All in all, the intimate, fundamental correlation of the nanostructure (crystalline, chemical, magnetic…) to the physical properties of the nanoparticles is ascertained.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The paper presents novel soft magnetic composite materials composed of iron coated by Ni-Zn/Cu-Zn soft ferrite powder using dry particle coating route, without any other non-magnetic insulation. High-pressure compaction was applied to achieve relatively low porosity and sufficiently high density of composites. Structure documentation indicated optimal insulation of iron particles by the ferrite, which was confirmed by magnetic, electrical and thermal properties evaluation. Relatively high frequency and DC bias stability of the permeability was found together with its relatively high values, as the ferrite was involved in magnetization process improving magnetic flux continuity. Sufficiently high specific electrical resistivity ensured also relatively low power losses at elevated frequencies. Proportions of reversible and irreversible magnetization processes were analysed by means of high and low induction loss separation and differential, reversible and irreversible permeability measurement. The investigation of thermal diffusivity revealed the heat transfer rate capability of composites and also confirmed good insulation of iron by ferrite powder. The properties were reached better compared to the ones of iron-based composites with non-magnetic matrix and competitive with those found in current literature, indicating the successful preparation of pure iron-ferrite composites by means of the use of progressive eco-friendly and cost-effective production techniques.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, thulium iron garnet (Tm3Fe5O12 – TmIG (20 nm)/Tungsten(W)(t) bilayers, sputtered on top of gadolinium gallium garnet (1 1 1) substrate, were used to investigate spin pumping (SP) line broadening mechanism in Ferromagnetic Resonance (FMR). The TmIG, films prior and after tungsten cap layer deposition, were investigated employing FMR and X-ray diffraction techniques. The TmIG films showed (1 1 1) orientation and perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA). Due to the interface TmIG/W, when the TmIG magnetization is in resonance a spin current is pumped out the TmIG into the W layer, increasing the damping of the magnetization. Measuring the out-of-plane angular dependence of the FMR resonance field and linewidth, we were able to obtain solely the SP contribution to the line broadening, filtering Gilbert, mosaicity, and two magnon scattering mechanisms.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Dielectric composite shows potential in the field of electromagnetic wave (EMW) absorption. Hence, we designed and synthesized ZnO/C@PPy, by calcining ZIF-8 and coating polypyrrole. It was studied emphatically the effects of calcination temperature and the amount of pyrrole coating on the EMW absorption capacity and permittivity of ZnO/C@PPy. With the increase of temperature and amount of pyrrole and its permittivity enhance significantly. Z700@P4 (ZIF-8 was calcined at 700 0C and pyrrole amount was 0.4 mL/0.1 g ZnO/C) shows the optimal performace with minimum reflection loss (RLmin) of −76.31 dB at 14.85 GHz and the effective absorption bandwidth (RL < -10 dB) of 6.38 GHz, covering the whole Ku-band. We believe this study can provide a new idea for dielectric EMW absorber.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Iron (Fe) doped ZnSe (ZnSe:Fe) microspheres with different doping concentration were prepared by simple solvothermal process. XRD, Raman scattering and SEM results indicated that doping of Fe ions does not change the structure and morphology of ZnSe host. The increase of a-axis lattice parameters and redshift of Raman peaks confirmed the successful incorporation of Fe ions, and XPS results showed that the doped iron is in Fe2+ state. ICP-AES results revealed that the real concentration of Fe incorporated into ZnSe lattice was much lower than the original doping concentration, which is possibly subject to the low solubility of Fe ions in ZnSe host lattice. Optical characterizations showed that increasing Fe concentration would lead to more defects in the host lattice. The magnetic characterizations of ZnSe:Fe microspheres reveal transition from ferromagnetism to superparamagnetism. The transition temperature increases as the increase of doping concentration. Further, these microspheres show a weak room-temperature ferromagnetic exchange interaction was observed by field-dependent magnetization. No evidence of diamagnetism or spin glass state was found in Fe-doped ZnSe microspheres. Due to the lower doping concentration, the dopants could not be expected to cluster or to form inclusions, therefore the observed magnetic behavior is believed to be arising from the random substitution of Fe ions and their magnetic exchange interaction with the delocalized carriers in the ZnSe host.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The oil-based Nd-Fe-B sludge waste was directly recycled to single-phase Nd2Fe14B powders via the combination of purification and modified Ca-reduction reaction method. The impurities and organics in the purified Nd-Fe-B sludge waste were greatly reduced, reducing calcium consumption in the subsequent reduction and diffusion (RD) process, thereby reducing the cost. By further optimizing the Ca-reduction diffusion parameters, especially the mass ratio of CaCl2 and KCl, where the liquid CaCl2, along with the gaseous KCl provide conditions for sufficient and uniform Ca-reduction reaction, high-property Nd-Fe-B magnetic powders with good dispersion, uniform particle sizes, and excellent orientation, were successfully obtained. Using the mixed diffusion medium of CaCl2 and KCl with a mass ratio of 1:1, the room-temperature magnetization of the recycled Nd-Fe-B powders was increased to 157 emu/g at 3 T-magnetic field, which was about 28 % higher than that of the original sludge. The contents of carbon, hydrogen, and oxygen in the recycled magnetic powders were significantly reduced from 6.8, 1.8, and 5.9 wt% to 0.1, 0.19, and 0.56 wt%, respectively. In addition, the uniform grain size with X50 = 3.6 μm and good distribution greatly improved the orientation, which can be beneficial to the preparation of the bonded or sintered Nd-Fe-B-based magnets. The reasons that CaCl2-KCl mixed diffusion medium can lead to well-dispersed, uniform recycled powder with high magnetization arise from a combination of factors for improving the liquid phase reaction environment and the gaseous KCl to prevent agglomeration and inhibit particles merging or growth.© 2021A skyrmion in a nanodisk with a single free layer (Single-layer Skyrmion) can be excited by the spin-polarized current to a steady state of circular motion for high-frequency applications. However, limited by the threshold of the driving current owning to the skyrmion Hall effect (SkHE), the maximum frequency of the skyrmion oscillation is usually 1 ∼ 3 GHz. In this work, the dynamics of skyrmions in the nanodisk with two antiferromagnetic-coupled free layers (Bilayer-skyrmions) are investigated. Our simulations show that the maximum frequency of Bilayer-skyrmions can be increased up to above 10 GHz, about one order of magnitude larger than that of Single-layer Skyrmion because of the disappearance of the SkHE in the antiferromagnetic-coupled system. In addition, it is found that the oscillation frequency of Bilayer-skyrmions linearly increases with the current density. Finally, spin-torque nano-oscillators based on multiple pairs of Bilayer-skyrmions are further demonstrated to increase the frequency limit up to 36.5 GHz. Our results may be useful for the design and applications of current-induced skyrmion-based oscillators for ultrahigh-frequency applications.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In the present work, the structural, magnetic properties and barocaloric effects of the (MnCoGe)0.96-(CuCoSn)0.04 alloy were investigated. At an ultra-low pressure of 0.3 kbar, the isothermal entropy change of 20 J∙kg−1K−1 and adiabatic temperature change of 3.4 K can be obtained, performing a low-pressure-driven large barocaloric effect. The transition temperature shifts with pressure are as high as −8.8 K∙kbar−1 and −11.8 K∙kbar−1 for forward and reverse transformations, respectively. Such a promising barocaloric performance is mainly attributed to the large entropy change of structural transformation and large volume expansion as high as 3.9%.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The FePd/FINEMET/FePd composite ribbons with sandwich structure were designed by magnetron sputtering. The morphology, magnetic properties and asymmetric giant magneto-impedance (AGMI) effect of FePd/FINEMET/FePd composite ribbons show that the sandwich structure can significantly improve the GMI effect of FINEMET ribbon with a homogeneous structure. Results have demonstrated that the magnetic dipole interaction between the FePd layer and the FINEMET ribbon makes the FePd/FINEMET/FePd composite ribbons obtain a larger GMI effect at low frequencies. The maximum GMI ratio of FePd/FINEMET/FePd composite ribbons reaches 51 %, which is 2.2 times that of bare FINEMET ribbon. The asymmetry degree of GMI curves is up to 85 %. It has the ability to significantly enhance the GMI effect, linearity and reduced the characteristic frequency of composite materials. The experimental results can be explained by the magnetic dipole interaction model. It is a profound significance in the development of a magnetic sensor that can increase the GMI ratio and the linearity.© 2021In order to obtain enhanced permeability and electromagnetic noise suppression at low frequency, microwave absorbing composites with oriented large flaky sendust particles are proposed. Large sendust particles with an averaged aspect ratio of more than 100 that is twice the existing value are obtained by a simple sieving method, which are found to have almost equivalent saturation magnetization (Ms) but lower coercivity (Hc) with respect to other small-size particles because of increased shape anisotropy. The improvement in magnetic permeability by large particles at low frequencies is slight but can be greatly promoted by orientation of the particles using a blade coating method due to the maximum shape anisotropy effect. Consequently, the bandwidth that has power loss ratio of electromagnetic noise suppression more than 90% extends its lower boundary from 2.2 GHz to 1.3 GHz. This work not only provides a simple solution to low frequency noise suppression, but also reveals the effectiveness of further increasing particle size of flaky absorbents on improving magnetic permeability in the assistance of particle orientation.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) play an important role in biomedical applications including imaging modalities such as magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and magnetic particle imaging (MPI). The latter one exploits the non-linear magnetization response of a large ensemble of magnetic nanoparticles to magnetic fields which allows determining the spatial distribution of the MNP concentration from measured voltage signals. The image-to-voltage mapping is linear and described by a system matrix. Currently, modeling the voltage signals of large ensembles of MNPs in an MPI environment is not yet accurately possible, especially for liquid tracers in multi-dimensional magnetic excitation fields. As an immediate consequence, the system matrix is still obtained in a time consuming calibration procedure. While the ferrofluidic case can be seen as the typical setting, more recently immobilized and potentially oriented MNPs have received considerable attention. By aligning the particles magnetic easy axis during immobilization one can encode the angle of the particle's magnetic easy axis into the magnetization response providing a relevant benchmark system for model-based approaches. In this work we address the modeling problem for immobilized and oriented MNPs in the context of MPI. We investigate a model-based approach where the magnetization response is simulated by a Néel rotation model for the particle's magnetic moments and the ensemble magnetization is obtained by solving a Fokker–Planck equation approach. Since the parameters of the model are a-priori unknown, we investigate different methods for performing a parameter identification and discuss two different models: One where a single function vector is used from the space spanned by the model parameters and another where a superposition of function vectors is considered. We show that our model can much more accurately reproduce the orientation dependent signal response when compared to the equilibrium model, which marks the current state-of-the-art for model-based system matrix simulations in MPI.© 2021The magnetic state, including the stray fields, of a chiral pattern of interacting permalloy nanomagnets is studied using off-axis electron holography in the transmission electron microscope. The projected in-plane magnetisation of the nanomagnets is reconstructed from the experimental magnetic phase shift using model-based iterative reconstruction. The thickness and chemical composition of the nanomagnets are characterised in cross-sectional geometry. The average value of the magnetic polarisation of the permalloy through the thickness of the sample is measured to be 0.73 T. This value is lower than the bulk value of 1 T, likely as a result of a combination of the microstructure, composition and possible oxidation of the nanomagnets. The experimental results are compared to micromagnetic simulations to confirm the magnetic states and to understand the switching processes in the magnetic nanoislands.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Understanding and mastering the magnetic properties of domain walls in cylindrical nanowires is a fundamental pillar for developing novel 3D information technologies. For this purpose, a good comprehension of domain wall (DW) dynamical properties, which are strongly dependent on its type and size, is needed. In this work, by means of micromagnetic simulations, we focus on the accurate determination of DW types (transverse, vortex-antivortex, and the Bloch point) and DW widths and present a state diagram as a function of the diameter and the nanowire material. Using different initial states and trajectories we find a large region of metastability where the Bloch-point domain wall co-exists with either transverse or a more energetical vortex-antivortex one. We determine the domain wall width and its dependence on the nanowire diameter either for the transverse or the vortex-antivortex domain wall showing that it is always larger than the nanowire diameter. We also find simple expressions for the DW widths and the critical diameter for the transition between different DW types which agree well with direct simulations. Our results are useful for the experimental design of cylindrical nanowires for multiple applications.© 2021Suffering low frequency and small amplitude shaking, energy dissipation of long overhanding structures on the spacecraft under weightless environment is a key research topic for the safety of such spacecraft. The paper presented a novel magnetic fluid shock absorber to reduce the vibration of low frequency and small amplitude. The proposed shock absorber had the composite magnet structure including three magnets in the working element and it was attached with different inner surface materials. To the best of our knowledge, this was the first time to consider the relationship between inner surface materials and damping performance of the shock absorber. First, the damping performance of the shock absorber with various magnetic fluid volume percentage and gap size was investigated by reducing the free oscillations of the brass plate. Meanwhile, the magnetic restoring force between the working element and the repulsion magnet was measured. The experimental results showed that the magnetic restoring force versus the distance was almost linear, under small amplitude. When the distance was greater than 20 mm, the approximate calculation formula of the equivalent stiffness could be obtained. We analyzed the influence of the different internal surface materials of the shock absorber on the damping performance by calculating the fluid resistance which was determined by both the viscous shear force and the capillary force. Experimental results verified that the capillary force had a significant influence on fluid resistance and couldn't be ignored. In terms of the vibration decay time, the damping efficiency of chemigum was 61.39% and 57.87% better than that of fluororubber for the gap of 2 mm and 3 mm respectively. According to the logarithmic decay rate, the damping efficiency of chemigum was 2.965 times that of fluororubber under the gap of 2 mm and was 2.515 times under the gap of 3 mm. For the reason that the shock absorber was used in aerospace, weight was an important factor. Our experiments proved that we must take into account both the densities of materials and the damping performance when selecting inner surface materials.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.CoMnSi exhibits weak mechanical performance and a low magnetostriction in polycrystals, which limits its potential magnetostrictive properties. Herein, we reported that a large reversible magnetostriction up to 1500 ppm in an oriented CoMnSi microspheres/epoxy resin composite. Textured CoMnSi microspheres (50–70 μm) were prepared in our designed nonwetting annealing method by dispersing the crushed particles into solid dispersions and melting them into spheres in a nonwetting environment. Facilitated by the spherical morphology, the <0kl> -oriented CoMnSi microspheres/epoxy resin composites with high volume fraction were produced in a 5 kOe uniform magnetic field. The uniform orientation and the high volume fraction of CoMnSi microspheres contribute to the large magnetostriction of CoMnSi composite. This work may provide a promising universal preparation method for spherical particles of intermetallic compounds and path a novel approach to optimizing property for magnetic material composites.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Seamless steel cylinders are widely used in real-life situations, and heat treatment has an important effect on their service life. The common methods used for heat treatment quality monitoring have many shortcomings, such as destructive operation, high cost and low coverage. To quickly and accurately evaluate the performance of the cylinder after heat treatment, a fast non-destructive testing method is introduced based on the coercive force measurement. The amount of residual stress for 35CrMo steel cylinder before and after heat treatment was evaluated quantitatively by the Metal Magnetic Memory technique, and the structural-mechanical dependence of coercive force was also revealed. Due to the grain refinement and the stress relief, the modified magnetic field index △H and k(x)of 35CrMo steel after heat treated are significantly decreased by 54% and 56%, respectively. Correspondingly, the magnetic coercive force is inversely proportional to the grain size, which is verified by hardness test. The structural-mechanical states of 35CrMo steel cylinder can be justified by measuring their coercive force, which is potential to be used as a reliable, accurate and non-destructive tool for mass production.© 2021 The AuthorsThe close-packed AB2 structures called Laves phases constitute the largest group of intermetallic compounds. In this paper we computationally investigated the pseudo-binary Laves phase system Y1−xGdx(Fe1−yCoy)2 spanning between the YFe2, YCo2, GdFe2, and GdCo2 vertices. While the vast majority of the Y1−xGdx(Fe1−yCoy)2 phase diagram is the ferrimagnetic phase, YCo2 along with a narrow range of concentrations around it is the paramagnetic phase. We presented results obtained by Monte Carlo simulations of the Heisenberg model with parameters derived from first-principles calculations. For calculations we used the Uppsala atomistic spin dynamics (UppASD) code together with the spin-polarized relativistic Korringa–Kohn–Rostoker (SPR-KKR) code. From first principles we calculated the magnetic moments and exchange integrals for the considered pseudo-binary system, together with spin-polarized densities of states for boundary compositions. Furthermore, we showed how the compensation point with the effective zero total moment depends on the concentration in the considered ferrimagnetic phases. However, the main result of our study was the determination of the Curie temperature dependence for the system Y1−xGdx(Fe1−yCoy)2. Except for the paramagnetic region around YCo2, the predicted temperatures were in good qualitative and quantitative agreement with experimental results, which confirmed the ability of the method to predict magnetic transition temperatures for systems containing up to three different magnetic elements (Fe, Co, and Gd) simultaneously. For the Y(Fe1−yCoy)2 and Gd(Fe1−yCoy)2 systems our calculations matched the experimentally-confirmed Slater–Pauling-like behavior of TC dependence on the Co concentration. For the Y1−xGdxFe2 system we obtained, also in agreement with the experiment, a linear dependence of TC on the Gd concentration. In addition, on the example of Y0.8Gd0.2Co2 ferrimagnet, we showed the possibility of predicting the non-trivial behavior of the temperature dependence of magnetization, confirmed by comparison with previous measurement results.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A SmFe12-nXn permanent magnet requires the formation of a suitable grain boundary phase in the microstructure. In this study, Cu and Ag were selected as the major components of the grain boundary phase, and phase equilibria involving the SmFe11Ti phase were investigated. The wettability behavior of the molten grain boundary phase on SmFe11Ti was studied based on this investigation. In the phase equilibria investigation for Fe–Ti–Sm–M (M = Cu, Ag), SmFe11Ti equilibrated Cu-41 mol% Sm and Ag-44 mol% Sm at 1273 K in Cu and Ag systems, respectively. During study of the wetting behavior, molten Cu-41 mol% Sm alloy that equilibrates with SmFe11Ti exhibited good wettability on the SmFe11Ti substrate, with a final contact angle of 8° at 1133 K. The molten Ag-44 mol% Sm alloy that equilibrates with SmFe11Ti also exhibited good wettability, with a final contact angle of less than 1° at 1273 K. Although the damage to the SmFe11Ti substrate by Ag-44 mol% Sm alloy seemed smaller, the difference in the damage to the substrate could not be evaluated between Cu-41 mol% Sm alloy and Ag-44 mol% Sm alloy because the Ag-44 mol% alloy wetted the entire substrate and flowed down through the lateral side of the substrate.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The domain wall (DW) random switching in planar magnetic nanowires is one of the crucial problems for storage data applications. Hence, a micromagnetic simulation was used to investigate the transverse domain wall (TDW) nucleation in the thinner and narrower nanomagnetic devices and the vortex domain wall (VDW) nucleation for the thicker and wider nanowires due to the device temperature. The TDW thermal creation was examined based on magnetic properties such as uniaxial magnetic anisotropy energy (Ku) and saturation magnetization (Ms). The thermal stability of TDW switching in nanowires is strongly dependent on the improvement of magnetic properties, whereas the TDW thermal nucleation decreases by increasing Ku or Ms. In addition, the TDW and VDW thermal creation in storage nanodevices such as nanowires could be controlled by nanowire geometry manipulation like width and thickness. Reducing the nanowire width or increasing its thickness helps both domain wall types (TDW and VDW) switching to be more stable against nanodevice temperature. TDW thermal switching was found to be stable under a device temperature of up to 500 K, which is higher than the room temperature. However, the VDW shows higher thermal stability switching reaches up to 900 k, which are good candidates for storage applications. Furthermore, the TDW dynamics in nanowires were affected by device temperature, whereas the TDW moves faster by increasing nanodevice temperature. All these findings will help to maintain the storage memory in nanodevices from failure due to device temperature.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Nano-crystalline, CeCr1−xFexO3 (x = 0 and 0.05) compounds synthesized by a facile nitrate-solution combustion method are crystallized in orthorhombic, Pnma structure. Reitveld refinement of diffraction patterns reveal an expansion of lattice parameter and lattice volume after the substitution of Fe. Structural analysis evidences an increase in distortion in orthorhombic structure due to bending of Cr-O6 octahedra which is a sheer consequence of the lattice expansion. The optical band gap decreases from 2.9 to 2.6 eV due to the increase in particle size and decrease in strain after Fe substitution estimated from Williamson-Hall analysis. Besides the decrease in Neel temperature from 260 to 253 K after Fe incorporation, temperature-dependent magnetization exhibits some peculiar features such as compensation temperature, Tcomp, and spin reorientation temperature, TSR. While TSR enhances from 15 to 30 K, we observe two Tcomp at 13 and 110 K for x = 0.05 in contrast to only one Tcomp at 61 K for the pristine phase. Moreover, we for the first time demonstrate a stable switching behavior of magnetization by varying the external field in the same direction. The increase in Tcomp and TSR along with a decrease in band gap from 2.9 eV to 2.6 eV makes this material suitable for bipolar magnetic switching and photocatalytic applications.© 2021 The Author(s)The synthesis of Dysprosium (Dy3+) doped cobalt ferrite nanoparticles CoFe2−xDyxO4 (x = 0.00, 0.02, 0.04, 0.06, 0.08) via solgel auto-combustion route was introduced. To improve the grinding process of the synthesized nano-powders, a new grinding technique (ultrasonic wet-grinding) was applied alongside the traditional grinding technique (manual dry-grinding), and the effects on the structural, morphological, and magnetic properties were investigated. The formation of face centered cubic spinel ferrite was confirmed by X-ray diffraction studies. The crystallites size was decreased with increasing Dy3+ concentration. Bulk density is increased considerably by ∼150 % and porosity is decreased by ∼11% due to ultrasonic wet-grinding technique for sample when x = 0.06. Transmission Electron Microscopy and Scanning Electron Microscopy were used to study the morphological properties. The Dy3+ doping and ultrasonic-grinding technique also resulted in a narrower grain size distribution. Pureness and the presence of constituent elements Co, Fe, Dy, and O were confirmed by energy dispersive X-ray spectra. Due to sonication, the Dy weight percent increased by 78.26 % for (x = 0.04). The two dominant absorption bands (υ1 and υ2) in FTIR spectra are related to tetrahedral and octahedral sites, respectively. The value of υ1 and υ2 for manual dry-grinded powders was almost stable while they fluctuated for ultrasonic wet-grinded powders. A Vibrating Sample Magnetometer (VSM) was used to examine the magnetic properties at room temperature. The maximum coercivity obtained in manual dry-grinded powder when (x = 0.02) and the minimum saturation magnetization obtained in ultrasonic wet-grinded powder when (x = 0.08).© 2021 Elsevier B.V.To solve the sensitivity of soft magnetic properties of Fe-B-P-C-Cu alloy system without transition metal addition on heat treatment process parameters, the effect of P content on the heat treatment process parameters and soft magnetic properties of Fe83B12-xPxC4Cu1 (x = 3, 5 and 7) alloys have been investigated. It is found that increasing P can effectively reduce the sensitivity of microstructure and soft magnetic properties on the annealing holding time (th). The th of Fe83B7P5C4Cu1 and Fe83B5P7C4Cu1 alloys can be extended to 60 min compared to the th of 6 min for Fe83B9P3C4Cu1 alloy to obtain a low coercivity (Hc) below 8.5 A/m. However, too high P content will reduce the stability of residual amorphous phase and shorten the optimal th. The results indicate that increase of P can also reduce the sensitivity of microstructure and soft magnetic properties on the heating rate (β). The β of Fe83B7P5C4Cu1 and Fe83B5P7C4Cu1 alloys can be as low as 40 K/min and 20 K/min to obtain high saturation magnetic flux density (Bs) of 1.80 T and 1.73 T, and low Hc of 8.4 A/m and 8.1 A/m, respectively.© 2021The paper proposed a mutual inductive magnetic sensor composed of a pair of parallel winding spiral coplanar coils sandwiched by soft magnetic ribbons. Because the layout of coils is in a single individual layer, the gap between the magnetic ribbons up and down is decreased compared with the previous multilayer laminated magnetic sensor. Therefore, the magnetic leakage is ameliorated, and the electromagnetic coupling between the coils and ribbons is strengthened, which in turn enhances the sensitivity. The magnetic sensor can provide a sensitivity of 5.73 mV/Oe at an excitation frequency of 500 kHz, exhibiting an enhancement of 5 times relative to the multilayer laminated sensor. In addition, the resolution of the magnetic sensor is 0.18 nT. More importantly, the structure is particularly suitable for micromachining, providing the possibility for manufacturing high-performance micro-magnetic sensors with simpler planar technology.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The ultrasonic attenuation and velocity variations are theoretically investigated near the Curie temperature of ferromagnet under an application of magnetic field. The temperature, frequency and magnetic field dependence of acoustic properties of ferromagnet near a critical point is given. A parametric representation is used to describe a crossover from asymptotic critical behaviour to classical regime far away from the critical point. The crossover scaling functions are determined for sound attenuation coefficient and dispersion. We compare the proposed crossover model with experimental ultrasonic data for manganese phosphide MnP and find good agreement between theory and experiment.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the electronic structure and magnetic properties of the Mn-Al alloys with different Mn and Al concentrations in the β-Mn-type structure have been theoretically investigated. The structural stability of different types of aluminum and manganese atoms occupations of the 12d and 8c site positions are compared. For the Mn3Al with 5Al in the 12d positions we obtained the most energetically preferable arrangement of Mn and Al ions in this alloy. Further occupation of this type of position by the Al atoms might be responsible for the lower effective magnetic moment estimated from the experimental data. Our theoretical calculations demonstrate the complex character of the magnetic properties and electronic structure of the Mn-Al alloys.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This paper proposes a magnetoelectric (ME) energy harvester employing a ME transducer array to capture mechanical energy from low-frequency vibrations and human walking. The use of the double-ring Halbach array helps to enhance the magnetic flux density in the air gap where the ME transducer array is placed. Consequently, larger magnetic field variations are induced on the ME transducer array and more mechanical energy can be converted into electrical energy. A theoretical model is developed and verified by experiments under sinusoidal excitations. The experimental results show that the harvester exhibits broad 3 dB bandwidths for sweep-up and sweep-down conditions. A 3 dB bandwidth of 4.1 Hz is obtained at the acceleration of 0.3 g, indicating that he harvester can operate in a broad bandwidth. The harvester can produce a maximal power of 0.667 mW across an optimal resistive load of 1.52MΩ at 0.3 g. Moreover, the feasibility of the harvester under human-walking induced excitations is experimentally validated at the speed of 3–8 km/h, and the results demonstrate the potential application of the proposed ME energy harvester in powering portable electronic devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanocomposites consisting of ferrite nanoparticles and magnetic metals have been of interest for use in power electronic components due to their ability to achieve relatively high magnetic permeabilities while also having low losses. Unfortunately, fabrication challenges limit the maximum achievable thickness of these films to ∼ 4 µm, though thicker films are desirable for increased power handling. To overcome these challenges this works seeks to demonstrate a fabrication method whereby thick composite films can be made by constructing sequential composite layers, performing electrophoretic deposition and electro-infiltration steps for each layer. Composite samples of iron oxide nanoparticles electro-infiltrated with nickel that are 1, 3, 5, 7, and 10 layers thick will be fabricated and characterized both structurally and magnetically. Structural measurements accomplished with SEM show that each layer appears to contribute 4 µm to the total thickness, with the one layer sample being 3.99 ± 0.12 µm thick and the ten layer sample being 39.19 ± 3.1 µm thick. Results show that the dc magnetic properties of these composites stay constant as thickness increases, having an average magnetic saturation of 464 kA/m, and coercivity of 2.5 kA/m. The ac magnetic properties similarly showed that the permeability of the composites also stayed consistent at 20. However, the dimensional resonance frequency of the composites decreased as thickness increased, lowering to ∼ 96 MHz for 1 layer (∼4 µm) to ∼ 8 MHz for 10 layers (∼40 µm), revealing a trade-off between thickness of a maximum operating frequency.© 2021 The AuthorsWe present a theoretical description of the spin accumulation effect in metallic Fermi leads on the Kondo effect in the quantum dot attached to those. It has been shown that the spin accumulation by breaking the spin symmetry leads to the suppression of the Kondo effect in some cases. In order to better understand the observed effects, we analyze the spin currents in the system, depending on the spin accumulation of the electrodes, for both symmetrical and anti-symmetrical configuration of spin accumulation. We demonstrate that in the absence of the Kondo resonance splitting the suppression of the Kondo effect is related to the presence of the non-equilibrium spin current in the system.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Ground-state phase diagrams and magnetization curves of a spin-1 Heisenberg diamond cluster with two different coupling constants and uniaxial single-ion anisotropy are investigated in a presence of the external magnetic field with the help of exact diagonalization methods. It is shown that the spin-1 Heisenberg diamond cluster exhibits several remarkable quantum ground states, which are manifested in zero- and low-temperature magnetization curves as intermediate plateaus at one-quarter, one-half and three-quarters of the saturation magnetization. It is found that the width of the fractional magnetization plateaus depends basically on a relative strength of the coupling constants as well as uniaxial single-ion anisotropy, which may substantially shrink or even cause full breakdown of some intermediate magnetization plateaus. It is evidenced that a relatively weak uniaxial single-ion anisotropy of the easy-axis type considerably improves a theoretical fit of low-temperature magnetization curves of the tetranuclear nickel complex [Ni4 (μ-CO3)2(aetpy)8](ClO4)4 in a low-field region without spoiling the previous fit based on the fully isotropic Heisenberg model in a high-field region.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Powders of Sm(Fe,Co)11.2Ti0.8 alloys modified with Sc, Nb and Zr, as well as with additional Ti were prepared by reducing mechanically activated raw oxides with Ca metal in the furnace preheated to 990–1250 °C. Expansion of the crystal lattice upon introduction of Nb or additional Ti implies that atoms of these elements replace the smaller Fe atoms in the tetragonal ThMn12-type structure. On the other hand, contraction of the lattice upon introduction of Sc or Zr was smaller than what was expected for replacement of the Sm atoms, which suggests that the Sc and Zr atoms replace both the Sm and Fe atoms. Washing away the reduction byproducts expands the crystal lattice of the 1:12 particles and increases their coercivity. The lattice expansion associated with the washing is believed to be caused by interstitial H atoms; more research, however, is needed to establish the mechanism(s) of the washing effect on the coercivity. The earlier reported development of a high coercivity in zirconium-modified monocrystalline particles achieved by increasing the reduction annealing temperature to ≈1200 °C was similarly characteristic of the particles modified with Sc (the coercivity reaches 11.5 kOe) and Nb (8.1 kOe), but not for the particles prepared with additional Ti where the maximum coercivity of 8.3 kOe develops for a lower annealing temperature. It is concluded that Sc, Nb and Zr modify the high-temperature phase equilibria of the Sm(Fe,Co)11.2Ti0.8 alloys allowing for an effective high-temperature processing, whereas the alloy coercivity increases with the synthesis temperature through a different, still unknown mechanism which may involve suppression of the defects specific to the 1:12 crystals.© 2021The ability to create submicron/nanoscale patterns with magnetic alloys at low cost is difficult. Here, we demonstrate a method to create such patterns using Fe40Co35P10C10B5 metallic glass thin films. The viscous workability of a metallic glass thin film was used to make patterns with dimensions up to ~100 nm using the nanoimprinting technique, and the effects of the patterning on the magnetic properties of the metallic glass thin films were investigated. An increase in the out-of-plane coercivity (~380 Oe) and remanent magnetization (Mr = ~12% of the saturation magnetization, Ms) were observed for amorphous thin films patterned with a high density of nano-dots. This effect was observed because of changes to the magnetic shape anisotropy induced by the nano-imprinting. Two events of magnetization reversal were confirmed in the crystalline films of the same alloy. The reversal of magnetization under the low magnetic field of ~100 Oe corresponds to soft magnetic phases, whereas that at 2400 Oe corresponds to the hard magnetic phase. Recoil curve measurements suggest that the average magnetization-switching field of hard magnetic grains in the film was between 2800 and 3600 Oe. Based on our experimental results and analysis, we suspect the presence of tetragonal Fe–Co hard/semihard magnetic phase in crystalline thin films. We believe that the low-cost and large-area micro- to nanoscale patterning ability of the present magnetic thin films are promising for the development of various magnetic MEMS and memory devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work effect of Nd-deficient, Nd0.67-x⎕xBa0.33MnO3 (x = 0.05–0.23) compounds are synthesised via solid state reaction method. X-ray diffraction patterns confirm that all the compounds upto x = 0.1 are crystallised into a single phase orthorhombic crystal symmetry with Imma space group whereas some additional impurities such as Nd2Ba1Mn2O7 and Mn3O4 phases are witnessed for the x > 0.1 compositions. The obtained unit cell volume is found to increase with the increase of Nd-deficiency (x) due to the evolution of Mn2+ ions at the expense of Mn3+/Mn4+ ions as corroborated with the X-ray photoelectron spectra studies. Magnetic data suggest that the ferromagnetic (FM) to paramagnetic (PM) transition is found to decrease systematically with the increase of x, but without any measurable decrease in their magnetization values. Again, the low temperature magnetic ordering of Nd3+ ions below 25 K does not affect with the x. The magnetic properties are explained based on the multiple Double Exchange interactions. Electrical resistivity (ρ(T)) data indicates a clear metal–semiconductor transition (Tp) at 113 K and a maximum value of MR% is obtained at Tp for all compounds. ρ(T) is described with various theoretical models, with reasonable fits at the FM-metallic region, whereas the variable range hopping mechanism is well explained in the PM region.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, CuxFe1-xFe2O4 (x = 0, 0.3, 0.5, 0.7, and 1) powders were synthesized via plasma arc discharge process. The structure and morphology were investigated using X-ray diffraction and field emission scanning electron microscope techniques, respectively, which confirm that a nanostructured spinel-type oxide is achieved in all cases. The magnetic properties, including saturation magnetization (Ms), coercivity (Hc), remanence ratio(Mr/Ms), and effective anisotropy constant (Keff), were derived from magnetic hysteresis loops at room temperature using a vibrating sample magnetometer. The results indicate that the best combination of Ms (≈105 emu/g), Hc (≈30 Oe), Mr/Ms (≈0.034), and Keff (≈1.6 × 103 erg/g) is obtained near the middle composition range of CuxFe1−xFe2O4 (i.e., at x = 0.3 and 0.5). In addition, CuFe2O4 ferrite manifests a noticeable saturation magnetization of 88.35 emu/g compared with that reported for the same compound in the literature, which can be ascribed to the presence of Cu2+ ions in the tetrahedral sites of the spinel lattice.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The physical behaviour of a magnetic material can be characterized by Jiles-Atherton (J-A) model where some model parameters are generally identified by optimization techniques. For identification of model parameters using optimization techniques, an error criterion based on the error between the measured and calculated magnetic flux density (B) or magnetic field strength (H) is commonly considered where the relative error in the calculation of iron loss is ignored. Consequently, the calculated iron loss from B-H loop sometimes highly differs from its experimental value. In this paper, the error criteria for J-A model's parameter identification are designed as the combination of the relative iron loss error criterion and the general existing error criterion. Furthermore, a modified J-A model is proposed to improve the agreement between experimental and calculated results especially at the low magnetic induction levels by introducing a scaling factor in the anhysteretic magnetization. The proposed modified J-A model and the effectiveness of the error criteria for its parameter identification are tested by comparing calculated results with the experimental results as well as recently works in the literature.© 2021 The Author(s)Layered organic-inorganic hybrid perovskites have been the focus of much research regarding their optoelectronic and multiferroic properties. Here, we demonstrate the presence of a large magnetocaloric effect in the ferromagnetic layered perovskite phenylmethylammonium copper chloride ((PMA)2CuCl4) below the Curie temperature of ∼9.5 K. We measure a magnetic entropy change ranging from 0.88 J/kg.K to 2.98 J/kg.K in applied fields of 10 kOe and 70 kOe, respectively. We also study the nature of the magnetic phase transition using critical isotherm analysis. The critical exponents are consistent with the 2D-XY spin model.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The influence of alloying in Ni54Fe19Ga23X4 Heusler glass-coated microwires doped by X = B, Al, Ga, In is presented in this work. Even though the alloys exhibit different chemical compositions, the valence electron concentration (e/a) was constant. Furthermore, basic magnetic and resistivity measurements have been performed to determine the chemical doping effect on the magnetic properties and the associated structural transformation. Results point to the fact that the fine-tuning of the chemical composition may be a suitable tool for adjusting the Curie temperature, transformation temperature, and magnetocaloric properties of the glass-coated microwires. In the case of Ga and the Al-doped alloy, a thermal hysteresis can be distinguished in the M(T) dependences at saturation magnetic field, pointing to the presence of the structural transformation. Moreover, the 4% Al doping shifts the structural transformation temperature and the Curie temperature almost to the same position. On the other hand, B and In doping may lead to the disappearance or shift of the structural transformation out of the measurement range (100–400 K). Resistivity measurements proved these results.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic imaging with nanometer resolution is becoming important because the magnetization configuration within magnetic materials has to be controllable to that resolution in order to have an impact on various fields of technology, from low-energy computing to carbon-free transportation. Three recent topics in magnetic imaging research using ultra-high-voltage, cold-field-emission transmission electron microscopes are described in this paper: (1) determination of the local magnetic induction field (B-Field) distribution within CoFeB/Ta multilayers at 0.67-nm spatial resolution by applying a spherical aberration correction and using a pulse magnetization system, (2) three-dimensional B-Field mapping within a pillar containing a stack of Fe/Cr/Fe disks analyzed by electron holographic tomography, and (3) in-situ observation of nucleation and propagation of reverse domains within a Nd-Fe-B permanent magnet by using a magnetizing holder capable of applying a 0.5 T in-plane field.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Three natural specimens of hematite are characterized using X-ray diffraction, magnetometry, IR/Raman and Mössbauer spectroscopy, with focus on the Morin transition. All are exfoliated by grinding and prolonged sonication in dimethylformamide, followed by centrifuging to extract exfoliated debris from the supernatant. This material is characterized by electron microscopy and atomic force microscopy. There are three main Fe2O3 constituents: lamellae that are hundreds of nanometers in diameter and typically 1–10 nm thick, nanoparticles that are about 100 nm in size and ultra-fine nanoparticles smaller than 10 nm. Estimated yield of the lamellae is 10−3−10−4 by volume. All the iron in the debris is antiferromagnetically ordered at room temperature, including 30% that is superparamagnetic and contributes to a quadrupole doublet in the Mössbauer spectrum, but the characteristic weak net moment due to spin canting is absent. Unlike the normal hematite nanoparticles, there is no Morin transition and no net moment in the range of 100 to 300 K. The absence of a net moment is understandable because the lamellae cleave in planes that make small angles with the c-axis.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This work contains a quantum rotor analysis of the bond-charge interaction extended Bose–Hubbard model. Adding extended interactions to bosonic optical lattice models reveals new phases of matter to observe and study. Many-body correlations further widen the scope of possible discoveries. The U(1) quantum rotor method used in this work preserves three-body correlations, uncovering the presence of pair condensation in this model. Phase transitions between the normal state and both single and pair bosonic condensation are examined through the lens of the thermal behavior of the two superfluid order parameters and entropy, as well as the impact of bond-charge interaction on the properties of Bose–Einstein condensation in the presence of many-body correlations. At low temperatures and high densities, bond-charge interaction reinforces coherence, improving the critical temperature of Bose–Einstein condensation. It also exhibits a temperature-independent dissipative influence on the system.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The influence of Co on the crystal structure and magnetic properties of the Ga2−xMnNiCox (x = 0,0.3,0.5,0.7) are investigated in this study. It has been found that the doping of Co does not change the cubic Heusler structure of the parent compound Ga2MnNi. The introduction of a small amount of Co reduces the p-d covalent hybridization effect and decreases the degree of atomic ordering, resulting in an abnormal increase in the lattice parameter when x = 0.3 (from 5.8387 ± 0.0020 Å to 5.8665 ± 0.0012 Å). The atomic size effect plays the main role when x > 0.3, leading to the decrease of lattice parameter. Due to the influence of the lattice parameter and the atomic site occupation on the magnetic interaction, the Curie temperature (TC) and the saturation magnetization are found to decrease at first and then increase with the chemical substitution of Co for Ga. A reentrant spin glass (RSG) below Tf = 65.8 K is confirmed in Ga1.5MnNiCo0.5 alloy due to the competition of ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic interactions.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Challenges still remain in producing room-temperature ferromagnetism/ferrimagnetism in inorganic–organic hybrid compounds. Here, we report the Fe vacancy-doped inorganic–organic (FexSe2)2Fe(dien)2 (dien = diethylenetriamine, x = 0.86) hybrid cuboids by self-assemble of finite one-dimensional (1D) FeSe2 chains and Fe(dien)2 complexes. A growth model is proposed by kinetically controllable syntheses of novel Fe2x+1Se4(dien)2 hybrids. The Rietveld refinement reveals that Fe vacancies in the Fe2.71Se4(dien)2 hybrid cuboids induce large distortions of the FeSe2 chains and the room-temperature lattice parameters are a = 9.225(4) Å, b = 18.021(8) Å and c = 11.609(6) Å. Magnetic measurements and electron spin resonance spectra of the Fe2.71Se4(dien)2 hybrid cuboids show the ferrimagnetism with the Curie temperature (TC) of 600 K and the spin glass state with the freezing temperature (Tf) of 108 K. Impressive room-temperature ferrimagnetic properties of the Fe2.71Se4(dien)2 hybrid cuboids were ascribed to the high concentration of Fe3+ vacancies (0.29 per cell) in the hybrid cuboids, which is supported by the 57Fe Mössbauer spectrum fitting based on the ferrimagnetic model.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic drug targeting (MDT) is a new and effective therapeutic technique to treat some diseases. In this method, the transfer of magnetic particles labeled with therapeutic agents in the presence of a magnetic field increases the efficiency of treatment. In this study, targeted delivery of endothelial cells containing magnetic particles in a stenosed curved artery for solid and elastic wall states was investigated, using an external magnetic field. The Eulerian-Lagrangian approach and the Eulerian-Lagrangian coupled FSI technique were employed to solve the continuum equations and track the trajectory of cells in a rigid and elastic artery, respectively. The influence of parameters was investigated, such as the mass of magnetic particles injected in each cell, the magnetic field strength, the injection time, the occlusion percentage, and the chord length of stenosis on the capture efficiency (CE). The effect of wall elasticity on CE was also studied. The results reveal that by increasing the mass of magnetic particles injected in each cell from 20 pg to 300 pg, the cells absorption at the target site is enhanced from 17% to 43%. Also, a slight increase in the magnetic field strength has a significant effect on increasing the CE. The injection of cells in a complete period of the cardiac cycle provides greater CE than other systole and diastole intervals. Examining the stenosis morphology shows that reducing the occlusion percentage from 40% to 20% and the chord length of stenosis from 70° to 30° results in an increase in the CE about 6% and 3% for 300 pg of magnetic particles in each cell, respectively. The trend of CE changes is the same for elastic artery and the rigid artery. However, in all cases, the elastic artery has a higher CE than the rigid artery. The obtained results can be useful for the treatment of atherosclerosis in curved vessels using targeted cell delivery.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this article the maximal length of a chain of paramagnetic particles with magnetic anisotropy in a rotating magnetic field is studied. The theory of paramagnetic particle chains usually assumes that the particles are magnetically isotropic and do not rotate in a rotating field. In experiments it is seen that spherical paramagnetic particles rotate, which can be explained by small magnetic anisotropy. In this article, the maximal chain length is calculated for paramagnetic particles with magnetic anisotropy in a rotating magnetic field. Results show that the maximal chain length as a function of field frequency has the same trend for isotropic magnetic particles and particles with magnetic anisotropy if the field frequency is much higher or much lower than the critical frequency of an individual particle. Initially randomly distributed particles will form chains that will collide and exchange with particles till they obtain a typical chain length. The typical chain length of a small cluster is shorter than the maximal chain length of an isolated chain for the same field frequency. The distribution of chain lengths in a small cluster of chains is narrower for particles with higher magnetic anisotropy. Due to the narrower distribution of chain lengths, particles with magnetic anisotropy can suit better for mass-production. This article will show how magnetic anisotropy parameters of paramagnetic particles influence chain length of chains which form in a rotating magnetic field.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Procedure of determination of magnetic part of the specific heat of ferromagnetic (FM) solid from the results of the low-temperature measurements is proposed and applied to the number of non-stoichiometric Ni50Mn50-xInx alloys. It is shown that the disregard of magnetic contribution to the specific heat of FM solid results in the noticeable underestimation of Debye temperature and overestimation of the specific heat of electron subsystem of FM solid. The magnetic contribution to the low-temperature specific heat of antiferromagnetic (AFM) solid is negligibly small if Néel temperature exceeds the Debye temperature. In the opposite case the magnetic part of the specific heat of AFM solid may be comparable in value with non-magnetic part, but separation of these parts is an open problem.© 2021 The Author(s)A Pickering emulsion is an emulsion stabilized by solid particles accumulated at the surface of droplets. It is also possible to create a stable Pickering emulsion stabilized by ferromagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles to make it susceptible to magnetic fields. This type of emulsion has received great research interest in recent years because it has generated and holds the promise of a variety of practical applications. One interesting application is magnetic separation in the gradient magnetic field. However, the real-time characterization of magnetic Pickering emulsions, especially under external stimuli such as magnetic fields, is generally challenging. We used a convenient method to control the properties of magnetic particle-stabilized emulsions via the ultrasound technique. In the experiments, we investigated the attenuation of ultrasound using ultrasonic spectroscopy as a function of the magnetic particle concentration and magnetic field intensity. The analysis of ultrasonic waves as a function of frequency provided information about the movement of magnetic Pickering droplets during magnetic separation. The results showed much weaker separation for a low magnetic particles concentration as the magnetic force was not sufficient to induce significant droplets movement, whereas for a high concentration the magnetic separation occurred very dynamically.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We explored robust magnetization dynamics in ferrimagnetic Gdx(FeCo)1−x nanospheres of Gd compositions ranging from x = 0 to 0.44 at finite T = 0 – 1200 K temperatures using two-sublattice atomistic simulations based on the stochastic Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert equation. It was found that the magnetization compensation and angular-momentum compensation temperatures vary remarkably with x and that the former temperature is always lower than the latter. Also, it was found that neither compensation temperature exists below a specific Gd composition of x = 0.22, but above which, both exist and increase with x. The ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) frequency remarkably increases at the angular momentum compensation composition, whereas the FMR frequency does not reach zero at the magnetization compensation composition. The significant difference in the FMR frequency between the two characteristic compensation points is ascribed to the contrasting effective gyromagnetic ratios of Gd and FeCo. Our present atomistic simulation study well reproduced the earlier experimental observations of such dynamic behaviors at both the angular-momentum and magnetization compensation points, which observations cannot be explained by the existing Kittel and Wangsness models. This work provides a better understanding of robust dynamic behaviors of ferrimagnetic nanospheres as functions of temperature and constituent sublattice composition, especially at and near the characteristic compensation points.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.(Sm,Zr)Fe10 and (Sm,Zr)Fe9.5Ti0.5 alloys were obtained by the melt-spinning technique in order to investigate the possibility of producing high-coercivity Sm-Fe alloys without nitrogenation. The (Sm,Zr)Fe10 alloys contained the TbCu7-type and α-Fe phases and exhibited a maximum coercivity of 1.88 kOe in the case of the (Sm0.9Zr0.1)Fe10 ribbon annealed at 1073 K. On the other hand, the (Sm,Zr)Fe9.5Ti0.5 alloys contained the Th2Zn17-type and α-Fe phases and showed a maximum coercivity of 4.5 kOe when the (Sm0.7Zr0.3)Fe9.5Ti0.5 ribbon was annealed at 1173 K.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The formation of core–shell structure is one of the standard methods to improve the corrosion resistance of carbonyl iron powders (CIPs). In this manuscript, epoxy resin (EP) was coated on the surface of flaky carbonyl iron particles (FCIPs) by a simple one-step polymerization method to form the FCIP@EP composite particles, and they were used to obtained microwave response to accurately simulate, predict and optimize the microwave absorption performance of composites. After being coated by epoxy resin, the composite exhibits a higher percolation threshold; the absorbing performance is more stable in an acidic environment. The optimal loading of FCIP@EP in the matrix can be obtained by data-driven optimization, and the model calculation results are in good agreement with the actual measured ones. At 23 vol%, the composite's effective absorption bandwidth (EAB, RL < −10 dB) can reach a maximum of 7.63 GHz at 1.5 mm thickness, and the EAB covers all X-band and all Ku-band at 1.9 mm and 1.4 mm, respectively. The whole optimization process provides a guiding basis for the modified corrosion-resistant absorbers in design applications.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A spin-1/2 Ising–Heisenberg branched chain constituted by regularly alternating Ising spins and Heisenberg dimers involving an additional side branching is exactly solved in a magnetic field by the transfer-matrix method. The spin-1/2 Ising–Heisenberg branched chain involves two different Ising and one Heisenberg coupling constants. The overall ground-state phase diagram is formed by three different ground states emergent depending on a mutual interplay between the magnetic field and three considered coupling constants: the modulated quantum antiferromagnetic phase, the quantum ferrimagnetic phase, and the classical ferromagnetic phase. It is shown that the interaction anisotropy connected to two different Ising coupling constants substantially influences a breakdown of the intermediate one-half magnetization plateau, which represents a macroscopic manifestation of the quantum ferrimagnetic phase.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.MXene, especially Ti3C2Tx, is attracting extensive attention as an absorbing material owing to its strong dielectric loss and tunable structure. Nevertheless, extremely high conductivity and non-magnetic loss mechanism limit the absorbing intensity and effective absorption bandwidth (EAB). Herein, the magnetic ZnFe2O4 nanoparticles decorated Ti3C2Tx MXene composite is designed and synthesized by using a facile in-situ solvothermal method. The novel ZnFe2O4@Ti3C2Tx-2 (1:2) composite shows an optimal reflection loss of −60.94 dB and a wide EAB of 6.08 GHz at a matching thickness of only 1.75 mm. The mechanism analysis reveals that the synergetic electromagnetic loss effect, interfacial polarization, dipole polarization, and laminated structure contribute to improving the microwave absorption (MA) performance. Furthermore, to confirm the use capability of the ZnFe2O4@Ti3C2Tx sample coatings in practical applications, the radar cross-section (RCS) reduction performance has been proved through using computer simulation technology (CST). With the detection theta of 0°, the ZnFe2O4@Ti3C2Tx-2 sample coating possesses the largest RCS reduction value of 22.83 dB. This work lays the foundation for the rational design of high-performance absorbing materials.© 2021The present study focuses on the optimization of critical process parameters in MnFe2O4 doped by Zn and Dy to obtain high magnetic saturation (Ms), low magnetic remanence (Mr), low coercivity (Hc), and fine crystallite size (D). To this end, Taguchi method was used to investigate the simultaneous effects of Dy and Zn content, pH value, calcination time, and temperature on the structural and magnetic properties. Using five different levels for each parameter, 25 unique experiments were defined based on L25 orthogonal array of the Taguchi method to investigate the optimum conditions. Moreover, the experimental results showed that the crystallite size and the magnetic saturation are in the range of 13–30 nm and 30–67 emu/g, respectively. According to the experiment and ANOVA results, calcination time is the most significant factor influencing the crystallite size, and Zn content is the most significant factor influencing the magnetic saturation. Moreover, it was found that the highest Ms value belongs to the sample, which was optimized by the Taguchi method.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The frustration phenomenon in an exactly solvable spin-electron planar model constituted by identical bipyramidal plaquettes is discussed within the Toulouse's and dos Santos and Lyra's frustration concepts. It is shown that the ground state of the model contains the unfrustrated spontaneously ordered quantum ferromagnetic phase with local chiral degrees of freedom in the electron sub-lattice and the disordered quantum one, where both the Ising and electron sub-lattices are frustrated. The frustration of the latter sub-lattice persists at finite temperatures, but only in the disordered region. It finally vanishes at a certain frustration temperature. The reentrant behaviour of the frustration in the electron sub-lattice with three consecutive frustration temperatures due to a competition with the unfrustrated ferromagnetic spin arrangement near the ground-state phase transition can also be observed.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Strong electron correlations are discussed for the three capacitively coupled quantum dots, each of which is connected to a separate pair of electrodes. The finite-U mean field slave boson approach is used. The analysis is carried out for both repulsive and attractive intra- and inter-dot interactions. Depending on the ratio and the sign of interaction parameters and occupation, either charge ordered states or different spin, spin–charge and charge Kondo resonances arise.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Shafts intended for magnetomechanical sensors require a combination of mechanical properties and/or characteristics in addition to good magnetic properties. In the case of X46Cr13, this can be attained by the appropriate selection of heat treatment parameters. In fact this study discusses the effect of these parameters on the microstructure, mechanical and magnetic properties of this material. The B-H curves showed that irrespective of the heat treatment condition, the material was harder to magnetize in the axial direction than circumferentially. Also, quenched and tempered structures were harder to magnetize than those in the annealed condition. Changes in the austenitising temperature or time were not observed to lead to major changes in the B-H curve. On the other hand, increasing the tempering temperature from 350 °C to 500 °C, led to a significant drop in coercivity, attributed to a decrease in M3C precipitates. This change in coercivity was comparable to that observed as the tempering temperature increased from 500 °C to 600 °C, in which case the matrix structure changed from martensite to ferrite. Martensitic structures showed a lower magnetic response to a given applied torque than their annealed counterparts. On the other hand, with martensitic structures, the signal to torque relationship remained linear even at high torque values. This was not the case with the annealed structures. The study concludes that austenitising at 1040 °C for 45 min and tempering at 350 °C and 375 °C for 2 h yields an optimal combination of properties and performance.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magneto-impedance measurements (MI) were carried out on thin-films of Cu100-xMnxAu13.5 (x = 6.75 and 13.5). The sample with × = 6.75 (13.5) undergoes a phase transition to a spin-glass state below a glass temperature of about TG = 31 K (55 K). The MI measurements were carried out for temperatures (T) from 300 K down to 5 K in applied magnetic fields in the range of ± 3.5 kOe and for an ac electric current with frequency of 9.0 MHz. Short-range interaction and spin-fluctuations yielded non-vanishing values for the MI data for all values of T. The transverse magnetic permeability (μT) was obtained for both sample compositions demonstrating that MI is a suitable technique to study canonical spin-glasses in the MHz regime. Moreover, it was observed that the spin-fluctuations in very short time scale (∼10−7 s) are important down to the lowest temperature investigated of 5 K. The transverse magnetic susceptibility, μT, showed a minimum near the freezing temperature.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In our previous published research we have studied the applications of the ferrolens for the observation and qualitative analysis of non-homogeneous magnetic fields. Latest developments over the last few years of the ferrolens increased multifold the sensitivity of this device allowing it to display magnetic fields as low as 10mT in strength and therefore it is possible now to observe also the homogeneous (i.e. straight parallel magnetic flux lines of uniform density in space) magnetic field existing inside air solenoids and between N-S poles of two attracting separated permanent magnets. We present and analyze herein these novel observations of homogeneous magnetic fields with the ferrolens and as a potential new application of this device. The ferrolens can now display the projected magnetic field on air from a distance without needing to be in physical contact with the field source. Experiments were carried out to demonstrate these new capabilities of the ferrolens as a nanomagnetic flux viewer, real-time physical device and scientific qualitative tool. We compare the geometry of magnetic fields of condensed matter ferromagnets with that of magnetic fields inside electrical air solenoids. Specifically, the homogeneous field between two N-S attracting magnets at a distance as well as inside air solenoids and Helmholtz coils and also the non-homogeneous total field of single dipole permanent magnets were observed using a latest generation very sensitive ferrolens. The unique feature of this magneto optic fluid thin film physical device is that it can display discrete magnetic flux lines of the macroscopic field. Also we show how the ferrolens can be used to detect qualitatively the symmetry center of a non ideal homogeneous magnetic field.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We report the evolution of nanocrystalline α-Fe and γ-Ni phases in (NixFe1-x)70.5B17.7Si7.8Ti4 (at.%) where, x = 0.3 and 0.4, upon mechanical alloying of elemental powder mixtures up to 36 h. The effect of milling time on the nanostructure evolution, thermal stability, and magnetic properties have been investigated throughly using x-ray diffraction (XRD), differential scanning calorimetry (DSC), and vibrating sample magnetometry (VSM). XRD analysis of the as-milled powders revealed that the lattice parameter and the crystallite size of α-Fe phase lies in between 0.2850-0.2972 nm and 3–14 nm; whereas the same for γ-Ni lies in between 0.3550-0.3608 nm and 8–41 nm, respectively, during milling. The thermal analysis of the as-milled powders suggests that the onset temperature of crystallization increases as Fe content decreases. The thermomagnetic measurement of the heat treated powders has revealed the TC of α-Fe phase in x = 0.3 to be 590 K and that of γ-Ni phase in x = 0.4 to be 375 K. The maximum magnetic entropy change has been estimated to be 0.159 Jkg-1K−1 in x = 0.3, while that of x = 0.4 has been found to be 0.695 Jkg-1K−1 at an applied magnetic field of 19.9 kOe.© 2021The main idea of magnetic hyperthermia is to increase locally the temperature of the human body by means of injected superparamagnetic nanoparticles. They absorb energy from a time-dependent external magnetic field and transfer it into their environment. In the so-called superlocalization, the combination of an applied oscillating and a static magnetic field gradient provides even more focused heating since for large enough static field the dissipation is considerably reduced. Similar effect was found in the deterministic study of the rotating field combined with a static field gradient. Here we study theoretically the influence of thermal effects on superlocalization and on heating efficiency. We demonstrate that when time-dependent steady state motions of the magnetization vector are present in the zero temperature limit, then deterministic and stochastic results are very similar to each other. We also show that when steady state motions are absent, the superlocalization is severely reduced by thermal effects. Our most important finding is that in the low frequency range (ω→0) suitable for hyperthermia, the oscillating applied field is shown to result in two times larger intrinsic loss power and specific absorption rate then the rotating one with identical superlocalization ability which has importance in technical realization.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanoparticles and their magnetization dynamics play an important role in many applications. We focus on magnetization dynamics in large ensembles of single domain nanoparticles being characterized by either Brownian or Néel rotation mechanisms. Simulations of the respective behavior are obtained by solving advection–diffusion equations on the sphere, for which a unified computational framework is developed and investigated. This builds the basis for solving two parameter identification problems, which are formulated in the context of the chosen application, magnetic particle imaging. The functionality of the computational framework is illustrated by numerical results in the parameter identification problems either compared quantitatively or qualitatively to measured data.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A general theory of the shape tensor is outlined, providing estimates of the shape or demagnetisation factors for either single or collections of magnetic particles. In the general case of multiple interacting magnetic particles, shape factors are insufficient to completely characterise the magnetic field. This paper provides approximate expressions for the shape factors for isolated magnetic cylinders, isolated blocks, and collections of spheres. The key assumption is that the stray field is approximately spatially constant over each magnetic particle, leading to a system of equations for the shape factors. These equations are linear for magnetic particles of very high susceptibility, and imply shape factors have non-local properties. Non-random particle alignment can lead to very small shape factors, and corresponding high susceptibility, while random particle alignments tend to produce shape factors approximating their isolated values. The special case, when the matrix system for the shape factors is singular, corresponds to the threshold when the composite susceptibility changes from depending on, to being independent of, the particle susceptibilities. An appendix summarises the magnetic fields from uniformly magnetised point dipoles, spheres, cylinders, ellipsoids and blocks.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic resonance frequency of SrFe12O19 hexaferrites is above 40 GHz due to a very high magnetic anisotropy. Therefore, they are not suitable as absorbing materials in the frequency range of 1–18 GHz. Doping with Zn and Ru (SrFe12-2xZnxRuxO19) decreases the magnetic anisotropy and can bring the resonance frequency below 18 GHz improving the microwave absorption in lower frequency band. Both the imaginary and real parts of the permittivity increase and the magnetic loss tangent has a wide peak for x ≥ 0.3, which is twice the dielectric loss tangent. Both of them contribute to the microwave absorption. For this level of doping, the microwave absorption is significant in a wide frequency range. For x = 0.5 and the sample layer of 1.7–4.8 mm thick, the absorption bandwidth (RL < −10 dB) is from 4.3 GHz to 18 GHz. For a single-layer of 1.9 mm, the absorption bandwidth is from 10.1 to 18 GHz. The broad absorption is due to tunable magnetic anisotropic field by the Zn and Ru doping. The detailed analysis also shows that the impedance matching plays an important role in improving the absorbing band.© 2021 The AuthorsMicromagnetic simulations are used to investigate different strategies for tunnel magnetoresistance detection of the Néel skyrmion core direction and Bloch skyrmion chirality. When a Néel skyrmion passes beneath a perpendicularly magnetized dot separated by a tunnel barrier, a peak or dip in the tunnel magnetoresistance as a function of time reveals the core direction. When a Bloch skyrmion travels below a synthetic antiferromagnet, magnetized in-plane with an axis perpendicular to that of the track, the tunnel magnetoresistance as a function of time shows a peak followed by a dip, or vice versa, depending on the chirality. The results are compared with existing detection methods based on the Hall resistance.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic microbeads have acquired broad scope in immunoassay applications to detect pathogens causing dreadful diseases. In this work, we propose magnetic sensors using non-spiral planar microcoils to sense the presence of the microbeads with better sensitivity and fabrication simplicity. Experiments are performed by measuring the current induced in the sensing coil in the presence of iron oxide microbeads. Meanwhile, simulation studies of the sensors are conducted to verify the experimental results. A comparison of the proposed and the reported works on planar coil sensors are also presented. Improved limit of detection with reduced power consumption is observed to be the significant advantage of the induction-balance and differential sensors compared to the reported works.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic skyrmions are chiral spin magnetization structures with topological properties and have attracted great interest due to their small size and extremely low manipulation current density in the next generation spintronic devices. In this work, we introduced skyrmion into the magnetic tunnel junction and designed a dumbbell-shaped microwave detector based on skyrmion. It has a very high sensitivity, reaching more than 280000 mV/mW without any external bias field. Moreover, we expand this dumbbell-shaped detector into an array combination, which is expected to increase its sensitivity. Our studies may present guidance for the design of skyrmion based microwave detectors.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We have investigated the substrate influence on the Curie temperature of 2D magnet using the simple Ising model on a square lattice and the Frenkel–Kontorova potential for the substrate. We have found that the change in the phase transition temperature is directly proportional to the gradient of the exchange integral and the period of the substrate. The incommensurate arrangement of atoms with respect to the substrate potential leads to complex effects, such as the influence of the substrate potential and the coverage coefficient on the phase transition in the spin system. Moreover, the phase transition temperature can be increased or decreased, either the coverage coefficient is θ<1 or θ>1. Our results will help to understand deeply the effect of substrate on magnetic properties of 2D magnets.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Phase pure targets of sodium substituted lanthanum manganites (LNMO) were prepared by citrate gel method and characterized. These targets were laser ablated by pulsed laser deposition technique and were deposited simultaneously on silicon and relaxor ferroelectric PMN-PT substrates with a view to fabricating ferroelectric-ferromagnetic 2D heterostructures. Magnetization measurements reveal a higher magnetization for films of 100 nm thickness than the 300 nm thick films. The PMN-PT substrate influences the magnetic properties of sodium substituted lanthanum manganite thin films. The strain effects are higher for 100 nm thin films. The saturated polarization-electric field (P-E) loop measurements carried out on films demonstrated that, there is a considerable change in hysteresis parameters (coercivity and remanent polarization) upon thin film deposition. PMN-PT LNMO thin films can be viewed as a heterostructure where ferromagnetism and ferroelectricity co-exist and has potential applications in magnetoelectrics.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The heat capacity of a MnFe(P,Si,B) giant magnetocaloric material is investigated by several calorimetric techniques and first-principles calculations. Semi-adiabatic relaxation calorimetry, commercial heat flow and home-made Peltier cells Differential Scanning Calorimeters (DSC) are used to record the heat capacity both around the magnetic transition at room temperature and at low temperatures. The ferromagnetic first-order transition is characterized by a sharp and intense latent heat peak corresponding to a transition entropy change of ∼2.23 J mol−1 K−1, while the thermal hysteresis of ∼2 K remains moderate. The analysis of the heat capacity over a broad temperature range provides an estimate of several important parameters, such as the electronic density of states (N(EF) ≈ 7.2 states eV−1f.u.−1) at low temperatures or an estimate of the Debye temperature θD ≈ 455 K. Different methods (non-magnetic reference, Debye function, phonons calculations) were used to model the lattice contribution to the heat capacity. While this study highlights the difficulty to disentangle lattice, electronic and magnetic contributions from a single quantity such as the heat capacity, it reveals that the excess entropy (magnetic contribution plus latent heat) is considerably larger than in the parent Fe2P.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We calculated the specific absorption rate (SAR) and relaxation time of a dilute assembly of spherical iron nanoparticles with cubic anisotropy distributed in a viscous liquid. The behavior of unit magnetization vector was investigated by the solution of stochastic Landau–Lifshitz equation. The spatial orientation of magnetic nanoparticle was determined by the set of stochastic equations for multiple particle directors. The particle viscous and magnetic magnetization reversal modes are revealed at low and sufficiently high amplitudes of alternating magnetic field, respectively. The SAR of iron nanoparticle assembly is shown to exceed significantly that of iron oxide nanoparticles with uniaxial anisotropy at the same amplitudes and frequencies of applied magnetic field. The linear response theory is shown to be valid only at small magnetic field amplitudes, H0 ≤ 50–70 Oe.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Fluoride ferroelectrics containing 3d transition metal ions are potential single-phase multiferroics. Pure phase Pb5Fe3F19 powders are prepared by the solid-state reaction, which is confirmed by the X-ray diffraction with isostructure to Pb5Cr3F19. X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy confirms that Fe ions are in the valence state of +3. Ferroelectricity is confirmed by the observation of amplitude and phase hysteresis loops by piezoresponse force microscopy at room temperature. Two anomalies are observed at TN1 of 78 K and TN2 of 21 K in the temperature dependent magnetization (M−T) curves, which is due to the onset of two antiferromagnetic transitions. The bifurcation between the zero-field cooled and field cooled M−T curves at temperatures below TN1 of 78 K is attributed to competition of the complicated antiferromagnetic exchange coupling between the neighboring Fe3+ ions, leading to the magnetic relaxation. Small hysteresis with negligible coercivity can be observed in the field dependent magnetization curves below TN1. The magnetization and coercivity are significantly enhanced with further decreasing temperature, indicating the weak ferromagnetism. The observed ferromagnetism might be due to the magnetoelectric coupling between the ferroelectric polarization and magnetization, leading to the spin canting of the antiferromagnetic coupling between neighboring Fe3+ ions. The magnetoelectric coupling is confirmed by the observation of magnetodielectric effect, which is due to the strong magnetic and structural coupling.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In order to break the contradictory requirements of the outer shell electronic structure for multiferroism in oxide perovskites, multiferroic fluorides were selected to be studied, in which the ferroelectricity and ferromagnetism may both come from the same magnetic ions. Pure phase Ba5Fe3F19−δ powders were prepared by solid state reaction. Energy dispersive X-ray spectroscopy results indicate the deficiency of Fe. The mixed valence states of Fe3+ and Fe2+ are confirmed by X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy. The observation of amplitude and phase hysteresis loops measured by piezoresponse force microscopy indicates the ferroelectricity in Ba5Fe3F19−δ. The temperature dependent magnetization curves show a continuous increase with decreasing temperature, without clear phase transition. However, the temperature dependent inverse magnetic susceptibility (χ) follows the Curie–Weiss law above 150 K with Curie–Weiss temperature of −55 K, suggesting predominantly antiferromagnetic interactions between the Fe ions. The χT decreases with the temperature decreasing from 300 K, indicating the onset of weak antiferromagnetic interaction from temperature above 300 K. No hysteresis loop was observed for the magnetic dependent magnetization curves down to 5 K, indicating the lacking of long-range ordering. A peak was observed in the temperature dependent dielectric constant and dielectric loss at around 257 K, which was strongly suppressed by the application of 5 T magnetic field. The observation of magnetocapacitance effect confirms the magnetoelectric coupling, which originates from the magnetic and structural coupling.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this report, sol–gel synthesized CoFe2−xSnxO4 (x = 0.00, 0.05, 0.10, 0.15, 0.20) nanoparticles (NPs) were prepared from metal chloride precursors. To identify the ferrite phase formation TGA/TDA analysis was performed. X-ray diffraction (XRD) analysis confirms the formation of face centered cubic spinel structure of the CoFe2O4 NPs. Octahedral shaped crystalline ferrite nanoparticles are confirmed from Scanning electron microscopy (SEM) study. The crystallite size estimated from XRD data is well agreed with particles size measured from transmission electron microscope (TEM) image. Fourier Transform Infrared (FTIR) spectroscopy result shows the octahedral and tetrahedral stretching vibrational bonds, respectively. EDX analysis suggests the successful substitution of Sn in the CoFe2−xSnxO4. The room temperature and at 50 K magnetization measurement shows the ferromagnetic behavior. The maximum coercivity (Hc) and saturation magnetization (Ms) was found to be 1081 Oe and 54 emu g−1 for x = 0.00, 0.20 sample. The variation of saturation magnetization with Sn doping has been discussed through Co2+ and Fe3+ cation distribution of spinel CoFe2O4. The law of approach method is used to calculate the values of anisotropy constant (K). The values of K for different Sn doping are found to be 3.051, 2.740, 2.623, 2.944 and 3.239 × 105 ergs/cm3, respectively. The change of coercivity (1081–636 Oe) with Sn substitution of has a direct relationship with crystallite size as well domain wall movement of ferromagnetism.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles (SPION) are available since many years and some of them are already approved for human use. New applications are currently emerging and the field is moving from the use of SPION as simply contrast agents, to more complex structures optimized in terms of core, size, shape and coating for different imaging modalities (e.g. MRI vs MPI), and different theranostic applications. Prof. Krishnan M. Kannan has greatly contributed to our understanding of the role of each of these parameters in shaping SPIO best function. Some of these developments are discussed in this short review just as examples. More recently, new cell-based SPIO constructs have also been optimized, moving the field from engineering the nanoparticles to the generation of hybrids cell-nanoparticle constructs. These developments have requested additional SPIO optimizations to maintain nanoparticles biocompatibility and properties and, at the same time, prevent cell damage and maintain cell functionality. Related examples from our lab are also discussed.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We study the tight-binding model of NiO2 planes in novel superconductors that takes into account anisotropic nickel–oxygen d−p hopping, oxygen–oxygen p−p hoppings, realistic crystal-field splittings, and the on-site Coulomb interactions {U,JH} both at nickel and oxygen ions. Electronic structure of the NiO2 layer is investigated for doping x=0 and x=0.25. For an ideal undoped system NdNiO2 (x=0) we get robust Mott insulator and no magnetism as various magnetic ground states (ferromagnetic, C-type and G-type antiferromagnetic) have all the same energy. For self-doping x=0.25 the system becomes conducting (zero HOMO–LUMO gap), with nonmagnetic ground state due to competing degenerate magnetic meta-stable states. These findings correlate well with experimental and theoretical data. However, it seems that the two-dimensional model with p and d orbitals only is insufficient for a realistic description of Nd1−xSrxNiO2.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Electromagnetic wave has emerged as a new source of environmental pollution in the daily life. Therefore, the prominent microwave absorbents are urgently needed. In this work, the carbon aerogel and Fe3O4 nanoparticle (Fe3O4/CA) composites with core–shell structure were facilely prepared by a self-assembly process between carbon aerogels and Fe ion under the hydrothermal condition. The microwave absorption performance was significantly enhanced due to the perfect impedance matching and effective interface polarization. Compared with Fe3O4 nanoparticles and carbon aerogels, Fe3O4/CA composites show the advantages of strong microwave absorption and broad absorption bandwidth. The maximum RL value of Fe3O4/CA composites is up to −50.96 dB at 4.80 GHz. And also, the effective absorption bandwidth reaches 3.82 GHz with the thickness of 2 mm.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this work, an attempt is made on optimization process parameters of the plasma arc discharge technique, including electrical current, atmosphere, and chamber pressure to synthesize nanocrystalline (Fe, Ni)Fe2O4 ferrite powders. The process was performed at the air and oxygen atmosphere with the applied arc current varying from 300 to 500 A and the chamber pressure of 1 and 2 atm. After establishing an arc between the electrodes, the as-synthesized powders were collected, and structure, magnetic, electromagnetic, and dielectric properties were examined in detail. The results show the highest value of the magnetic spinel phase (38.32 wt%) and saturation magnetization (35.1 emu/g) is obtained at the air atmosphere using an applied electrical current and chamber pressure of 400 A and 1 atm, respectively. The powders prepared in these processing conditions also exhibit the highest dielectric constant value over all the frequency ranges. Nevertheless, the powder synthesized at oxygen atmosphere in the applied electrical current of 400 A and chamber pressure of 1 atm shows the highest value of magnetic permeability over a wide range of frequency which is almost two times higher than that of the powders synthesized at the air atmosphere.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Nanostructured Ni2MnCo alloy samples were prepared from pure elemental powders by Mechanical Alloying (MA) using a high-energy planetary ball mill. The obtained powders were characterized with XRD, SEM, laser diffraction granulometry and VSM techniques in order to study the microstructural, morphology, particle size distribution and magnetic properties as a function of milling time. The XRD patterns of as-milled powders revealed the formation of the main stage solid solution of Ni2MnCo with fcc structure phase after 24 h of MA. With increasing milling time from 0.5 hr to 50 hr, it is observed that the lattice parameter increases from 3.60 to 3.78 Å as well as an increase of microstrain from 0.17 to 0.41%, whereas the particle and crystallite size decreases down to 3.50 µm and 13 nm respectively. The mixture loses magnetization during the milling process due to the combined effects of crystallites size reduction and the dissolution of the antiferromagnetic compound (Mn) within the host lattice of the alloy. The very low values of the remanence ratio (Mr/Ms) ([1.2E-3, 1.7E-3]), as well as the very low values of the coercive field (≈ 1 Oe), were observed after 16 h of milling, which means that the alloy is magnetically saturated exhibiting a very soft magnetic behavior.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Room-temperature “ferromagnetism” found last decades in nonmagnetic nanoparticles is a puzzle that is not solved yet. In this work we report about the observation of room-temperature magnetism in powders of CaF2 doped with CeO2 as well as in the undoped powder but containing small amount impurity. The studied powders were obtained by grinding of bulk crystals using a sapphire mortar with a pestle. Magnetization dependences on magnetic field for the studied powder samples resemble the dependences observed in nonmagnetic oxide nanoparticles like CeO2. The comparative study of bulk and powder fluorite samples unambiguously confirms the key role of surface defects in the observed features. XRD and TEM measurements show that powder samples have particles of different sizes from the micro down to the submicron scale. The undoped bulk fluorite as well as doped with 0.5at.% (two differently grown crystals), 2at.%, 10at.% of CeO2 revealed only diamagnetic or paramagnetic contribution to magnetization curve whereas the powders of the same samples have ferromagnetic-like contribution on M−H curve. This work may help to get new insight in room-temperature “ferromagnetism” phenomenon of nonmagnetic nanoparticles.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.FeSiAl alloy material is a typical soft magnetic material, which have important application potentials in the areas of electromagnetic wave absorption, and thus it is widely used in civilian and military field. Currently, researchers mostly adopts the changes of microstructure and doped components to improve electromagnetic wave absorbing properties of FeSiAl alloy materials. In this paper, a metamaterial designing method is used for the optimal design of a broadband electromagnetic wave absorbing material based on FeSiAl alloy. We investigate the geometrical dimensions and array period on the absorption performance about the FeSiAl metamaterial. The absorption mechanism of FeSiAl metamaterial is discussed through the propagation of electromagnetic field and Smith diagram. We find that the absorption performance can easily be regulated with the macrostructural size. Moreover, we create a broadband FeSiAl metamaterial. The designed FeSiAl metamaterial exhibit a −10 dB absorption bandwidth from 4 GHz to 8 GHz and 10 GHz to 15 GHz, and it is sensitive at large incidence angle, but do not sensitive within 45°.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The interplay between different degrees of freedom such as charge, spin, orbital, and lattice has received a great deal of interest due to its potential to engineer materials properties and their functionalities for device applications. In this work, we have explored the crystallographic phase diagram of Ba1-xSrxMnO3 and studied the correlation between two degrees of freedom, namely phonons and spins using magnetization and inelastic light scattering measurements. The system undergoes a series of crystallographic phase transitions 2H → 9R → 4H as a function of doping (Sr) as observed by X-ray diffraction measurements. Investigation of their temperature-dependent magnetization reveals a para- to antiferro-magnetic transition for all the compositions. An Eg phonon in the 9R phase and an E1g phonon in the 4H phase involving Mn/O-vibrations, show anomalous temperature-dependence in the antiferromagnetic phase arising due to spin-phonon coupling.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We study spin-dependent direct and Hall conductivities in the threshold region of Fermi energy, ɛF=2J, where J is the exchange integral between the conduction electron spins and the skyrmion spin texture. For ɛF at the threshold value and above the spin-down electrons are allowed to exist. We find the two in the direct and four narrow peaks in the Hall conductivities for Fermi energies slightly below the threshold value. The found effects are dramatic because the electric current changes by approximately eight times in the narrow range of gate voltages (∼4 meV). The values of the peaks strongly depend on skyrmion size. For small and very large skyrmion sizes the peak amplitudes are small compared to the conductivity absolute values. At the skyrmion radius a=6nm and very light conduction electrons, m∗∼10−2me, the extrema are the most pronounced. The temperature evolution reveals the strong smearing effect where the peak-wise behavior completely disappears at room temperatures. Spin transistor could be considered for possible applications where in the narrow region of gate voltage the sharp conductivity change occurs.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The magnetization reversal process is an intrinsic property of NdMn0.8Fe0.2O3 single crystal below TN = 59.5 K for magnetization field-cooled regime. The phenomenon is very anisotropic and a negative magnetization was observed below the compensation temperature TComp = 21.7(1) K; 25.9(1) K and 22.7(1) K for a-; b- and c-axis and field 0.01 T. Magnetocrystalline anisotropy results in different shape of hysteresis loop for any crystallographic orientation below TN. Ferromagnetic behavior, attributed to ordering of Nd sublattice, with coercive field of 1.32 T at temperature T = 2 K is typical for magnetic field applied along b-axis. Signature of ferromagnetic ordering exists even at 30 K. Very low hysteresis was observed in a–c plane and the a-axis magnetization loop has butterfly shape. A model of two Nd and Mn interpenetrating magnetic sublattices describes magnetization reversal better than a cluster model.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We report the structural, and magnetic properties as well as magnetocaloric effect of a polycrystalline compound of Tb2Rh3Ge. This compound crystallizes with Mg2Ni3Si-type of rhombohedral Laves phases (space group R3‾m, hR18). The magnetic properties and magnetocaloric effect of Tb2Rh3Ge are explored through dc-magnetization measurements. Temperature dependence of magnetization revealed that the compound exhibits ferromagnetic behavior with TC=56 K. The field dependence of magnetization indicates that Tb2Rh3Ge is a soft ferromagnet. The obtained isothermal magnetic entropy changes (ΔSm) and refrigeration capacity (relative cooling power) for a change of magnetic field 0–9 T are 12.74 J kg−1K−1 and 497(680) J/kg respectively. The Arrott plots and universal curve of normalized ΔSm indicate that this compound undergoes a second order ferromagnetic phase transition.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.In this study, anisotropic magneto-responsive 3D printer inks have been developed by mixing UV-sensitive photoresist SU8 and Fe Flakes (∼10 um lateral size and ∼ 100 nm thickness). Fe flakes have been synthesized via surfactant-assisted ball milling of Fe powders. Structures with solid loadings up to 70% have been successfully 3D printed. Magnetic cores for toroidal inductors were developed by using the synthesized magneto responsive ink. The magnetic, mechanic, and electrical properties of the printed structures have been evaluated. Toroidal inductors with a quality factor up to 70 at 1 MHz were successfully developed using the 3D printed magnetic cores with 70% solid content.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The effect of Er3+ substitution on the physical properties of SmFeO3 was studied through magnetic and electrical measurements. The X-ray diffraction patterns of Sm1-xErxFeO3 samples showed that the lattice constants decrease with increasing Er content. As a result, the distortion of Er -doped SmFeO3became significant. The magnetic hysteresis loops of samples indicate that the antiferromagnetic trend increases with Er concentration. The anomaly in Ac susceptibility (χ) and dielectric constant curves for Sm1-xErxFeO3 provided evidence for occurring spin reorientation transition (SRT) in these compounds and are also observed the gradual decrease in SR temperature with increasing Er3+ions. Furthermore, the electrical measurements exhibited a considerable enhancement in the dielectric constant. Sm0.3Er0.7FeO3 is the only compound that presented a colossal dielectric constant (CDC) (103) at room temperature which is attributed to relaxor-ferroelectrics. Likewise, the appearance of magnetic and ferroelectric hysteresis loops indicated the coexistence of magnetism and ferroelectricity.© 2021The article describes a new method of generating a rotating magnetic field of high frequency. This new measuring system is built of a magnetic circuit consisting of a ferrite torus, inside of which there are three LP windings wound on ferrite cores connected in parallel with CP capacitors. Between the three rectangular voltage signals shifted by 120 angular degrees and the LPCP circuits, three serial LSCS circuits that constitute the band-pass filter circuit are connected. In this way, the system can be powered by both sinusoidal and square signals. This significantly reduces the cost of the entire device. The necessary conditions for thermal energy release in a magnetic fluid placed in a high-frequency rotating magnetic field are given. The author presents the preliminary results of the calorimetric effect in a magnetic fluid caused by a rotating (RMF) and alternating (AMF) magnetic field. The same sample of the magnetic fluid with magnetite nanoparticles dispersed in the oil (as a carrier liquid) was studied by both methods. The heating rate temperature (dT/dt)t=0 and its dependence on the intensity and the frequency of the magnetic field was determined. Taking into account the fact that both experiments were carried out under slightly different conditions, the intrinsic loss power (ILP) was calculated in order to compare the results. They indicate that the thermal effect in RMF is more than two times greater than in AMF. This allows a significant reduction in the mass of the magnetic material needed to produce a similar thermal effect in medical applications.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This work investigates the magneto-caloric effect and critical behavior in Mn3−xFexSn2 (x = 0.3, 0.7) alloys synthesized by arc melting method. The alloys show two successive second order magnetic phase transitions at TC1≈ 254 K (261 K) and TC2≈ 205 K (185 K), respectively for x = 0.3 (0.7). The modified Arrot plot study around paramagnetic–ferromagnetic transition at TC1 reveals the critical exponent, β = 0.397 (0.378) with long-range of magnetic interactions for x = 0.3 (0.7). Importantly, the magneto-caloric study for x = 0.3 (0.7) gives large refrigerant capacity (RC) of 330 (250) J/kg at 5 T applied magnetic field. The large RC value and two successive magnetic transitions makes these earth abundant-based Mn3−xFexSn2 alloys highly promising for magnetic refrigeration in a wide temperature span.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We investigated the dynamic susceptibility in the absence of a bias field of stadium-shaped and elliptical nanostructures by micromagnetic simulations. Both the resonant frequencies and the number of peaks depend on the minimum energy configuration, which in turn is a function of the aspect ratio of the system. Dynamic susceptibility does not vary much if the nanostructure is stadium-shaped or elliptical, if its lowest energy state is a vortex. If the configuration is a saturated state, the low resonance frequency is only visible in stadium-shaped nanostructures and not in elliptical nanostructures, which is justified by the impact of the curvature of each nanostructure. The possibility of controlling frequencies by modifying the geometric parameters of the system suggests the possibility of using these nanostructures in potential magnetic controllable frequency devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Understanding the magnetic correlations in amorphous alloys is the key to enhancing their high soft magnetic properties. The magnetization correlations were studied in amorphous alloy ribbons Fe-Cu-Nb-Si-B by analysis of approach to magnetic saturation within the random magnetic anisotropy model. An unusual sequence of power laws during approach of the magnetization to saturation was observed. This may indicate the transition from isotropic to anisotropic magnetic correlations as the applied field decreases.© 2021 The AuthorThe extended Hubbard model in the atomic limit, which is equivalent to lattice S=1/2 fermionic gas, is considered on the triangular lattice. The model includes onsite Hubbard U interaction and both nearest-neighbor (W1) and next-nearest-neighbor (W2) density–density intersite interactions. The variational approach treating the U term exactly and the Wl terms in the mean-field approximation is used to investigate thermodynamics of the model and to find its finite temperature (T>0) phase diagrams (as a function of particle concentration) for W1>0 and W2<0. Two different types of charge-order (i.e., DCO and TCO phases) within 3×3 unit cells as well as the nonordered (NO) phase occur on the diagram. Moreover, several kinds of phase-separated (PS) states (NO/DCO, DCO/DCO, DCO/TCO, and TCO/TCO) are found to be stable for fixed concentration. Attractive W2<0 stabilizes PS states at T=0 and it extends the regions of their occurrence at T>0. The evolution of the diagrams with increasing of |W2|/W1 is investigated. It is found that some of the PS states are stable only at T>0. Two different critical values of |W2|/W1 are determined for the PS states, in which two ordered phases of the same type (i.e., two domains of the DCO or TCO phase) coexist.© 2021 The Author(s)Electron holography is used to visualize the electromagnetic field inside and outside a sample with high resolution. However, for analysis of nanocrystalline materials, difficulties related to electron diffraction are expected to arise due to the random orientation of the nanocrystallites. Here we present a procedure to extract magnetic field information from holograms and reduce the effect of electron diffraction by paying attention to the contrast of bright-field images. As a demonstration, the difference in the intensity of the magnetic flux between the Fe-Si-B-P-Cu amorphous matrix and Fe-rich body-centered cubic (bcc) nanocrystallites is detected with this procedure.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.The critical behavior of ferromagnetic transition is investigated by bulk magnetization measurements for La0.85Co1.68As2 crystal with a ThCr2Si2-type structure, grown by using NaAs as a flux, in which the vacancies on the both La and Co sites exist. The critical exponents [β = 0.388(3), γ = 1.44(2) and δ = 4.855(9)] with Curie temperature Tc = 99.4 K are obtained, whose self-consistency and reliability are verified by the Widom scaling law and the scaling equation. The critical exponents of ferromagnetic transition occurring in La0.85Co1.68As2 belong to the three-dimensional (3D) Heisenberg model, and suggest that the magnetic interaction decays as J(r)∼r−4.975 with a short range coupling. These results provide helpful information for understanding the mechanism of ferromagnetism emerging in La0.85Co1.68As2 compound.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.This work investigates the role of hydroxyl and epoxy bridges in room-temperature ferromagnetism (FM) of pyrolytic graphene oxide nanoplatelets (GOs). Graphene oxide nanoplatelets were synthesized from bamboo pyroligneous acid (BPA), varying oxide coverage (OC) from 5.3% to 13.0%. The amount of hydroxyl and epoxy functional groups in all the GO samples were estimated from results analysis of X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS). An FM signal was identified, measured at room temperature, which scaled with oxide coverage. Decreased oxide coverage results in enhanced FM. A combination of results from high-resolution transmission electron microscopy (HR-TEM), XPS, energy-dispersive X-ray spectroscopy (EDX), X-ray diffraction (XRD), electron energy loss spectroscopy (EELS), Fourier transform infrared (FTIR), Raman, and electrical characterization allowed constructing an atomic model for each graphene oxide (GO) structure. First-principles calculations of the atomic model suggest that FM is induced by the adsorption of –OH and –O– atoms on graphene nanoplatelets; therefore, their magnetism is a response to the number of uncompensated spins due to topographic defects. These results suggest future possibilities of the magnetism approach of pyrolytic GO in spintronics of advanced sensors and devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.To conduct operando measurements, we previously developed a sample-heating system and, for this study, developed a magnetic-field-application system for spin-polarized scanning electron microscopy measurement. A Sm2Co17 permanent magnet placed below a sample, which works with a resistive heater, is used to apply a magnetic field of more than 20 kA/m perpendicular to a sample at up to 200 ℃. A specially designed magnetic shield is attached close to the sample to avoid decreasing the accuracy of secondary polarization detection due to the stray field from the magnet. With this system, we observed the reformation of a magnetic domain structure of Fe (001) at 200 ℃ by applying a magnetic field of 20 kA/m.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A magnetic bibubble is a composite structure involving two magnetic bubbles with topological skyrmion number Nsk=±2, which can be formed by merging two individual magnetic bubbles. Unlike the normal magnetic bubble, the axial symmetry of the bibubble is thus broken, which provide us an ideal platform to study the dynamics of topological structures with skyrmion number larger than unity. In this work, we studied the dynamics of the bibubble driven by a magnetic field gradient using micromagnetic simulations. We show that both the velocity and the skyrmion hall angle depend on the angle between the field gradient and the orientation of the bibubble. Moreover, the bibubble performs an orbital motion in the presence of circular field gradients accompanying with an oscillation of its orientation.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We have experimentally investigated the effect of V and Zr insertion thickness on perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) in [Co/Pt multilayers]/[Zr, V]/CoFeB (Hard/Soft) composite structures. Micromagnetic simulations have been performed to study the effect of the Gilbert damping constant on the switching characteristics in a hard/soft composite structure for weak and strong interlayer exchange coupling. The V and Zr insertions are studied due to their low Gilbert damping constant with the CoFeB interface. For both insertions, the interlayer exchange coupling remained ferromagnetic in nature for all the thicknesses studied. We observed an increase in PMA with increasing V and Zr insertion thicknesses. The composite layer with V insertion provides thermal stability comparable to the previously reported Ta insertion. From micromagnetic simulations, we observed that the effect of the Gilbert damping constant on switching characteristics is largest for thinner insertions (strong ferromagnetic coupling) and the effect diminishes with increasing insertion thickness (weak ferromagnetic coupling).© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Cell based therapies including chimeric antigen receptor (CAR) T cells are promising for treating leukemias and solid cancers. At the same time, there is interest in enhancing the functionality of these cells via surface decoration with nanoparticles (backpacking). Magnetic nanoparticle cell labeling is of particular interest due to opportunities for magnetic separation, in vivo manipulation, drug delivery and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI). While modification of T cells with magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) was explored before, we questioned whether MNPs are compatible with CAR-T cells when introduced during the manufacturing process. We chose highly aminated 120 nm crosslinked iron oxide nanoworms (CLIO NWs, ~36,000 amines per NW) that could efficiently label different adherent cell lines and we used CD123 CAR-T cells as the labeling model. The CD123 CAR-T cells were produced in the presence of CLIO NWs, CLIO NWs plus protamine sulfate (PS), or PS only. The transduction efficiency of lentiviral CD123 CAR with only NWs was ~ 23% lower than NW + PS and PS groups (~33% and 35%, respectively). The cell viability from these three transduction conditions was not reduced within CAR-T cell groups, though lower compared to non-transduced T cells (mock T). Use of CLIO NWs instead of, or together with cationic protamine sulfate for enhancement of lentiviral transduction resulted in comparable levels of CAR expression and viability but decreased the proportion of CD8 + cells and increased the proportion of CD4 + cells. CD123 CAR-T transduced in the presence of CLIO NWs, CLIO NWs plus PS, or PS only, showed similar level of cytotoxicity against leukemic cell lines. Furthermore, fluorescence microscopy imaging demonstrated that CD123 CAR-T cells labeled with CLIO NW formed rosettes with CD123 + leukemic cells as the non-labeled CAR-T cells, indicating that the CAR-T targeting to tumor cells has maintained after CLIO NW labeling. The in vivo trafficking of the NW labeled CAR-T cells showed the accumulation of CAR-T labeled with NWs primarily in the bone marrow and spleen. CAR-T cells can be magnetically labeled during their production while maintaining functionality using the positively charged iron oxide NWs, which enable the in vivo biodistribution and tracking of CAR-T cells.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.Target skyrmions have been attracting intensive attention as the building block of spintronic devices. However, due to the topological protection of these magnetic textures, an extra driving force is needed to realize the transition between different magnetic textures. Herein, we achieve the transition of these magnetic textures with the breaking of topological protection by applying perpendicular microwave magnetic field, which is assisted by the excitation of breathing modes and hybridized modes (combination of breathing modes and radial spin wave modes). Another distinct resonance mode originating from the interaction of hybridized mode and breathing mode is also found, which is excited by isolated annular domain in different positions of nanodisks. Our results provide an insight for the understanding of complex dynamic behaviors in magnetic textures and the designing of spintronics devices.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.We study the magnetic anisotropy of multilayer nanostructures [Co–Al2O3]N with fixed Co island layer thickness (d≈1.2nm) and varying Al2O3 layer thickness. We use the Kerr effect to measure the magnetization hysteresis loops at different orientations of the magnetic field. We observed a unidirectional magnetic anisotropy in structures with small thicknesses of Al2O3 layers (d<1.4nm) when the exchange interaction between the Co layers is large. This anisotropy was oriented at 150° with respect to the easy axis of a continuous Co film. We believe that the unidirectional anisotropy can be caused by the super-vortex magnetization of the multilayer structure, while the unidirectional magnetization is caused by the projection of the super-vortex core on the sample plane.© 2021 Elsevier B.V.A so-called smart material is a material that is the seat of one or more multiphysical coupling. One of the key points in the development of the constitutive laws of these materials, either at the local or at the global scale, is to formulate a free energy density (or enthalpy) from vectors, tensors, at a given order and for a class of given symmetry, depending on the symmetry classes of the crystal constituting the material or the symmetry of the representative volume element. This article takes as a support of study the stress and magnetization couple (σ,m) involved in the phenomena of magnetoelastic coupling in a cubic symmetry medium. Several studies indeed show a non-monotonic sensitivity of the magnetic susceptibility and magnetostriction of certain soft magnetic materials under stress. Modeling such a phenomenon requires the introduction of a second order stress term in the Gibbs free energy density. A polynomial formulation in the two variables stress and magnetization is preferred over a tensorial formulation. For a given material symmetry class, this allows to express more easily the free energy density at any bi-degree in σ and m (i.e. at any constitutive tensors order for the so-called tensorial formulation). A rigorous and systematic method is essential to obtain the high-degree magneto-mechanical coupling terms and to build a free energy density function at any order which is invariant by the action of the cubic (octahedral) group. For that aim, theoretical and computer tools in Invariant Theory, that allow for the mathematical description of cubic nonlinear magneto-elasticity, are introduced. Minimal integrity bases of the invariant algebra for the pair (m,σ), under the proper (orientation-preserving) and the full cubic groups, are then proposed. The minimal integrity basis for the proper cubic group is constituted of 60 invariants, while the minimal integrity basis for the full cubic group (the one of interest for magneto-elasticity) is made up of 30 invariants. These invariants are formulated in a (coordinate free) intrinsic manner, using a generalized cross product to write some of them. The counting of independent invariants of a given multi-degree in (m,σ) is performed. It is shown accordingly that it is possible to list without error all the material parameters useful for the description of the coupled magnetoelastic behavior from the integrity basis. The technique is applied to derive general expressions Ψ★(σ,m) of the free energy density at the magnetic domains scale exhibiting cubic symmetry. The classic results for an isotropic medium are recovered.